Who's going to the #DWTS finale? And who's going home? Here's how the top 5 performed Monday:  
Whose Michael Jackson routine was the best on #DWTS? And which couple is getting your votes tonight? 
Wow! performance really touched coach on #TheVoice. Were you also moved? 
Who's watching #TheVoice? Did put you in a New York State of Mind? 
What did you think of the mixed-up routines on #DWTS? Too unconventional or fun and different? 
It's #DWTS time! Tonight the remaining couples are dancing to Michael Jackson hits. Who are you most excited to see? 
Here's another aww-some pic of Dave Salmoni & Tyson the lion cub!  
Cutest day ever! Animal Planet's Dave Salmoni cuddles a lion cub in our offices.  
Kelly Preston opens up about her late son Jett's autism  
Rihanna's 7-day plane trip (a promotional stunt for her album) is a nightmare, according to people on the flight  
Paula Broadwell's brother tells PEOPLE the author is "filled with guilt and shame" over Petraeus affair  
Nicki Minaj says she's "not so nice" as an Idol judge.  
PHOTO: Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez reunite at AMA after-party  
Most improved at the AMAs? Ke$ha, who was fresh, feminine, and didn't look the least bit sticky. For once.  
Start your engines! Meet the contestants of season 5:  
Best wishes to who is back home after being in the hospital:  
Photos: Sequins, slits & more sexy #AMAs red carpet style  
Justin Bieber brings a special date to the #AMAs: his mom  
45 minutes into the #AMAs... which performance has been your favorite? 
Hot momma! Jessica Simpson shows off her 60 lb. weight loss.  
Selena Gomez and Taylor Swift meet up for dinner -- and some deep conversation -- in L.A.  
Watch Channing Tatum transform from Hollywood newcomer to #SexiestManAlive:  
Lauren Scruggs shares what she's learned from Bethany Hamilton, the surfer who lost her arm in a shark attack  
Not much to see here, just 25 shirtless, sexy photos of Hugh, Ryan, Prince Harry, Channing & more!  
Inside Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez's explosive date night  
PEOPLE goes behind the scenes with Gloriana as they shoot their new video!  
The Dog Whisperer, Cesar Millan, opens up more about his suicide attempt, calling it a 'dark moment'  
#SexiestManAlive Channing Tatum lists his favorite California hotspots. It's the Sexiest MAP alive! *rimshot*  
Have you seen "Breaking Dawn -- Part 2" yet? If so, tell us what you thought of it!  
Did Justin and Selena spend the night together on Wednesday?  
PHOTO: See Jared Leto in drag - he's workin' it!  
Are Nicki & Mariah getting along on the American Idol set after their spat last month?  
Jennifer Aniston & Justin Theroux have a funny night out in Beverly Hills. All the details:  
Inspiring video! shares her prosthetic arms – and what she loves about them:  
Miss America contestant faces difficult health decision  
Did she make the right decision? Demi Lovato was put in a very awkward position on #XFactor:  
Is divorce on the horizon for Kris and Bruce Jenner?  
Drug charges against Jon Bon Jovi's daughter dropped  
Jason Aldean and his wife say their marriage is "fine" after photo scandal  
Gavin DeGraw's performing a live online concert to benefit victims of Sandy in 1 hour! Tune in & rock out here:  
PHOTO: Check out Liz Lemon's save-the-date cards. A 30 Rock wedding? I WANT TO GO TO THERE.  
Modern Family star Ariel Winter's family drama explodes in court  
Heroes Among Us: Meet the woman who has rescued thousands of puppy mill dogs! 
"After having a kid, it's just like, 'Oh my god, there's so much more to life than going out.'" -- Snooki, making sense  
Miranda and Blake (hilariously) dismiss pregnancy rumors  
Kristen Stewart vs. Cher: Who rocked a sheer bodysuit better? (via  
Lauren Scruggs, who lost her left hand and eye in a propeller accident, calls her recovery a "miracle."  
Maksim Chmerkovskiy wants his brother Val to win #DWTS. Who are you rooting for?  
The very UNsexy moment Channing Tatum told his wife that he was going to be PEOPLE's #SexiestManAlive.  
Did Chef Guy Fieri deserve to be attacked?  
Lisa Whelchel of #Survivor has West Nile virus:  
Huh? Hope Solo reportedly gets married to the man just arrested for allegedly assaulting her.  
Also appearing in our #sexiestmanalive issue? Olympian and his adorable dog:  (via 
- Check page 112! ;) 
Also in our #sexiestmanalive issue? Matt Bomer. Come, swoon with us at this photo:  
Serxierst Mern Alerve! 
Kristen Stewart steps out for Breaking Dawn's London premiere in another see-through look. (via  
*bows* :) Hope you enjoy the pics! 
SWOON! RT ‏@EW Channing Tatum: 9 Im-pec-able Shirtless Scenes  #SexiestManAlive 
Twi-hards, Beliebers & One Directioners: Are you the ultimate fan? Tag your fandom pics #YTFan and you could appear on  
Thanks for the Tweet! 
Infidelity, threatening emails and a shirtless FBI agent: Understand the David Petraeus scandal in 5 clicks.  
Jon Bon Jovi's teen daughter arrested on drug charges after possible heroin overdose  
First Channing, now this photo of Taylor Lautner with a military dog. My brain...it explodes from hotness overload.  
Oz: The Great and Powerful trailer is released  
Hope Solo's fiancé Jerramy Stevens arrested for domestic assault  
Channing Tatum talks about his first kiss—and does a killer Matthew McConaughey impression. Watch it:  #SexiestManAlive 
PHOTOS: Get a sneak peek at Channing, Blake Shelton, Chris Hemsworth & more who made the annual #SexiestManAlive issue  
"My first thought was, 'Y'all are messing with me.'" — on being named this year's #SexiestManAlive  
Congrats to Channing Tatum, this year's #SexiestManAlive! Send your congrats to  
Is it getting hot in here, or is it just that the reveal of the 2012 #SexiestManAlive is minutes away? 
SPOILER: The Voice sends two contestants home. Were they the right ones?  
Two more couples go home on Dancing's double-elimination night. (Spoiler).  
Wow. & just performed. Now Then it's elimination time on #TheVoice. Who's in danger? 
Sesame Street Elmo puppeteer accuser recants claim:  
VIDEO: Bradley Cooper & Jennifer Lawrence dance (so awkwardly!) in this exclusive clip from Silver Linings Playbook  
Camille Grammer's advice to fellow divorcee Adrienne Maloof: Get a man and have yourself some sex!  
VIDEO: Robert Pattinson says he tried to steal Edward's car from the Twilight set.  
Catherine Zeta-Jones talks about her bipolar disorder, says she wants to remove the stigma from the diagnosis.  
Thanks to Jack's Mannequin for all the great songs, and we can't wait to hear what Andrew McMahon does next! 
James Van Der Beek is on a mission to be the #SexiestManAlive—get a preview of Don't Trust the B-- in Apt. 23 here:  
Brad & Angelina's kids write letters to Santa  
PHOTO: Beyonce returns to the studio in style #diva  
Before tomorrow's reveal of the #SexiestManAlive, share this w/ a sexy (and alive) man you know!  
Nicole Kidman talks about her divorce from Tom Cruise, calls it a "shock to my system"  
Who bought One Direction's Take Me Home today? What's your favorite song?  
Together again! Robert Pattinson & Kristen Stewart pose together at the premiere of Breaking Dawn - Part 2:  
Think Melissa Rycroft and Tony Dovolani have what it takes to win #DWTS? 
What did you think of Shawn Johnson's controversial samba with Mark Ballas & Derek Hough? Do you agree with Carrie Ann or Len? #DWTS 
Did former metalhead nail Amy Winehouse's "Back to Black" on #TheVoice? 
Was "Simply the Best" singing Tina Turner's hit on #TheVoice? 
We are seeing some big scores on #DWTS tonight! Whose performance is the best so far? 
Who had the best performance so far on #TheVoice, or 
#woty awards are off to a great start! and are playing a round of celebrity.  
Apolo Ohno says he wishes he had time to go on a date. RT if you would adjust your schedule for him!  
PHOTO: Jennifer Lawrence poses with Jeremy Renner, continues to be awesome.  
Anne Hathaway talks about the extreme way she lost weight for her role as impoverished Fantine in Les Miserables  
Look out, Christian Grey! You've got some competition from these guys, who are 50 shades of sexy. Click to watch:  
Carrie Underwood donates proceeds from Atlantic City show to Sandy relief.  
PEOPLE invites you to help us announce this year's Sexiest Man Alive! Find out how to join us! #SexiestManAlive  
Sesame Street's Elmo puppeteer takes leave from show amid allegations of sexual abuse  
Bad Monday? Here are gifs of Zac, Hugh, Matt Bomer & more splashing about while shirtless. Feel better?  
PHOTO: A smiling Selena Gomez is snapped in good spirits while shopping on Sunday  
Stubble is sexy! Tag a scruffy pic of your guy #YTScruff & he could appear on   
Justin Bieber sings "Cry Me a River" while ex Selena Gomez steps out with a friend:  
Ashley Greene says she doesn't want Rob + Kristen drama to "taint" Twilight:  
- thanks for letting us know. Please email feedback@peoplemag.com so that the right eyes see it! 
- thanks for letting us know. Please email feedback@peoplemag.com so that the right eyes see it! 
Married couple, ages 101 and 103, finally take wedding photos - 88 years after their ceremony:  #howcute 
Tebow! Ronaldo! Ryan Lochte! Count down to the reveal of the #SexiestManAlive with our photos of hot athletes!  
PHOTO: Justin Timberlake and Jessica Biel headed out to Queens Saturday to assist Superstorm Sandy victims:  
THANK YOU to our vets. We appreciate your service, today and every day. #VeteransDay 
Were you surprised by Justin and Selena's split?  
PEOPLE invites you to help us announce this year's Sexiest Man Alive! Find out how to join us! #SexiestManAlive  
PHOTO SPECIAL: How stars are helping with Sandy relief  
Congrats to tennis player James Blake, who was married Friday! Click for a wedding photo:  
Celebrating the new tagheuer watches with Cameron Diaz & Leonardo DiCaprio #stars #watches #holyhotness  
PHOTO: Matthew McConaughey at "absolute lowest weight" as filming begins:  
PHOTO SPECIAL: See how Taylor, K.Stew, Rob and more have changed since Twilight premiered in 2008  
Jessica Biel steps out in N.Y.C. post-honeymoon:  
Count down to the reveal of the #SexiestManAlive with all things sexy—like these pics of hot men with their dogs.  
Demi Moore turns 50 this weekend - see how she's celebrating:  
PHOTO SPECIAL: Britney & Demi share their personal pics from backstage at X Factor and more  
Halle Berry will not be allowed to move her daughter to France, a judge rules:  
Selena Gomez has broken up with Justin Bieber, PEOPLE confirms:  
Admitting to an affair, the director of the C.I.A. has resigned:  
Teenage "Modern Family" star Ariel Winter is doing well despite her family drama, her lawyer tells PEOPLE  
People reporter patrickgomezla & One Direction's Niall Horan hangin in X Factor VIP tent last night #laterg  
Is the sexiest 'van' alive?  #SMA #donttrusttheB 
More fab Rumer Willis bikini pics have us in 32-degree weather very jealous!  
Help us welcome new blogger Christina Applegate!  
PHOTO SPECIAL: From Alabama to Wyoming, meet sexy men (Ian! NPH! Kellan!) from every state  #SexiestManAlive 
Find out what they named her! RT LeAnn Rimes rescues puppy abandoned in traffic  
PEOPLE invites you to help us announce this year's Sexiest Man Alive! Find out how to join us! #SexiestManAlive  
Are you nervous watching the #playoffs results on #TheVoice? Who are you rooting for? 
Heidi Klum talks about her romance with her bodyguard  
Click to read an excerpt from this week's PEOPLE about the heroes of Superstorm Sandy.  
We're counting down to the reveal of this year's #SexiestManAlive by celebrating all things SEXY! Check it out:  
Gabrielle Giffords's shooter gets life in prison  
Adrienne Maloof and Paul Nassif finally reach a divorce settlement.
  
Cyndi Lauper reveals that her uncle died in Superstorm Sandy  
Do you have a cute nursery? Tag your pics #YTnurserydecor and they could appear on   
Miley Cyrus talks about her wedding—and what she's most excited about during the big day  
Diem Brown shares her latest video in which she goes bald from chemotherapy. Stay strong, Diem!  
Oh snap! Simon and Demi trade insults on The X Factor.  
The Voice coaches give mixed reviews on Christina & Cee Lo's singers  
Michelle Duggar talks about getting her first new hair style in 40 years!  
The #XFactor group formerly known as LYLAS and then as 1432 has a new name: Fifth Harmony. What do you think? 
Were you hoping to see a softer side of on tonight? 
Rappers get the prize for most unusual song choice on #XFactor tonight! Did you like it? 
Mixed reactions for Do you think he owned his song? #Playoffs #TheVoice 
Someone may have to separate and on #XFactor. Whose side are you on? 
Do you agree with the coaches' feedback for on #TheVoice? #Playoffs 
Wow! The #XFactor kicks off with a surprise tonight. Thoughts? 
EXCLUSIVE: Ariel Winter's mom denies allegations she abused the Modern Family star.  
Faith Hill gives an exclusive peek at the video for "American Heart"  
Click here for your exclusive sneak peek of newest video:  
What does a professional bull rider's wedding look like? Click to see pics of Luke Snyder's wedding and find out!  
Demi Lovato says she expected Britney Spears to be a total "diva" on The X Factor. Instead, Spears is "really quirky."  
That's an excellent point! 
Lady Gaga, Ben Stiller and more donate to Sandy relief efforts  
Taylor Lautner talks to about breakups, cheating, and rekindling romances  
The Obama campaign: Then (2008) and now. What's changed—apart from his now-gray hair?  
SPONSORED TWEET: Tonight! VOTE for your favorite on #xfactor! Watch on FOX at 8/7c LIVE!  
Was Diane Sawyer drunk on TV last night? Twitter certainly thought so:  #hiccup 
Kristen Stewart addresses her relationship with Robert Pattinson  
In this week's PEOPLE: Honoring Sandy Heroes, Stories of Survival  
Four more years -- President Obama wins re-election.  
Congrats! You're the featured photo star of our #YTscarydecor challenge. View the gallery here:  
Congrats, you're the featured star of our #YTcountrystars challenge. You & your friends can view it here:  
Isla Fisher's stay-fit secret? Spanx!  
Meet the new Gerber baby!  
Chaz Bono is on a mission to lose 50 lbs. Have any weight-loss tips for him?  
Justin and Jessica pull off a super-secret honeymoon.  
This is adorable! RT Where do you read your On the kitchen floor! #peoplemag  
PHOTO: ScarJo recreates Psycho's iconic shower scene  
Election night cocktails! Vote and toast the new president with these recipes:   
PHOTO: Robert Pattinson greets fans outside Jimmy Kimmel Live  
Amanda Brown & more deliver killer performances on The Voice  
We want to see your photos from Election Day! Tag your pics #YTIVoted and they could appear on   
Sad news: Brooke Shields's mother, Teri, died after a long illness.  
How did Katie Holmes fare at her Broadway opening?  
The coaches said Michaela had her best performance so far on #TheVoice. Do you agree? 
Does Mark Ballas or Derek Hough make a better partner for Shawn Johnson? #DWTS 
What do you make of the chemistry between Kelly Monaco & Val Chmerkovskiy? #DWTS 
What did you think of performance on #TheVoice? 
And for fans of ... it's the first #playoffs of the night! Who's your favorite singer? 
The stars & pros of #DWTS are about to perform fusion dances. Which couple are you rooting for? 
Okay, who hasn't been able to get last night's The Walking Dead out of their minds? 
Sharon Osbourne swears off plastic surgery after double mastectomy.  
PHOTOS: First Bachelorette Trista Sutter celebrates her birthday with her family  
UPDATE: Sam Worthington's mugshot released.  
Avatar star Sam Worthington arrested in Atlanta  
Julie Bowen picks Stephen Colbert for #SexiestManAlive. Who is your pick?  
PEOPLE invites you to help us announce this year's Sexiest Man Alive! Find out how to join us! #SexiestManAlive  
The Queen's designer talks about what it's like to dress the royal. (We assume there are a lot of tea breaks.)
  
Thanks for sharing our story! 
You can now be a couch potato with Brad Pitt! He's launching a furniture line.  
VIDEO: Watch Joseph Gordon-Levitt morph from teen star to heartthrob.  
Lisa "Left Eye" Lopes may tour with TLC as a hologram. What do you guys think? Reply w/ #Awesome or #exploitative  
Apolo Ohno blogs for  about his #DWTS chances, says he's confident they can make it into the finals  
Sharon Osbourne on the "no brainer" decision to undergo a double mastectomy:  
PHOTO: Beyonce & Jay-Z cheer on the Brooklyn Nets at their first home game!  
Oh baby! Gisele Bündchen shows off her baby bump in a bikini.  
Maxim model murder update: Killer was a 'female James Bond,' DA says:  
Bare faced and beautiful! New mom takes off makeup and poses with baby Lorenzo.  
PHOTO: Kristen Stewart shows some serious skin on the red carpet!  
PHOTO SPECIAL: I met a country star! See reader pics with Carrie, Rascal Flatts and more  
Congratulations to Olympic gold medalist Carly Patterson! She got married in Dallas last night:  
Nanny accused of killing two kids she cared for was charged with first-degree murder on Saturday:  
J.R. Martinez says his baby gives him balance:  (via 
Looking for something to make for dinner tonight? Try Stanley Tucci's grandma's famous steak oreganato!  
Congratulations! BMX icon TJ Lavin gets married to his longtime girlfriend:  
Very cute video of a very vocal sea lion who would like his lunch now. Now. NOW! (via  
PHOTO: Drew Barrymore smiles courtside at the L.A. Lakers game with her husband:  
PHOTO SPECIAL: Carrie Underwood, Taylor Swift, and more of country music's biggest stars show off their pets  
Jennie Garth says she likes guys who are "not nice."  
Carrie Ann Inaba talks about her wishes to have a baby.
  
How Snooki is pitching in to help after Sandy. Plus, see how you can help recovery efforts.
  
Five things to know about #CMAawards best new artist winner Hunter Hayes  
NYC marathon: How some runners plan to help instead of participating in the now-controversial event  
How Blake & Miranda will celebrate their big CMA wins.  
Bye, bye, crispy curls! Michelle Duggar gets a major hair makeover. (via  
Carrie Underwood wears 12 dresses at the CMAs. Which look was your favorite? (via  
Jimmy Fallon says Jessica Biel "looked like a princess" at her wedding to Justin Timberlake  
PHOTOS: Taylor Swift, Carrie Underwood, Miranda Lambert & more wow on the CMA Awards red carpet  
Who gave the best performance at the CMA Awards?  
All the best (dresses, quotes, moments and more) from tonight's #CMAawards  
What stars (and readers!) said about the CMA Awards!
  
"I'm still Willied out here. I didn't even go to change." —Blake Shelton, on his surprise on winning entertainer of the year at #CMAawards 
Blaaaaaaaaaaake! #CMAawards 
Okay guys...who do you think will win entertainer of the year at the #CMAawards? 
We're loving the tribute to Willie Nelson at the #CMAawards! 
Who's going motorboatin' tonight? Little Big Town after their big #cma win.  
There's gonna be one heck of a party at Blake and Miranda's house tonight. #CMAawards 
"I've had a few drinks since the song of the year announcement." Blake Shelton, getting boozy onstage. #CMAawards 
Officially obsessed with Kelly Clarkson's shoes at the #CMAAwards. 
Tell us what you think of the show so far! Reply #CMA and your Tweet could appear on  
As we Tweet from New York, thanks for this, Brad Paisley. #CMAawards 
There should be smoke coming out of that guitar. #KeithUrban #CMAAwards 
From her front-row seat, Taylor just sent out a hand heart to Faith after Faith's performance. #CMAAwards 
All hail the Chief!! Eric Church hangs out in the press room after winning the #CMA for album of the year fo  
Acceptance speech of the night: Blake and Miranda for song of the year #CMA  
I feel sorry for whomever has to wipe the chalk off Hunter Hayes's piano. #CMAawards 
You're very welcome! 
Too soon or just too funny? & Poke Fun at Taylor Swift's breakup at #CMAs  
The #CMA word of the night? "Ppppbbbblllllttttttbbbbtttttt." That's the sound of motorboatin'! 
Taylor's performance set just makes me think of the SNL skit, "Le Jeunes de Paris" #CMA 
“I just needed the right person to write this song with, and the right person to sing it.”
- Blake Shelton, to wife Miranda Lambert #CMA 
Nooo! The camera pulled away just as Blake and Miranda were about to kiss at the #CMA Awards! #RUDE 
Miranda & Blake win song of the year at the #CMA Awards for "Over You." Aww.... 
Kellie Pickler is glowing with her short hair! <3 her #CMA 
Carrie's left leg is throwing Angie's right leg major shade right now. It's a leg-off! #CMAawards 
Who do you think had the best performance so far at the #CMAawards? 
Miranda Lambert's performance of Fastest Girl in Town makes us understand why Blake Shelton is always in a good mood. She looked HOT! #CMA 
All the #CMA winners as they happen - see how readers' choices sync up with who takes home top prize  
Anyone else think Shawna Thompson from Thompson Square looks a little like Katy Perry? #CMA 
Loving the coordinated purple ensembles on Brad Paisley and Carrie Underwood. Right down to the rubber gloves. #CMA 
"I could say having a house full of 4-year-olds prepared me."- Keith Urban, on working with Nicki Minaj & Mariah Carey on #CMA red carpet 
"It's too bad Dolly isn't here tonight." — Brad Paisley, after admitting he only just recently learned what "motorboating" is. #CMA 
"Way to peak at 12 kid. Good luck at prom." — Brad Paisley on the 12-year-old Carrie Underwood kissed on stage. #CMA 
Jason Aldean, Luke Bryan and Eric Church should start a boy band. Which one's the Justin? #CMA 
Starting now: #MTVtwilight Breaking Dawn 2 talk with Rob, Kristen and Taylor streaming live  
Love seeing all the former Idols on the carpet. Go Kellie! Go Scotty! #CMA 
Five more minutes to the #CMA Awards! Who's excited? 
Juliette Barnes, er – Hayden Panettiere stopped by to chat with PEOPLE at the #CMA red carpet!  
Jennifer Nettles Shows Off Baby Bump, Talks Being a Halloween Pumpkin or ... Snooki #CMAredcarpet  
Blake looks dapper, and Miranda looks goddess-like on the #CMA red carpet. 
Which stars are you excited to see tonight at the #CMA Awards? 
Big development in Britney Spears trial -- judge throws out Sam Lutfi's entire lawsuit.  
Lady Antebellum hits the #CMA red carpet!  
PEOPLE predicts tonight's #CMA winners -- who are you cheering for?  
The #CMA red carpet is starting!  
PHOTO SPECIAL: Selena Gomez as a cat! Katy Perry as Daria! Check out star Halloween costumes  
PEOPLE's music critic gives his picks for the #CMAs tonight.  
we <3 birthday girl 
Tim Tebow spotted getting cozy with Camilla Belle  
NYPD officer Artur Kasprzak saved seven people (including an infant) from Sandy before drowning 
  
Watch this video of a baby chick cuddling with a cat. Because sometimes, you just need something cute (via  
PHOTO: Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson wear masks (and hold hands!) for a Halloween party  
She's 40 and fabulous! Happy birthday, Jenny McCarthy!  
River Phoenix's final movie is finished—19 years after his death  
In her latest blog, writes about dealing with trolls, her experience with Hurricane Sandy and more  
Jimmy Kimmel interviews his idol—David Letterman  
X Factor goes live—and readers react to the show. The act to beat? Emblem3  
Which American President is (distantly) related to George Clooney?  
Which act of #XFactor's first live show was your favorite? 
Team Demi or Team Simon in the great Willie Jones (@ThatKiddWill) debate? #XFactor 
What did you think of #Xfactor 
It's the first LIVE #XFactor show! How's coach/mentor/superstar/cutiepie doing? 
How are and doing as hosts of #XFactor's first live show? 
The #XFactor is underway and it's the first LIVE show! Which judge will own the competition? 
EXCLUSIVE: Evan Rachel Wood and Jamie Bell get married!  
Country icon George Strait gives a rare interview to PEOPLE Country about his life, career and final tour  
That's beautiful. Thank you for sharing. And love your hashtag. #Jerseystrong 
We want to see how you're doing. Share pics of your Sandy recovery effort (tag #YTAfterSandy) & they could appear on  
Sabrina Bryan talks about her elimination from #DWTS, calls it a "stinger"  
Yahoo CEO Marissa Mayer introduces her adorable (costumed) son on Twitter  
Newark mayor Cory Booker is helping Sandy victims —thanks to Twitter  
Too cute! Pink shares her early childhood #Halloween costumes.  
Jada Pinkett Smith talks about her parenting style, says she establishes a "partnership" with her kids  
Taylor Swift talks about her relationship deal-breaker: cheating.  
Halloween pop quiz: Who hunted Jessica Biel? What terrified a young Mila? See stars' horror movie pasts!  
Bottoms up! Tootsie Roll shooters & candy apple punch recipes from Nadia G for #Halloween! #its5oclo  
Baby got back! Ellen Degeneres "cracks up" in costume as Sofia Vergara for Halloween  
Sunrise over a dark lower Manhattan.  
Brad Pitt donates $100k to fight for marriage equality  
Inside this week's PEOPLE: How and make their marriage work  
Dancing with the Stars: Big Surprise Elimination (Spoiler).  
Singers and are making it hard to choose this #Knockout on Who are you rooting for? 
What a way to start the night! Who did you love more? vs. #TheVoice #Knockouts 
Octomom Nadya Suleman enters rehab -- nannies to watch the 14 children.  
Stars track #Sandy: See photos from Alec Baldwin, Snooki, Jimmy Fallon and more stars who weathered the storm  
Wow! hard work has paid off - check out her weight loss:  
He's back ... Paparazzo Adnan Ghalib testifies about his romance with Britney Spears.  
#Sandy heroes! Nurses rescued newborns when the hurricane hit NYC and their hospital lost power  
How Angelina and her kids are getting ready for Halloween:  
What do you think of Justin & Jessica's bands of gold?  
As everyone surveys the damage this morning, see reactions to #Sandy and photos and find out how to help:  
Two #DWTS couples received perfect 30s on country night:  
SNEAK PEEK: Adrienne Maloof gets snubbed by Lisa Vanderpump on "Real Housewives of Beverly Hills" premiere!  
got time to kill before #halloween? check out top 10 horror flicks  and sleep with the lights on! 
.@Flip_flop_mom good luck to you and thanks for all the work you do with FEMA! 
Cute pics: Stars in their Halloween costumes!  
Want a fun pic? Check out Emma Roberts dressed up as Aunt Julia in Pretty Woman for Halloween.  
stay safe!! 
Need non-Sandy news? Check out this freaky pic of Gollum (yes, that Gollum) greeting visitors in New Zealand airport  
Rip into some BQ Corn Nuts and shake, shake, shake Señora, for Winona Ryder's 41st birthday!  
Thinking of everyone in #sandy's path and the first responders working today and tomorrow. How is the weather in your hometown? 
aww! So cute! We're hoping to give people something fun to look at while waiting for Sandy to pass. 
PHOTO: Just look at this cute pic of Lauren Conrad's new adopted puppy. (Via  
Demi Lovato talks about the "blessing and curse" of being famous.  
How are celebrities reacting to 'Frankenstorm'?  
Because tomorrow's Monday: Check out these cuuuute photos of pets in Halloween costumes.  
Animals dressed as other animals - so much win. #Halloween.   
How adorable is this #Halloween costume for a tyke? "We added some balloons and cheap black plastic  
Butterscotch Schnapps and candy corn make for a fun, sweet #Halloween treat!   
We know, Monday is tomorrow and that's very depressing. But you know what's not depressing? This pho  
There's no place like the doghouse! How cute is this pug dressed as Dorothy for #Halloween?   
What does Adam Levine REALLY think of Christina Aguilera?  
You going Gangnam Style this year? Show off your amazing Halloween costumes and be featured on   
How is Jessica Simpson coping with her parents' divorce?  
PHOTOS: See how Pink, Miley,Jessica Alba and more are decking their halls with GHOULS of holly for #halloween!  
Lynne Spears recounts her worries about daughter Britney at #BritneyTrial. Full story coming on   
More disturbing details from NY cops -- the nanny stabbed herself in front of mom.  
Justin Bieber does NOT have cancer, so please don't shave your heads, girls. #baldforbieber 
Dramatic turn in Britney Spears trial -- mom Lynne is now taking the
stand. #BritneyTrial. PEOPLE's coverage:  
1,000-lb. pig rescues a cat after fire. That'll do, pig. That'll do.  
Justin Timberlake responds to "distasteful" wedding video criticism  
PHOTO: Jada Pinkett Smith hosts fundraiser with Michelle Obama  
Usher bids $12k for a puppy at a charity auction  
Justin Bieber talks about how he makes his relationship with Selena Gomez work  
Pippa Middleton hosts kids' Halloween party for her book  
Why Robert Pattinson & Kristen Stewart Still Have 'Trust Issues'  
UPDATED: Mom comes home to find son, 2, and daughter, 6, fatally stabbed; nanny arrested.  
Meet the Missus -- Jessica Biel will now be Jessica Timberlake.  
Stephen Fishbach blogs for PEOPLE about why Jeff Kent is a Survivor MVP  
Chris Kirkpatrick proposed in Italy. (And no, he was not at Justin's Italian wedding.)  
What kind of house can you buy after creating Glee & American Horror Story? Check out Ryan Murphy's pad:  
Suspect confesses to murder of Jessica Ridgeway  
PHOTO: Olivia Wilde & Jason Sudeikis pucker up in Rome  
SPONSORED TWEET: How Brave is Your Love? Watch new hit show #BATB on The  
Baby, you're a firework! Happy birthday, Katy Perry!  
Britney Spears trial update: Sam Lutfi says he was suicidal over death threats from Britney fans  
Autumn Pasquale update: The suspect reached out to her via Facebook  
only on  blog this week is all about her awful chemo hangovers  #su2c 
Jessica Biel reveals how she chose her 'whimsical' wedding dress  
Available everywhere Friday! 
Just in time for #NashvilleABC, check out Juliette (a.k.a. video for "Telescope"  
Mom turns in her teen sons to police for the murder of a New Jersey girl  
Michelle Williams & Jason Segel are living together in what is probably the most fun apartment in Brooklyn ever.  
Teen arrested in the murder of 10-yr-old Colorado girl Jessica Ridgeway  
PHOTO: Kristen Stewart makes a glam turn while promoting Breaking Dawn - Part 2 in Tokyo.  
Joe and Tina Simpson split comes amid gay rumors  
PHOTO: Russell Crowe is somewhere underneath this beard.  
Barack Obama gets photobombed...by a little boy!  
Joe and Tina Simpson (Jessica and Ashlee's parents) are divorcing.  
What's Madonna like as a mom? Strict, according to son Rocco.  
Justin serenaded Jessica as she walked down the aisle. Are you swooning yet?  
Check out a pretty in pink bride making her groom jump for joy! #weddingexclusive  
As long as we're talking about #SexiestManAlive, we nominate Who's with us? #AndersonLiveBlogger 
You heard it here first: is pregnant! #AndersonLive 
.@lisaling: 'Is anyone else over Donald Trump?' #AndersonLive 
.@lisaling and reunited on #AndersonLive! Did you have Channel 1 at your school in the '90s? 
Good morning! We're in the audience at #AndersonLive today. Who's going to be watching? 
What is Kate's new royal passion?  
Finally! & Jessica Biel's 'fantasy' wedding photos  
Whose final performance will be #Titanium? #Battles #TheVoice 
It's the rocker vs. the country crooner in this explosive #Battle! #TheVoice 
Let the final #Battles begin, with vs on 
Twelve hours until Justin and Jessica's wedding photo posts on PEOPLE! RT if you're excited. 
Celebrating the opening of Top Chef Kitchen w/ and padmalakshmi #nomnom  
It's over for Eva Longoria and Mark Sanchez:  
Zac Brown Band's Pudding Is Sweetened by Jack Daniels Honey. Get the recipe!  
LeAnn Rimes Feels Like She's 'Starting Over' After Treatment:  
More Jolie-Pitt kids join mom Angelina Jolie in Maleficent:  
Would love to include your photo in #CITA! What was he like? 
Reigning Sexiest Man Alive Bradley Cooper nominates his pick for 2012. Who gets your vote?  #SMA 
SPONSORED TWEET: Big laughs start at 8/7c on FOX 2night #RaisingHope #BenAndKate #NewGirl #TheMindyProject #FOXTuesdays  
Ryan Reynolds turns 36 today! we see 6 reasons he's abs-olutely fantastic; help us come up with 30 more  
Yes - dozens of photos in the issue out Friday but just a sneak peek tomorrow a.m. #hatewaiting 
Missed last night's presidential debate? See what got the Twittersphere buzzing:  #horsesandbayonets 
we are excited too!! #countdown RT The next 24 hours need to hurry up. I am way too excited to see the wedding pics in 
happy to help! RT you make my stuffy subway ride to work so much less frustrating #guiltypleasure 
In case you haven't heard of Stella Boonshoft yet #bodylove  
What did Tony Dovolani think when Melissa Rycroft injured herself?  
Spoiler! Here's what went down in the ballroom tonight on #DWTS:  
What did you think of the team freestyle on #DWTS? And which of the pairs did you like best? 
"Ain't no mountain high enough" to keep & away from #TeamAdam! Who's your favorite? 
Did and find the confidence to rock out onstage? Who's watching #TheVoice! #Battles? 
Prince Guillaume of Luxembourg gets married! Check out the royal fashion -- including plenty of hats  
Melissa Rycroft update - disc herniation means she may not perform on #DWTS tonight, her rep tells PEOPLE:  
Watching the Presidential Debate? Shake Up These Recipes Tonight! #diy #debates #election  
PHOTO: Jennifer Lopez steps out looking abs-tastic:  
A new week, a new #Bachelor breakup - Blakeley and Tony end their engagement:  
Kelly Preston turns 50 but says she feels like she's 25:  
Here's blog:  RT Will you be tweeting out a link to Apolo's blog ahead of tonight's #DWTS?! 
Wednesday!! check  at 8am 
Loving all ur pics! thanks Tag #YTCountryStars & u could be on  
PHOTO: Anne Hathaway and her hubby return from their honeymoon:  
Adrienne Maloof says her divorce is "very difficult" and that she's "not made out of stone."  
Ashton & Mila enjoy his-and-hers foot rubs:  
Met Carrie? Posed w/ Brad? Tweet/Instagram pics w/ your fave country star, tagged #YTCountryStars & u could appear on  
How does Justin TImberlake describe his wedding to Jessica Biel?  
Get well! Melissa Rycroft falls in #DWTS rehearsals and is rushed to the hospital with a head injury:  
Birthday girl Kim Kardashian changed her dress mid-meal in Rome:  
Congrats to Adele! The British singing sensation is now Mum to a baby boy:  
Ha! Brad Pitt's Chanel ad gets the SNL treatment:  
Valerie Bertinelli talks about how she used to use food as a crutch:  
Did you dress up as a star for Halloween last year? We want a pic! Send it in & you could be on   
Is 'Paranormal Activity 4' the scariest one yet?  
What's got (a very young) Mila Kunis so freaked out? Find out in our Halloween horror movie quiz!  
Attorneys in Britney Spears trial describe "battle for life and death" of pop star:  
Happy Saturday! Here are five things to know about U.K. pop stars The Saturdays:  
Did you dress up as a star for Halloween last year? We want a pic! Send it in & you could be on   
"It's great to be married, the ceremony was beautiful." — Justin Timberlake & Jessica Biel to PEOPLE  
Congrats to Elisa Donovan (@RedDonovan) - she's tied the knot! Photos and details here:  
PEOPLE Exclusive: Justin Timberlake and Jessica Biel are married!  
Dennis Quaid and his wife split up again  
Mob Wives star Renee Graziano enters rehab  
Celebrity wedding planner David Tutera talks about Justin & Jessica's nuptials  
Tom Hanks drops an F bomb on Good Morning America. What would Wilson say? (Probably nothing. Because he's a ball)  
Before picking The Gown, Jessica Biel test-drove white dresses from big-name designers. Pics:  (via 
Britney Spears trial: Sam Lutfi claims the singer was on meth in 2007  
Here comes the bride! #Justin Timberlake & Jessica Biel prep for wedding  
Jerry Sandusky's "Victim No.1" talks to PEOPLE about his decision to speak out  
Happy 25th birthday, Zac Efron! We hope it's abs-olutely pec-tacular. Like you!  
Billy Ray Cyrus says he approves of daughter Miley's fiance Liam Hemsworth  
Did you redneckognize this model with a mullet?  
VIDEO: Fergie opens up to Oprah about the tough times in her marriage  
Honey Boo Boo's home is going to get renovated—courtesy Rosie O'Donnell  
Did you dress up as a celeb for Halloween last year? We want a pic! Send it in & you could be on  !  
Britney & L.A. Reid reveal their top 4 #xfactor  
Incredible story: Stranded sailor saved after jumbo jet passengers spot him while flying overhead  
How Diem Brown is bravely dealing with her chemo hair loss  
Anna Trebunskaya and Jonathan Roberts of Dancing with the Stars to Divorce.  
Exclusive: Dancing with the Stars pros Anna Trebunskaya & Jonathan Roberts are headed for divorce  
This creepy cocktail will get you through the American Horror Story Premiere - trust us, you'll need  
And now has his top 4 on #XFactor! Did he make the right decision? #LAOver25s 
Did pick the right top four on #XFactor? #britneyteens 
PHOTO: Blake Lively in a bridal gown (on the set of Gossip Girl)  
Matthew Fox talks about his DUI arrest, says he was "terribly embarrassed" by it  
Bullied teen Amanda Todd made a video before her suicide detailing her struggle  
"Sketchy" deals, binders full of women & more: What celebs (and readers) thought of last night's debate:  
Honey Boo Boo and June visit Lisa Vanderpump's Beverly Hills restaurant. And yes, they ate upscale "sketti" #TheresAGif  
PHOTO: Kristen Stewart snuggles up to Rob Pattinson outside of L.A. bar.  
The Voice: Blake has a country battle—and Christina steals a pop singer!  
Fans of rejoice! Watch the first 10 minutes of the All Stars premiere right here:  #DragRace 
What is Demi Moore's reaction to Ashton Kutcher-Mila Kunis relationship?  
Did the right person go home on #DWTS? SPOILER:  
Who's watching #TheVoice tonight? has a tough decision to make after a dynamite country performance! 
EXCLUSIVE: #Bachelorette's Emily Maynard and Jef Holm end their engagement, they confirm. Statements here:  
It's elimination night on #DWTS! Which couple deserves to go? 
Christina Aguilera talks to PEOPLE about her body, "I embrace everything about myself," she says:  
What are you more excited about? Beyonce Super Bowl or Tina & Amy Golden Globes? Reply w/ #Beyonce or #Globes cc/ #poptip 
Tina Fey & Amy Poehler as Golden Globes hosts: Best news of the day?  
Modern Family's Cam & Mitchell: Are they getting married this season? This pic makes it look like they are!  
Report: Kristen Stewart buys a house near Rob Pattinson's Los Feliz home  
PHOTO: Sandra Bullock & Chelsea Handler get nekkid for a shower scene  
Halle Berry talks about why she wants to leave America  
VIDEO: Jill Zarin confronts Andy Cohen about getting fired from Real Housewives. Oh, it's ON.  
Is Beyonce going to perform at the Super Bowl halftime show? Because that would be AWESOME.  
She's in with Grandma! Ethel Kennedy calls Taylor Swift "spectacular."  
SPONSORED TWEET: Watch #EmilyOwensMD practice medicine & work on life, tonight on The  
Kristin Chenoweth still coping with neck injury and cracked teeth after on-set accident  
PHOTO: Robert Pattinson charms the crowd at an event in Beverly Hills  
Lauren Conrad says The Hills was true. Well, mostly true.  
Matthew Fox admits to driving drunk—but says he never struck a woman  
VIDEO: Jen Aniston gets choked up talking about her engagement.  #Aww 
What are Derek's Hough's 'Sexy' Plans for Shawn Johnson?  
Spoiler Alert: Find out who earned perfect scores tonight on Dancing with the Stars. What did you think of the show?  
Tina Fey & Amy Poehler are hosting the Golden Globes! Who's excited?  
What do you think of Paula Abdul as a judge on tonight's Dancing with the Stars? #dwts 
Are you watching Dancing with the Stars tonight? Who are you rooting for? #dwts 
PHOTO: Jack Osbourne ties the knot!  
Scarlett Johansson splits from boyfriend Nate Naylor  
Kristen Stewart, Rob Pattinson photographed together for the first time since the cheating scandal  
Peta Murgatroyd sounds off on the #DWTS season—so far!—and what's really motivating her partner Gilles  
It really was SO GOOD! 
VIDEO: Take a tour of Wendy Williams's home!  
Pakistani girl shot by the Taliban is en route to a U.K. hospital for treatment.  
Drew Lachey blogs about his #DWTS double elimination  
Why does Ashley Greene find dating so difficult?  
What did you think of #TheWalkingDead premiere? 
Skydiver Felix Baumgartner takes history to new heights – literally:  
PHOTO: Cute couple (and #Glee costars) Cory Monteith and Lea Michele walk the red carpet together Saturday night:  
Russell Crowe and Danielle Spencer have reportedly split after nine years of marriage:  
Inspiring - #TrueBlood's Deborah Ann Woll's boyfriend is going blind but running marathons to raise funds first:  
Russell Swan of #Survivor talks to PEOPLE about his discouraging experience:  
Did you dress up as a celeb for Halloween last year? We want a pic! Send it in & you could be on  !  
Congrats to who tied the knot Saturday:  #CarltonDance 
VIDEO: #ParksandRec star Retta (@unfoRETTAble) breaks down the #Twilight series:  
Congrats to comedian who wed on Friday evening:  
Turned your home into a Halloween house of horrors? Show us! Tweet/Instagram your scary decoration pics to #YTscarydecor 
Actor and television host Gary Collins is dead at 74:  
Can't make the 2012 Wine & Food Festival? Try these recipes from the fest's celebrity chefs at home:  #nycwff 
PHOTO SPECIAL: ScarJo as Janet Leigh! Nicole Kidman as Princess Grace! See stars playing stars:  
Is #Bachelor's Courtney moving on ... with #Bachelorette's Arie? Seems like it:  
Calling all ghoulish gourmets: Show us the gross-out Halloween goodies you've cooked up! Tweet/Instagram spooky food pics to #YTspookyfoods 
PHOTOS: Matthew McConaughey goes from six pack to scary skinny for a role:  
Check out Ian Somerhalder in Young Americans, Julie Bowen in Party of Five and more stars' secret teen pasts!  
If you ever wanted to see Gwyneth Paltrow and Cameron Diaz rap together, here's your chance:  
Do you think #Bachelorette's Emily and Jef are still together?  
Jack Osbourne talks about how he helped save someone in Hawaii  
Hustle & Flow star Taryn Manning arrested for assault in NYC. Hey, it's hard out here for a pimp.  
Survivor's Jeff Probst shows off his really, really ridiculously good-looking home.  
Olympian (and ambassador) hanging in Soho.  
Crazy rain! Pretty pic, though! 
Kathie Lee Gifford dropps a puppy on TV. And it's not even "Winesday!"  
Neil Patrick Harris and David Burtka check out a Madonna show in L.A.  
Calling all ghoulish gourmets: Show us the gross-out Halloween goodies you've cooked up! Tweet/Instagram spooky food pics to #YTspookyfoods 
Bret Michaels, Omarosa, Gary Busey and more to duke it out on Celebrity Apprentice  
PHOTO: Heidi Klum and her bodyguard boyfriend have a wild (west) time at Disney California Adventure  
We got an early #halloween treat from #nomnom  
Aaron Paul talks about proposing to Lauren Parsekian, admits he "begged" her to marry him, is generally just awesome  
Turned your home into a Halloween house of horrors? Show us! Tweet/Instagram your scary decoration pics to #YTscarydecor 
Britney vs. L.A. Reid: Who do you think has a stronger group on #XFactor?  
Honey Boo Boo's Mama shares her "sketti" recipe.  #ew 
How do Jennie Garth and Peter Facinelli split their parenting duties?  
The competition is in full swing on #Xfactor! Is a helpful mentor? 
We would SO not want to make this decision! Who should and send packing on #Xfactor? 
is keeping it real on #Xfactor. Do you agree with her feedback? 
Matt Damon jokes that he blames his gray hair on his girls. Look out Anderson, he's gunning for your Silver Fox title!  
Hanging with in NYC - loving her new cut! #hair #tiamowry  
In case you #OneDirection fans missed it, here's our favorite quote (and .gif) of Harry Styles.  #1D 
Thanks! Was a really fun visit! 
Kitty Pryde 
We had a really fun visit with from the awesomely spooky show Ghost Adventures!  
Nelly detained after cops find drugs on his tour bus. Ride wit Me? Nah...I'll take a cab.  
Paula Abdul talks about her support of Nicole Scherzinger, who also has battled with bulimia  
Gilles Marini says he was so nervous before #DWTS, he drank a $400 bottle of wine. #LikeaBoss Hey, 
Thanks for sharing your opinion with us! 
Thanks for writing us! 
73% of people replied #Simon over #Demi! 
What did you guys think of #Nashville's premiere last night? Here's what y'all (and some country stars!) had to say:  
Who has the best advice for #XFactor wannabes? Reply w/ #Demi or #Simon  cc/ #poptip 
What do Justin Bieber, Ryan Gosling & Celine Dion have in common (aside from $$$?). They're apparently distant cousins!  
Okay #Nashville fans, what did you think of the show? Tell us what you thought and your comment could appear on  
Um, whoa! The talent was totally fierce tonight on #Xfactor. Who's going home? 
the real "Mc" of Greys Anatomy - Kevin McKidd at #boweryhotel for #macallanmasters #steamy and #dreamy  
Who's leading your #Xfactor dream team: or 
Hanging out with Jake Owen in Times Square before he hits the stage at CMT on Tour!  
And we're down to 24 on #Xfactor! Did the judges make the right choices? 
VIDEO: Meet the smokin' hot cast of #ChicagoFire - the show premieres tonight:  
Our blogger stopped by PEOPLE today to show us her eyewear line! #lisaloeb  
Mentalist star Owain Yeoman is engaged!  
Taylor Swift says she did not "kidnap" boyfriend Conor Kennedy, so don't go calling Liam Neeson just yet  
Ben Affleck says he and J.Lo are still in touch. Hopefully not to discuss Gigli 2: Electric Boogaloo.  
Jeweler Neil Lane talks about what surprised him about Miley's engagement ring (via  
PHOTO: Blake Lively shows off her wedding ring  
Celeb trainer Harley Pasternak talks about the truth behind protein powder and supplements  
SPONSORED TWEET: Aim for JUSTICE! Watch #ARROW tonight!  
Detroit Lions player and Webster star Alex Karras has died  
Police called to Dina Lohan's home after an altercation with Lindsay  #herewegoagain 
Want to flirt with Harry Styles? You're in luck. He says he's "too flirty." #OneDirection  
How is Adele prepping for baby?  
PEOPLE goes backstage with Grace Potter before her acoustic set at Joe's Pub in NYC. #music #gracepotter  
Spoiler: Double trouble on "Dancing with the Stars." Two couples go home.  
and are both such unique singers - How will the coaches on decide this #battle? 
and are a match made in heaven! Is there a #steal in someone's future on #Battles 
Would you pick up the #Telephone for or #Domo? #TheVoice #Battles 
Ras Pitt? Check out Brad Pitt in dreadlocks, then challenge him to game of hackeysack  
Sarah Palin is writing a fitness book. Will you buy it?  
People are criticizing Jen Aniston's (huge) ring. What do you think? Reply w/ #hatersgonnahate #itstoobig  cc/ #poptip 
Clearly, you have excellent taste! 
See? Told y'all. RT I do not regret clicking this link in the slightest! SO CUTE!!! 
A dose of cuteness on a Tuesday is always, always welcome! 
So, this is awesome. Pets in hats. C'mon, click it. You know you want to!  (via 
Did you dress up like a star last year? Share your Halloween costume & you could be on  Details:  
SPONSORED TWEET: Comedy rules FOX tonight starting 8/7c #RaisingHope #BenAndKate #NewGirl #TheMindyProject #FOXTuesdays  
PHOTOS: Matthew McConaughey reveals dramatic weight loss (it's for a role, so simmah down now!)  
Jerry Sandusky denied any wrongdoing at sentencing  
All you need is love. Happy birthday to John Lennon, who would have been 72 today.  
Guy Ritchie is engaged!  
Did Bristol Palin and Mark Ballas patch up their fight?  
Shawn Johnson and Derek Hough close tonight's #DWTS with a routine the judges call one of the best they've ever seen! 
Maksim Chmerkovskiy as Mick Jagger is giving us some inspiration for #Halloween! #DWTS 
The #battles are getting intense on tonight's episode of #TheVoice! Who do you think will be the first #steal? 
What are you watching tonight: #TheVoice or #DWTS? 
PHOTO: Courtney Robertson Removes Engagement Ring from Ben Flajnik -- Who Has It?  
Robert Pattinson & Kristen Stewart are back together as a couple, according to several sources.  
PHOTO: Click to see Jennifer Aniston's HUGE engagement ring:  
Congrats to and - they tied the knot Sunday:  
PHOTO: Jay-Z takes the subway to his Brooklyn show:  
After 30 years of marriage, Danny DeVito and Rhea Perlman are separating.  
This is great! What was he like? 
This is great! What was he like? 
Congrats to PEOPLE's #Teacheroftheyear winners #inspiring"  
Sahara Davenport's longtime boyfriend shares photos and memories of the Drag Race star:  
Check out Kristen Bell & Dax Shepard in Las Vegan ... er, Vegas!  
What are you watching tonight? Reply w/ #Dexter #Homeland #Both #Neither cc/ #Poptip 
on tonight's #Behindthemusic talks about 8-year-bulimia battle cc  
Amber Tamblyn and David Cross got married (and had coolest band-DJ combo ever)  
wow. does a dead-on mama june impression #honeybooboo (and she's in the house buying mood, too)  
LOL - be sure to send us pics of them this Halloween!  
hey #walkingdead fans - get your fill before the 10/14 premiere at Hollywood's #halloween  
"It is not possible to make Jessica Biel dowdy." #Hitchcock #Psycho #FirstLook You be the judge  
Two cute! Check out Mariah and Nick's personal pics of their adorable twins! (via  
Congratulations: a big standing O for now-married Broadway stars Audra McDonald & Will Swenson!  
Hey fans a look inside John Taylor's new memoir - "recovery never stops"  
Find out who picked as this week's Best Dressed Star!  
What do you think of Sofia Vergara's "poetic" Polaroids? (they sold for $220,000!)  
Jennie Garth talks about her new life during a photo shoot for her PEOPLE cover.
  
Pop Quiz: See if you can identify these matchy-matchy couples!  
Reese and family home and bonding with baby Tennessee James #lovethename  
The Price is definitely Right! TV game show adds a male model (shirtless, of course)  
PHOTO: As if - the Clueless cast reunites after 17 years in  #CluelessReunion 
Is Jack Osbourne marrying Lisa Stelly this weekend?  
Does Ben and Courtney's split surprise you? #yes or #no? 
Bachelor Ben Flajnik and Courtney Robertson have split  
I lol'd. 
Creed's Scott Stapp says T.I. saved his life  
GMA's Sam Champion is engaged!  
Bristol Palin sounds off on Julianne Moore's portrayal of her mom, says Sarah Palin is "way hotter"  
Homeland star Navid Negahban (he plays Abu Nazir) talks about how airports aren't so fun for actors who play terrorists  
Mariah vs. Nicki: More details emerge about their feud.  
Listen to Adele's new song for James Bond, Skyfall. It's pretty fierce, guys.  
Rosie O'Donnell talks about her heart attack: "I almost died"  
What drove Britney Spears to tears on 'X Factor'?  
Five things to know about #PitchPerfect star  
How Rosie O'Donnell's heart attack changed her life  
Teen idol Robby Benson opens up about his four heart surgeries:  
Dustin Diamond talks about Lark Voorhies, says he hopes she's okay  
Pink jokes that her bandmates are her future babysitters, continues to be generally awesome in all she says  
Is Nicki Minaj Idol material? Click here to vote:  
Robin Roberts update: The GMA anchor is doing well—and her blood counts are great!  
Karen Klein, the bullied school monitor, is now helping other victims.
  
The real winner of the #PresidentialDebate2012? According to Twitter, it was Big Bird!  
Nice As the World Turns reference! Poor Frannie! 
PHOTO: David Beckham ambushed by a busload of tourists while shooting an ad—in nothing but his underwear.  
Julianne Moore robbed of $127k worth of jewelry.  
More details on Anne Hathaway's (partly pink!) Valentino wedding gown:  
Who had your favorite Whitney Houston cover? #xfactor #bootcamp 
Sometimes you just need your mom. #XFactor #bootcamp 
Boot camp is underway on #XFactor - so much pressure! Who's handling it? What did you think of Jennel Garcia? 
RuPaul's Drag Race star Sahara Davenport died of heart failure, says mother  
Mariah's not letting Nicki's outburst faze her.  
Meet U.K. pop superstars The Saturdays! (Don't know them yet? You will!)  
Saved by the Bell star Lark Voorhies battling bipolar disorder, her mom says  
OMG! That is awesome! You guys were party rockin'! 
PHOTO: The Princess Bride cast reunites in honor of the film's 25th anniversary! #AsYouWish  
Did you dress up as a celeb for Halloween last year? We want a pic! Send it in & you could be on   
RUMOR PATROL: Nicole Kidman says she never spoke to Katie Holmes about her split from Tom Cruise  
Sarah Jessica Parker talks about why she won't play another Carrie Bradshaw-like character again.  
News anchor fights back after being bullied about her weight. Check out her reply here:  
Are you #TeamMariah or #TeamNicki? 
Oh snap! Nicki Minaj drops F-bomb on Mariah Carey  
What has Jennie Garth done to reboot her life?  
Spoiler! Find out who was sent home on Dancing with the Stars:  #DWTS 
Blind auditions on #TheVoice are over! Whose team is the strongest going into next week's battle rounds? 
See why Shawn Johnson says she isn't losing weight on Dancing with the Stars - yet!  
Photo: Chris Evans & Minka Kelly share quite a smooch in L.A.  
Two and a Half Men's Melanie Lynskey divorcing:  
From Queen of Mean to Queen of Lean: Lisa Lampanelli shows off 80-lb. weight loss.  
Presents from Honey Boo Boo. Yep, there's a Glitzy the pig!  
LeAnn Rimes talks about blocking out her haters—and focusing on her treatment.  
Kym Johnson blogs for PEOPLE about making Joey Fatone freak out—and how she feels about Pam going home first. #DWTS  
Idol contestant Brittany Kerr apologizes for "lapse in judgement" with Jason Aldean  
Antoine Ashley—a.k.a., RuPaul's Drag Race star Sahara Davenport—dies at age 27  
PHOTO: Liam Neeson has a very particular set of skills. And posing in some hot pink underwear is one of them.  
Sabrina Bryan scores the first 9 on Dancing with the Stars's new season  
Twilight cast (yes, ALL of them) to reunite for press junkets starting Oct. 28 in L.A.  
PHOTO: Justin Bieber returns to the stage after falling ill in Arizona. Plus: Taylor Swift, Miley & Liam and more pics!  
Haha, exactly! Whhhheat thins! 
Will you watch Seth MacFarlane host the Oscars? #giggity  
Jason Aldean apologizes after he's photographed acting "inappropriately" (his words) at a bar  
Sugar, we're going down...to the chapel! Fall Out Boy's Patrick Stump is married!  
A bullied teen who was nominated for homecoming "as a joke" turns it around with help from her community  
Arnold Schwarzenegger says he didn't realized he'd fathered a child until "the boy started looking like me"  
Why does Taylor Swift find it so easy to fall in love?  
Another weekend wedding! Stanley Tucci of "Hunger Games" walks down the aisle.  
Arnold Schwarzenegger Admits to 'Hot Affair' with Brigitte Nielsen.  
PHOTO: Anne Hathaway in her wedding gown.  
Before you settle in for a day of football, check out these cute players (yes, even cuter than Tebow!), via  
Anne Hathaway Gets Married Tonight!  
Jared Followill of Kings of Leon Is Married!
  
Sean Lowe: 5 Things to Know About the New Bachelor
  
Kristin Cavallari: We Want Another Baby -- Soon!  
PHOTOS: Check out Reese's glam, girlie—and oh-so-comfy!—maternity style.  
Tom Cruise: How He's Adjusting to Single Life in London.  
Pink hits the skies in "rock star style." Plus see pics from Gwen Stefani, Jessica Simpson and more stars here:  
Actor Johnny Lewis was called a 'threat' in a probation report before he killed a woman and plunged to his death  
Arnold Schwarzenegger admits he inflicted "tremendous pain" on Maria Shriver  
Liz and Dick costar says Lindsay Lohan is "Elizabeth Taylor reincarnated." What do you think?  
Watch the 540 lb. contestant with the "heavenly" voice on X Factor:  
All the fun details on Katie & Suri's life in New York City:  
Were you inspired by any of the contestants on #XFactor tonight? 
Kirstie Alley says scrutiny over Lady Gaga's weight is "insanity"  
Chef who allegedly killed and then cooked his wife convicted of murder.  
Amanda Bynes pleads not guilty to hit-and-run  
Happy Bday Avril!  
RUMOR PATROL: Jay-Z says wife Beyonce is not pregnant.  
Sons of Anarchy actor Johnny Lewis kills woman, then dies in a fall.  
Hey girl, here is a picture of Ryan Gosling with a dog. You're welcome.  
Sofia Vergara is sitting pretty at The Standard in N.Y.C. during a showcase of her Kmart line.  
Preview it here:  RT ‏@StacyLondonSays Thank you for the beautiful profile on me & #thetruthaboutstyle 
Have a super, GOOPer 40th birthday, Gwyneth Paltrow. We bet she's celebrating by doing yoga.  
Will you read the new J.K. Rowling book, The Casual Vacancy? Check out our review here:  
What Not to Wear's Stacy London Reveals Her Struggle with Eating Disorders:  
Finally! #ModernFamily is back! What was your favorite moment from the season premiere? 
Good point. RT The crazies make you appreciate the really good ones on #XFactor. It's a fun contrast. 
Do you like watching the wacky ones? Or would you rather just see the most talented contestants? #XFactor 
Watching #XFactor? Who's the toughest on the terrible singers? 
Kristen Stewart & Robert Pattinson are spending more -- and more -- time together!  
Jersey Shore's Jwoww is engaged!  
Pinkie Pie is best pony!! 
EXCLUSIVE: See and Carin Kingsland's wedding photo here -  
Pamela Anderson joins DWTS's "First-to-Go Club." See who else is a member of this exclusive group!  
George Strait is going on tour—one last time.  
TLC orders more episodes of Here Comes Honey Boo Boo. (She keeps coming and coming. We can't stop her! Aaaahh!)  
PHOTOS: A smiling Kristen Stewart steps out in Paris. Plus: Ryan Gosling, Pink & Willow and more in Star Tracks!  
Giuliana and Bill talk about why they chose to save their son's cord blood. (via  
Jennifer Lawrence chats up fans during a break from filming Catching Fire  
PHOTOS: Woman documents 160 lbs. weight loss—with her iPhone.  
Antonio Sabato Jr. is off the market! Sorry girls, he got married!  
"Moon River" singer Andy Williams dies at 84:  
We've got an exclusive early listen to #AmericanHeart and early #AskFaith responses!  
Inside this week's cover story: Tom Cruise's hard separation from Suri  
Rainbow Dash...or Britney Spears? The singer sports a multicolored mane! (via  
PHOTO: Miley Cyrus in lingerie...and in bed with Ashton Kutcher. (It's from Two and a Half Men, obviously)  
See Maria Menounos, Joel Madden and more stars get the zombie treatment for a good cause. #brains #mfzar  
Jesse Tyler Ferguson says he and fiance Justin Mikita will start wedding planning soon  
SPONSORED TWEET: It's THE NEW #FOXTuesdays! NEW GIRL, BEN AND KATE & THE MINDY PROJECT premiere starting at 8/7c!  
Wonder what happens after the TV cameras are off? See who cut loose at the Emmys after-party!  
Drumroll please! And the new Bachelor is...Sean Lowe!  
I thought was hysterical. Impeccable comedic timing!! 
Steal these Emmy looks! Bright lips, eyes that bring the drama and more:  
Behind the scenes at #Dwts: Maks & Kirstie, together again!  
Hahaha! If it were a horror movie, it would be called Scream. 
What show premieres did you guys watch last night? Partners? HIMYM? 
Snooki shares new photos of Lorenzo—and her body after baby  
Say Yes to the Dress star Lori Allen reveals breast cancer battle  
Real Housewives of NJ stars let the insults fly at the reunion show. What a shocker...not! Watch here:  
What had to say about her low scoring debut on #DWTS  
In case you missed #DWTS All-star premiere, a sexy recap:  
Karina and Apolo goof off backstage after the #dwts premiere.  
#Emmy winners get all the girls! plants one on #dwts host #toohotfortv  
whoa! what did you think of congratulating #Emmy winner that way after her #DWTS debut #moresexy 
anyone else expecting jabba the hut to appear? #DWTS makes a stunning updated #princessleia 
hot! says Apollo is 3,000 times sexier this season ... who do you think is bringing the sexy to #DWTS? 
In the #DWTS all-stars audience are even more celebs/former dancers: 
but sparkles are so slimming! RT "You always bring it on and bring it LARGE." - Bruno on #DWTS 
Happy #dwts premiere! The judges haven't taken their seats yet but excitement is growing inside the ballroom  
I'm so sorry to hear about your mom <3 
I'm so sorry to hear about your mom <3 
Actress Bonnie Franklin (One Day at a Time) has been diagnosed with pancreatic cancer  
PHOTO SPECIAL: Kate Hudson, Tom Hanks and more stars clown around for fun pics at TIFF  
PHOTO: That's not Rosalie with Robert Pattinson — that's a very blonde Natalie Portman in L.A.!  
EXCLUSIVE: After 18 years and a set of twins together, marries longtime love Carin  
Katie Couric talked about her own struggle during their interview. 
Katie Couric opens up about her past battle with bulimia during an interview with Demi Lovato  
PHOTO: Ashton & Mila's matchy-matchy, cuddley-wuddley weekend  
Arnold Schwarzenegger talks about the time Maria Shriver confronted him about his affair—in therapy!  
Missed the Emmys? Check out the trends that ruled the red carpet—from bright yellow dresses to wacky updos!  
Zane Knight talks about his Survivor elimination—and how he wishes he had gunned for Lisa Welchel  
Our favorite photo from the #FullHouse25Years reunion, taken by the DJ (not Tanner) who ordered up the NKOTB tunes  
TV Critic dissects what #Emmys got right & what they got wrong (does agree?)  
Breaking Bad's Aaron Paul - Which makes him more nervous: Wedding planning or Emmy winning?  
In case you forget where you are ... #hbo #emmys #winnerseverywhere  
Tasty treats at post-Emmys party.  
Inside post-Emmys bash ... stunning!  
The colorful carpet at post-Emmys bash is going to see a lot of action tonight.  
Sofia holds court after #modernfamily #emmys win #backstage  
What was your favorite moment of the night? Tweet us #emmymoment  
See the sweetest couples on the red carpet at the #Emmys:  
Emmy winner Claire Danes tells reporters that being pregnant is the big award. #emmys  
Homeland's Damian Lewis is taking questions backstage at the #Emmys.  
Here they are - #Emmys Best Dressed Stars:  
Backstage: Food tray down! Julia Louis-Dreyfus had to hold her gown up to step over chicken, rice & salad #emmyscongrats 
How long do we think Tracy Morgan will lay on the #Emmys stage like that? #passedout 
Backstage: Eric Stonestreet says he's going to go out w his best friend tonight & celebrate w "libations" #modernfamily #emmycongrats 
You voted and the result are in! TV's Sexiest Man & Woman Are ...  #Emmys 
Claire Danes literally glowing on #emmy red carpet ... several yellow dresses this year - we like  
Tracy Pollan looks super proud of #emmys How psyched are you for his return to TV?  
gorgeous couple alert: Kimberly and James Van Der Beek #Emmys  
Kerry Washington's fabulous #shoes? #Louboutin! #emmys  
thanks and the lovely for bringin the lulz at the #Peoplemag #Emmys #redcarpet booth 
#Emmys are on ABC and there is #ERedCarpet - plus check out our #Peoplemag Live blog! 
Hilarious and lovely Tina Fey talks to at the #Emmys!  
Heidi Klum stands out in a crowd at the #Emmys!  
Our blog is live! Come get behind-the-scenes #Emmy scoop, talk about the dresses and more!  
Supporting actor nominee Max Greenfield and his wife look amazing at the #Emmys!  
#HBO's Vincent Piazza is prepping for tonight's #Emmys with a fresh shave.  
Jesse Tyler Ferguson is one of the first to arrive at the #Emmys!  
Happy #Emmys! is on the red carpet and the stars will be here soon. And it is HOT!  
Join us for our Emmys live blog tonight! Get scoop from editors backstage at the show, chat about the dresses & more:  
Who is Modern Family's Eric Stonestreet taking as his #Emmys date? Hint: not Charlize Theron:  
PHOTO: See the Full House cast reunite (sans Olsen Twins) 25 years later:  
Happy #Emmys day! is taking us behind the scenes as she preps for tonight's show! First on h  
Inside Justin Timberlake's international (bachelor?) party. All the details:  
Got a question for a celeb? Tweet and we may ask your question during our Emmys Backstage Live show! 
PHOTO SPECIAL: From New Girl to 30 Rock, see which Emmy nominees aren't just faking the friendship for the cameras  
PHOTO: Meet #Community star adorable twins:  (via 
Model turned actress Brooklyn Decker says she can't sing or dance. Only fair, right?  
Join us for our Emmys live blog! Get scoop from editors backstage at the show, chat about the dresses & more:  
VIDEO: Sofia Vergara says she's bringing 18 people to the Emmy Awards  
Got a question for a celeb? Tweet and we may ask your question during our Emmys Backstage Live show! 
They said what? Get the best quotes of the week from Justin Timberlake, Jessica Simpson, Lindsay Lohan and other stars  
What did new mom Kristin Cavallari receive as a push present?  
Amanda Bynes charged with driving with a suspended license  
Real Housewives star Adrienne Maloof and her ex Paul Nassif trade barbs in divorce drama
  
Tom Cruise "misses Suri very much"  
Singer (yes, he's a cutie!) visited People today  
<3 
New Girl's Max Greenfield (@iamgreenfield) "thought the Internet was lying" about his #Emmy nomination:  
"I'm an incredible uncle!"—Jake Gyllenhaal talks about his nieces (sister Maggie's kids)  
PHOTO: Katy Perry climbs a volcano  
Meet the new Real Housewives of Beverly Hills!  
Robin Roberts is energized after bone marrow transplant—and ready to go home!  #fighter 
Stop what you're doing and watch this hilarious interview. You'll be glad you did.  #lovehim 
We're hearing your comments on the Liz & Dick trailer—but make sure you click on the poll to vote! 
Your comment :) 
OMG, that's hilarious! 
Kanye West gives Kim Kardashian a cat to keep her company. It's named Mercy. After what it needs.  
Liz & Dick trailer is released. Do you think Lindsay is convincing as Dame Elizabeth?  
Model beloved dog dies on airline flight:  (via 
UPDATE: Fiona Apple's mugshot released  
We found him! #waldo  
Fashion flashback! Check out the most memorable looks from past Emmys:  
PHOTO: Patrick Carney of ties the knot:  
Kerry Washington talks about her new show, Scandal—and why she'll never run for office  
Facts of Life and Survivor star Lisa Welchel is divorced. Cue the song: You take the good, you take the bad...  
Who do you think is TV's sexiest man and woman? Sound off in our poll—the winners will be revealed on Emmy night!  
Reality star Adrienne Maloof gets custody of her children following abuse allegations against her husband  
Fiona Apple was reportedly arrested Wednesday  
Demi Lovato is the ambassador of a new anti-bullying campaign:  
Cute! shares new pictures of daughter Maxwell:  
Watch Britney Spears Sings 'Happy Birthday' to L.A. Reid  
Robin Roberts's bone-marrow transplant day is here  
Amanda Bynes tells PEOPLE: "I'm Doing Amazing"  
PHOTO: Mila & Ashton share a passionate kiss in Central Park. And yes, it does look a bit like he is texting.  
"A normal-looking guy got her. Maybe I'll get me a Kristen Bell" -Dax Shephard on why men should be glad for them  
Check out Lindsay Lohan dripping in diamonds on the Liz & Dick poster. What do you think? Does she channel Liz well?  
Watching #Survivor tonight? Check out  blogger take on the new cast:  
Modern Family star Jesse Tyler Ferguson is engaged! Watch his video announcement.  
<3 
"Jay knows what my life is like. We both have daughters & our wives are more popular than we are." - Obama, about Jay-Z  
Chad 'Ochocinco' Johnson & Evelyn Lozada are officially divorced.  
Expectant mom Drew Barrymore says she can't wait to have kids  
Think you know your TV Girls? See if you can spot the plot belonging to New Girl, Girls—or Golden Girls!  
Lindsay Lohan arrested for leaving scene of accident in New York City:  
Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson reunite! Will they be a couple again?  
What does the Queen think of Kate's photo scandal?  
Parker Posey Video Spoof – How to Give an Emmy Speech.  
Kate greets a friendly warrior in Marau, Solomon Islands Sept 17.  
Shaun White apologizes for his "poor behavior" after arrest:  
Jennifer Aniston is expecting triplets ... in a funny new commercial  
Barbara Walters talks about her ABC/PEOPLE special Best in TV: The Greatest TV Shows of Our Time (tonight 9pm ET)  
PHOTO: Amanda Bynes goes shopping -- then takes a cab home:  
William and Kate walk into Heritage Hotel to be given a portrait. William says, "We'll give it to Harry for  
Usher & Shakira will be joining The Voice for season 4. Will you be watching?  
Congrats! Annie Lennox gets married:  
Check out this GIF: Kate Goes Dancing in Traditional Polynesian Grass Skirt:  
Kate & Will Claim Legal Victory in Topless Photos Case  
Mariah Carey on her rumored feud with Nicki Minaj on American Idol: it's only been two days!  
SPONSORED TWEET: Edgy new thriller #TheMobDoctor premieres this Monday at 9/8c on FOX. Be careful who you owe.  
INSIDE STORY: Adrienne Maloof's nasty divorce battle:  
Gorgeous! See Blake Lively's wedding ring:  
Which new judge -- Nicki, Mariah or Keith -- are you most excited about joining Idol?  
Taylor Swift & Conor Kennedy reunited in New England over the weekend. Get all the details:  
Fergie shares some words of support for Kate:  
Uh oh ... More trouble for Amanda Bynes:  
Kim Kardashian adopts! Her fluffy white kitten is named ...  
Mario Lopez's fiancé surprises her soon-to-be husband during his bachelor party weekend.  
Yum! What's the best dessert you've had at a wedding? Here's what Ryan Reynolds and Blake Lively served:  
PHOTOS: Check out the sexiest shoes on the red carpet! (via  
It's official! Nicki Minaj and Keith Urban join #Idol:  Thoughts? 
Who has the best hair in Hollywood? See Jen, Beyonce, Zooey & more who made our list:  
New couple alert? Eva Longoria and Mark Sanchez spotted out holding hands in NYC:  
That's a wrap! The Toronto International Film Festival is ending but the Oscar buzz is just getting started:  
Kate Hudson's mom overshares during Bingham's birth. Plus: More OMG quotes from Jessica Simpson, Simon Cowell & more!  
Photos of Prince William and Kate feeling "upbeat" in the rainforests of Borneo:  
Photo Special: Check out Tori Spelling's family photo album!  
All about the music at Blake & Ryan's wedding. And no, the Gossip Girl theme song wasn't played.  
PHOTO: Amanda Bynes—who isn't supposed to be driving—hides her face while in the driver's seat of her car  
Penelope Cruz pulls an Angelina Jolie in Toronto. are you reading this?!?  
In case you missed it: More legal trouble is likely in store for Amanda Bynes  
French editor defends decision to run topless photos of Kate because she is a "princess of the 21st century"  
How do you think Demi Lovato is doing as an X Factor judge? Take our poll!  
Ryan Lochte & Miss U.S.A.: He calls her "beautiful" and she says they're just friends.  
Joe Simpson pleads not guilty to DUI charges  
A lively black cat is removed from the steps of Assyakirin Mosque shortly before the arrival of William and  
Royals call French mag's publication of topless photos of Kate "grotesque and
totally unjustifiable":  
Did you watch Kate Hudson on #Glee? Thoughts? 
Unless they're spectacularly arranged! RT original songs show talent not bringing flowers! #XFactor 
How do we feel about #XFactor contestants auditioning with original songs? 
Ouch! RT Think Simon is too long-in-the-tooth to be still walking around in his underwear! Show is fun! Britney is an asset! 
Night two of #XFactor is underway! How do you like the new season so far? 
Heroes Among Us: Meet Pam Washek, who founded the Neighbor Brigade to help families in crisis  
Lea Michele talks about what it's like to work with boyfriend Cory Monteith  
LOL! 
Barbara Walters chats w/PEOPLE's Carlos Greer for our Best in TV special, airing Tues, Sept 18 9 PM ET on  
PHOTO: Justin Theroux gives us two tickets to the gun show in NYC  
MUG SHOT: Sally Struthers arrested for DUI in Maine  
Reality star talks about her night at Stand Up to Cancer  
PHOTO: Kate Hudson, Lea Michele hug it out at the Glee premiere party. Are you going to watch the show this season?  
Happy birthday, Bella Swan! Celebrate with some birthday cake...er, mountain lion!  
We've picked the 50 most gorgeous gowns of 2012. But you can pick the top 5! Check out Beyonce, KStew, Sofia and more:  
Britney on X Factor: Check out our favorite reader Tweets from the show!  
William and Kate leave Hospis Malaysia, where the Duchess gave her first speech on foreign soil.  
PEOPLE's TV critic weighs in on #XFactor debut. Did you watch? What did you think?  
#XFactor's over on the East Coast & you told us what you thought of Missed a moment? Catch up here:  
Even Simon seemed to get misty when Jillian Jensen sang on #XFactor. What did you think? Tweet & tell us:  
Watching on #XFactor? Who's been your favorite contestant so far & why? Tweet & tell us:  
Awkward! faces a guy from her past on #XFactor. Did she make the right call? Tweet & tell us:  
Is too mean? Or is she just what #XFactor needs? Tweet or tell us what you think here:  
Watching #XFactor? Tell us how Britney's doing! Reply & your Tweet may be on   
William and Kate are greeted ... by a dragon! #singapore  
Levi Johnston is a dad again, names his kid after the wind and a gun  
Amanda Knox's ex-boyfriend talks about the night of Meredith Kercher's murder  
SPONSORED TWEET: Unforgettable. UnXpected. Catch the 2-nite premiere of The #XFactor starting Wednesday at 8/7c on FOX!  
Who's excited for Britney and Demi's #XFactor debut? Tweet during the show tonight... We'll be watching!  
Cue the Whitney song: Here's what's going on with Heidi Klum and her bodyguard  
Kathy Bates undergoes double mastectomy  
Who do you think should win So You Think You Can Dance? Sound off in our poll:  
William and Kate arrive in Queenstown, Singapore!  
Prince William says he wants to have two kids with Kate. #Yayroyalbabies  
Cutest photo ever? Carrie Underwood poses with a bunch of kittens. It puts the "aww" in "awesome."  
so close we can almost touch her! Kate greets fans (and in Gardens in the Bay, #Singapore  
New PEOPLE cover alert! Secrets of Blake and Ryan's surprise wedding revealed:  
Night 2 of #TheVoice is underway. Any early favorites? 
Congratulations to Michelle Kwan -- she's engaged!  
The secret to Honey Boo Boo's lemonade recipe? 5 lbs. of sugar. We want to brush our teeth now.  
Yep, they're married! 
Why did Blake Lively and Ryan Reynolds marry in Charleston? Find out:  
It's another of the same company's brands :) 
Yum! Having a tequila tasting with Herradura Teqiila. Apologies for all future typos. 😜  
SPONSORED TWEET: Feel the love. Don't miss the new episode premiere of the new comedy tonight at 9/8c on NBC 
"You ruined my life because I can't go to a friend's house & drink cheap wine anymore."—Julianne Hough to Ryan Seacrest  
Wonder what royals eat? Here's the menu when William & Kate dined with the President of Singapore. Let them  
Britney Spears on her "meanness" to Simon Cowell: I learned it by watching you!  
Jay Leno delivers tearful speech at Michael Clarke Duncan's funeral  
#Remember911 RT <3 NYC, my tall, proud hometown.  
PHOTO: Kristen Stewart steps out for a screening of On the Road. Plus: Adele, Jessica Simpson & more in Star Tracks!  
Prince William and Kate touch down in Singapore and visit the city's famed Botanic Gardens (photos):  
Congrats to the winner of #MasterChef! Find out who took home the trophy:  
Watching #TheVoice tonight? Which coach would you pick if they all turned around for you? 
Carrie Ann Inaba quietly ends her engagement  
Sheryl Crow says her brain tumor may be related to cell phone use  
Jessica Simpson reveals her post-baby body on Katie Couric's new show.  
More details on Blake Lively & Ryan Reynolds's wedding emerge:  
PHOTO: Blake Lively & Ryan Reynolds were married where The Notebook was filmed!  
PHOTOS: NPH, Joe Manganiello are there when HIMYM's Cobie Smulders weds SNL's Taran Killam  #bestguestlist 
Diem Brown shows off her fierce hairdo for Stand Up to Cancer. Come back to  Thursday to read her  
So do we! 
The always-fabulous Pink talks about how she got her body back after baby  
Watch Kate Hudson's sexy Glee performance! She sings a mash-up of Lady Gaga's "Americano" and J.Lo's "Dance Again."  
Blake Lively's ex Penn Badgley says he's "so happy" for her and Ryan Reynolds  
Oh, you know, just a pic of Johnny Depp being his usual hot self in Toronto:  
William & Kate getting second honeymoon on the private island of Tavanipupu  
Katy Perry & John Mayer party together in Vegas...at a strip club!  #bowchickabowwow 
PHOTO: Rihanna honors her late grandmother with a tattoo. (Pic is a little NFSW-ish)  
"She's surprisingly quite mean." — Simon Cowell on Britney Spears's X-Factor judging style.  
Prince Harry threatened by Taliban, which vows to kill or kidnap him in a statement:  
Not on the Internet this weekend? Catch up on what you missed here:  
UPDATE: It's official - Blake Lively & Ryan Reynolds are married:  
Did Blake Lively & Ryan Reynolds get married in South Carolina?  
awesome views from the roof of the #thompsonhotel Toronto for #TIFF12 party #nofilter #sundayfunday  
nicest guy ever! hangin, takin pics at #CFCBBQ #sundayfunday at #TIFF (far from the 90210)  
How I Met Your Mother's Cobie Smulders marries SNL's Taran Killam. Congrats!  
Find out what Tom Cruise has been up to in London lately. Hint: there's theater (and Penelope Cruz) involved:  
They said what? Read the most quotable quotes from Jessica Simpson, Christina Aguilera and more stars:  
Kristen met Katniss! Kristen Stewart & Jennifer Lawrence were hanging out at #TIFF2012 in Toronto:  
Who's watching the MasterChef finale tomorrow? Before, try finalist Christine Ha's noodle recipe:  
good morning baseball fans! View from our #TIFF12 hotel room: home of the Toronto Blue Jays  
Venus Williams is dating Cuban model Elio Pis:  
Flashback! Take a look at Emma Stone, Kelly Clarkson and more stars—back when they were wee grade-schoolers!  
Congrats! Big Brother's Brendon Villegas & Rachel Reilly Are Married:  
Waiting for screening to begin. red carpet highlights playing onscreen! Ben Affleck and a fan #toocool #TIFF  
Foodie Magician showing his skills at Meatopia in NYC.  
at #silverliningsplaybook premiere Bradley Cooper is introduced as People's Sexiest Man Alive to wild applause/cheers love! ##TIFF12 
handsome #looper star joseph gordon-levitt is going to watch #cloudatlas with us! #TIFF12  
Ryan Lochte says he has a 'huge crush' on Blake Lively:  
heeeere's Johnny! Depp arrives for #westofmemphis premiere #TIFF the masses swarm!!  
Will & Kate are headed on an 8-day Asia tour next week. Get all the details on their trip:  
can barely type... alexander skarsgard is at #brassai and oh so handsome with his beard #bestbrunchchoice ever! cc 
Gwyneth Paltrow says her father's cancer gave her a major wake-up call about her health:  
Going to Toronto for #TIFF? Check out our interactive map of the hotspots loved by cinephiles and stars alike!  
Inside Taylor Swift & Conor Kennedy's long-distance romance:  
Channing! Britney! Pink! See how stars worked (and played) this summer in their personal pics:  
REVIEW: LeAnn Rimes brings edginess, moody tunes in first concert since treatment:  
#tiff isn't the only hot ticket in town! got our hands on zach brown band's set list - great show #vip #peop  
Thanks for the office visit! RT Lovin on my fashion girls Ur so #Fab! #mbfw  
Go inside Fashion's Night Out with - she blogged her experience for  #FNO 
Paris Jackson talks about her famous father & family, praises Aunt La Toya for her support  
Kristen Stewart greeted by fans at #TIFF, tells reporters she's "fine"  
One DIrection vs. The Wanted: It's a boy band style smackdown! Who do you think looked the best?  (via 
Pauly D jokes that he can't wait to give Snooki's baby a blow out.  
PHOTO: Rihanna and Chris Brown kiss at the VMAs  
Khloe Kardashian, X Factor judge? The reality star is reportedly in talks to join the show.  
Missed the #VMA? Check out the quotes worth repeating from 1D, McKayla Moroney and more:  
In case you haven't been on the Internet, here's Kristen Stewart at #TIFF last night. Love the dress!  
Kristin Chenoweth on her accident: She says she couldn't "really form a sentence" after she was hit by a lighting rig  
oh the drama! #tiff12 kstew making headlines as we head into an #ontheroad screening - u excited to see it?  
Robin Roberts is resting at home before her bone-marrow transplant:  
Prince Harry returns to war in Afghanistan:  
Which artist had your favorite performance at last night's #VMAs? Take our poll:  
Rob & Kristen step out at the same time, looking great. Only she was in Toronto, he was in L.A.  
PHOTO SPECIAL: Check out our favorite shots from the #VMA! See Pink, Taylor and more!  
PHOTO: Pink and Miley rock identical hairdos at the #VMA. Who do you think looked best?  
Is "Gangnam Style" stuck in your head yet? 5 things to know about PSY:  
Who rocked the #VMA 'hawk best - Pink or Miley? Vote now:  
up close. it's Ke$ha and it's glorious #vmas #mtv  
PHOTOS: Miley! Rihanna! Pink! See #VMA style stars walk the carpet:  
Kristen Stewart hits the On the Road red carpet at #TIFF, posing with Garrett Hedlund and Kirsten Dunst.  
After the opening number, #vma crew works frantically to pop the balloons.  
Check out the floor of the Staples Center. It's a huge preshow dance party! #vma  
We're having a VMA viewing party. You're invited! Join our live blog now:  
Sad news: Amy Poehler and Will Arnett are ending their marriage, their rep confirms:  
Our live #VMA blog starts at 7! Join us as we chat about the big show here:  
Five things you don't want to miss about tonight's #VMA:  
Michelle Obama details her dream anniversary date with President Obama  
OK, who's watching #VMA tonight just to check out what One Direction wears? Check out their stylin' looks:  
We're live-blogging the #VMA tonight! Come chat with us about the fashions, performances & more starting at 7 p.m. ET!  
So do we! 
One of our favorite moms, Pink, talks about her daughter, her new record and more:  
Jay-Z talks about his hopes and goals for daughter Blue Ivy  
DWTS's Kym Johnson sounds off about the celeb she and partner Joey Fatone are looking to beat  
In her latest blog, reality star talks about her post-surgery discovery that her cancer had spread  
Before tonight's #VMA, take a look back at the outfits we can't forget. No matter how hard we try.  
Ben Affleck, Jennifer Lawrence movies generating Oscar buzz at #TIFF  
Watch out, Hollywood! #VMA host Kevin Hart promises "nobody is off limits."  
Gold medalist Gabby Douglas to publish "inspirational" memoir, called Grace, Gold and Glory, My Leap of Faith  
Olympic gold medalist for the U.S. soccer team shows off
her gold medal while visiting the PE  
Bridesmaids star Chris O'Dowd (he was the cute cop) is off the market! The actor is married—congrats!  
Showtime! Celebs are flocking to Toronto & there's no break with all these movies to see. #TIFF  
Kristen Stewart steps out in what appears to be Robert Pattinson's old T-shirt:  
Robert Pattinson is confirmed to be at the #VMA tomorrow! Will you watch?  
Evelyn Lozada says her marriage to Chad Johnson (formerly Ochocinco) can't be repaired.  
Update on LeAnn Rimes: She's feeling "better, stronger" in treatment.  
Good point! 
Bradley Cooper talks about the incidents that made him decide to be sober  
Jason Aldean at the CMA nominations ceremony. Yep, he's cute in person, too!  
Watching the #VMA tomorrow? Watch with  live-blog! Talk about the outfits, performances & more!  
Amanda Bynes charged with hit-and-run, faces up to a year in jail.  
Kristen Stewart talks about the difficulties of fame & her adoration for the beat generation depicted in On the Road  
Back on? John Mayer and Katy Perry step out together again. Photo:  
Beyonce celebrates her birthday on a yacht with Jay-Z—and baby Blue Ivy! Photo here:  
Snooki says filming Jersey Shore while pregnant was "lonely"  
Rihanna? One Direction? Justin Bieber? See the list of #VMA nominees—and tell us who you're rooting for!  
#KellieRocks #KellieRocks #KellieRocks #KellieRocks #KellieRocks #KellieRocks #KellieRocks 
Kellie Pickler shaves her head to support cancer-fighting friend. Can we get #KellieRocks trending?  
"We think it's very cool that our anniversary will always be on Canada Day." Chad Kroeger on romance with Avril Lavigne  
CMA nominees announced! Miranda Lambert, Blake Shelton, Jason Aldean and more are up for awards  
this week's PEOPLE - introduces #adorable #newborn Lorenzo #fistpump  
In this week's PEOPLE: star shows off the first pics of her son Lorenzo!  
Find out why Sharon Osbourne, Julie Chen are going makeup-free on The Talk.  
New mom Jessica Simpson says her body is "not bouncing back like a supermodel"  
Giuliana and Bill take baby Edward home to Chicago.  
Kevin Hart gets a gold medal in making Gabby Douglas, McKayla Moroney and Kyla Ross laugh at an MTV VMA pres  
Nina Dobrev tried to fight her feelings for Ian Somerhalder. We feel your pain. We fight those feelings every day!  #hot 
Meet Erin DiMeglio, a teen girl who made quarterback at her school's all-male football team!  
PHOTO: Pippa heads to Queens for the U.S. Open. We're pretty sure she didn't take the 7 train there.  
Gwyneth, Michelle Williams and more leave birthday wishes for Beyonce  
Green Day's Billie Joe Armstrong rushed to hospital.  
Michael Clarke Duncan's fiancee, Omarosa Manigault, held vigil by his bedside.  
Remember the pregnant man, Thomas Beatie? He's trying for his fourth child.  
Thanks—right back at you guys! 
PHOTO: Beyonce, Jay-Z and Ron Howard hang backstage in Philadelphia  
Real Housewives of NYC: Are you #TeamRamonja or #TeamAviva?  
Real Housewives of NYC: Are you #TeamRamonja or #TeamAviva?  
Scott Disick parties with the Pussycat Dolls over Labor Day weekend.  
Kelly Ripa's new Live! cohost is ... Michael Strahan! Will you watch TV's new duo?  
RIP Michael Clarke Duncan, star of The Green Mile:  
Michael Phelps celebrates retirement with a Las Vegas party held -- of course! -- at a pool.  
Prince Harry jokes around with kids in his first public appearance since nude photos were published:  
SPONSORED TWEET: Mindy Kaling stars in the hot new FOX comedy The Mindy Project. Watch NOW before it airs on TV!  
Heidi Klum say she's "moved on" from her relationship with Seal:  
PHOTO: Pippa Middleton plays ping pong in the Hamptons:  
Bobby Brown's wife's seizure was brought on by diabetes:  
Seal wasn't implying that Heidi Klum was cheating on him with her bodyguard, he says now:  
Russell Crowe gets a lift from the coast guard after getting lost kayaking:  
How Grey's Anatomy star Jesse Williams spent holiday weekend (hint: wedding!)  
PHOTO: Jennie Garth reveals her incredible bikini body!  
Need a laugh? Get the best quotes of the week from Nathan Lane, Honey Boo Boo and more:  
Bobby Brown's wife has been hospitalized after suffering a seizure.  
Which sport did Kate Middleton play in high school? Check out stars in their pre-fab days in our Back to School quiz!  
Prince Harry's naked night: party girl gives all the details  
Did Seal go to far blasting Heidi about her bodyguard?  
What's Melissa Joan's Hart's best advice for pregnant moms?  
Have you lost half your size? Send your amazing weight-loss story to halftheirsize@peoplemag.com and you could appear in PEOPLE! 
At long last! Meet Mr. Rogers' replacement in the neighborhood  
Fall TV preview: NeNe! Hayden! Vanessa! Click to see favorite ensemble players stepping out on their own  
Is Heidi Klum dating her bodyguard? It's "complicated," a friend tells PEOPLE  
More drama for Kristen Stewart: Her mom has filed for divorce.  
Blake Lively, Ryan Reynolds arrive to Venice Film Festival  
LeAnn Rimes sues over invasion of privacy  
PHOTO: Paris Jackson throws out first pitch at ballgame in dad Michael's hometown.  
Remembering Diana: Her most iconic photographs.  
More on the Backstreet Boys reunion at GMA  
Backstreet's back, alright! The boys rehearse for GMA.  
Prince William does his best McKayla Maroney impression, nails it.  
Robin Roberts's mother dies at 88  
Stallone's son, Sage, died of a heart condition -- not drugs -- says the coroner  
UVA lacrosse player sentenced to 23 years for the murder of Yeardley Love  
Eddie Van Halen undergoes emergency surgery.  
Giuliana & Bill talk about newborn baby Edward  
Holly Madison's baby daddy could face jail time.  
Jersey Shore is canceled. Are you glad to see it go, or sad fist pumping right now?  
Residents of Possom Trot, Texas, adopt 76 children  
In her latest blog, talks about her fears about passing the "cancer gene" to her children  
rumor patrol! RT I'm not married...Zzzzzzz 
Thanks for sharing your fan encounter! 
A real-life "fan-tastic" encounter! meets PEOPLE reader passes along a card to Mariah.  
You have our vote! 
I am so proud of her. I will be with her every step of the way." Eddie Cibrian, on wife LeAnn Rimes entering treatment  
.@suzannesomers and money raised by #standup2cancer goes to research - more here  
All your favorite stars unite for a good cause. Will you watch #standup2cancer on Sept. 7? Get a preview:  
Cheering for a fast recovery #TeamRobin  
LeAnn Rimes turned 30, entered treatment for anxiety, stress #exclusive #getwellsoon  
Honey Boo Boo's mom talks about her arrest record.  #OhLawd 
New mom Anna Faris steps out with her dogs,  
Meet the cast of the 21st season of The Amazing Race!  
Get ready to swoon: Liam Hemsworth wearing, ahem, 50 shades of grey in NYC.  
X-Men star Shawn Ashmore (a.k.a., Iceman) is married. And not to Rogue! See his wedding pic:  
Judge rules that Kelly Rutherford's children will stay in Monaco with her ex:  
PHOTO: In true Snooki style, the reality star leaves the hospital in platform sandals—with a camera crew in tow.  
Rules for Today Show giveaway:  
Rules for Today Show giveaway:  
Congrats! You've won the giveaway! DM me your email address and someone will be in touch shortly! 
The first follower to reply w/ #PeopleTodayShow gets a pair of VIP tickets to see Mraz Fri at The Today Show in NYC. 
Prince William, Kate and Prince Harry attend the Paralympic Games in London  
Stay tuned! At noon, we're revealing how you can win tix to see and at the Today Show in NYC! 
Modern Family creator reacts to Ann Romney saying the sitcom is her favorite show:  
Pippa Middleton's releasing a party-planning book -- and we have a sneak peek at the cover. Check it out:  
The Palace sticks up for Prince Harry!  
Man dressed as Bigfoot for a hoax is run over and killed.  
Snooki talks about nursing her "little man"  
How Giuliana & Bill Rancic are spending their "babymoon"  
Paralympic rugby champ Nick Springer going for his 9th gold medal  
Thank you! 
<3 Nick! He's a great guy. We'd love to post your pic and story on  What was the show? 
Rihanna and Chris Brown cross paths at L.A. club  
The always charming John Stamos talks about his B'way show—and why he changes the channel when Full House comes on  
That's fantastic! Love your pics. What was he like? 
PHOTOS: Kate Hudson & Naomi Watts arrive in Venice for the film fest  
Rihanna & Frank Ocean added to list of VMA performers  
Watch this space tomorrow for details on how to win tix to see & perform on the Today Show in NYC on Friday! 
Was LuAnn caught cheating on Real Housewives on NYC?  
Spot a celebrity? Tweet us your sighting with #CITA and it could appear on  
Shia LaBeouf gets naked and high for his new roles. That's more than meets the eye!  
Aly Raisman gets a super-sweet wedding proposal  
What's cuter than cute? Bradley Cooper with a puppy!  
PHOTO: Emma Watson & her boyfriend step out for a snuggly stroll  
World's oldest woman turns 116!  
Watch this space on Weds for details on how to win tix to see & Today Show in NYC on Friday! 
DWTS stars show off their dance-toned bodies in Vegas.  
Some fun for a Monday: Check out the "dogshaming" hall of fame! (via  
SPONSORED TWEET: Catch the new FOX comedy Ben and Kate before it airs on TV! Watch now & find out who's raising who!  
Congratulations to - see a photo from her Hawaiian wedding here:  
Inspiring! Quadriplegic model Angela Rockwood lands major campaign for Nordstrom  (via 
GMA anchor Robin Roberts sets the date for medical leave.  
Congrats to Rosie O'Donnell—she and girlfriend Michelle Rounds are now married!  
Kellan Lutz talks to PEOPLE about why his romance with Sharni Vinson works & how he's changed when it comes to love.  
Is there a real-life Game of Thrones romance brewing? Check out the costar spotted with Kit Harington (Jon Snow)  
Halle's ongoing custody battle explained in 5 clicks:  
Sabrina Bryan joins DWTS All-Stars cast  
How did Blake Lively & Ryan Reynolds celebrate her 25th birthday?  
PHOTO: John Mayer chops his hair! Do you like his new look?  
Call me, definitely! Carly Rae Jepsen says her new man is "really great."  
Need a laugh before Monday? Check out the best quotes from Dax Shepard, Miley and more:  
Read all about Snooki's new baby, Lorenzo Dominic LaValle!  
Anna Faris and Chris Pratt welcome their son Jack  
always remember #neilarmstrong #RIP ... one small step ...   
Sad news. Astronaut Neil Armstrong dies at age 82.  
It's back-to-school—even for moms! Check out these celeb moms and their stylish casual wear.  
PHOTO SPECIAL: See vintage star pics from Taylor Swift, Gwen Stefani & more:  
Katy Perry & John Mayer: What happened?  
PHOTO: Ashton & Mila get cozy at a baseball game  
Who should be the next Bachelor: Sean Lowe or Ryan Lochte? Tweet #Lowe or #Jeah to cast your vote!  
Do you believe Lance Armstrong's statement that he never doped?  
Jerry Nelson, voice of The Count on Sesame Street, has died at age 78  
Rufus Wainwright is married! The singer marries Jorn Weisbrodt in Long Island. See their wedding pic:  
Randy Travis is in trouble with the law again. This is seriously sounding more and more like a country song.  
Lance Armstrong will be stripped of his Tour de France titles  
Jerry Springer weighs in on the Prince Harry nekkid photo controversy  
Jef Holm knows who to blame for hurtful rumors that Emily cheated  
No more fireworks? Katy Perry and John Mayer are no longer dating.  
Based on our replies, if Pattinson really were homeless, he'd have a LOT of women willing to let him crash.  
How about a big hello? :) 
Missed Pattinson on Kimmel? Get a recap of his interview here. He was pretty hilarious:  
Paranormal State star Ryan Buell, who is battling pancreatic cancer, says he's surprising docs with his progress  
They were delicious. I'll eat another one for you ;) 
Maria Sharapova sent us a bunch of treats. U jelly? 😜  
Liberty Ross steps out for first "official" public appearance since the scandal  
Look who just visited our LA offices! Check  later for his thoughts on Prince Harry. #jerryspringe  
Big Brother recap: The Quack Pack takes control! Who do you want to win?  
PHOTO: Robert Pattinson gets swarmed by fans at Jimmy Kimmel Live  
Great to see who dished on the intense 3-part RHNYC St Barts trip. #dramadramadrama  
All about the newest #HungerGames hunk Sam Claflin  
Celine Dion pulls a Prince Harry -- strips down for a magazine!  
One royal expert says the nude photo scandal won't hurt Prince Harry who is a "lovable rogue." What do you think?  
Angelina Jolie to play opposite one of her children in Maleficent. Find out which kid is getting his/her big break!  
Emily Maynard, Jef Holm deny cheating reports, call them "one hundred percent not true"  
Rumor Patrol: Forget the "cold feet" rumors—Britney's wedding is still on  
Did Taylor Swift crash a Kennedy wedding? The mother of the bride says so.  
LL Cool J takes down an intruder in his home. Mama said knock you out for real!  
Check out the table setting for #Emmy governor's ball! Theme is 'Rhapsody
in Red' #awardsseason #excited #no  
Avril Lavinge shows off her 14-carat engagement ring.  
H.S. valedictorian won't get her diploma until she apologizes for saying "hell" in her speech. Oops. We just said it.  
thank you for sharing your story. 
PEOPLE picks our top 5 favorite stars to like on Facebook. Who are your favorites?  
Yep. RT "What happens in Vegas stays on the Internet" is the new slogan. 
Prince Harry caught partying naked in Las Vegas. What happened to "what happens in Vegas stays in Vegas?"  
EXCLUSIVE: Real Housewives of NJ's Jacqueline Laurita tells PEOPLE her son Nicholas has autism:  
Chef opened his culinary loft to #svedka drinkers and #foodies tonight! #yum  
Surprise and congrats! PEOPLE exclusively reports is engaged to Chad Kroeger  
Tom Cruise & Katie Holmes's divorce is finalized. Cue the Paula Cole song.  
Is Taylor Swift bringing Conor Kennedy to the VMAs—a.k.a., Ex-Boyfriend Land?  
Justin Theroux heads out to dinner with pals in N.Y.C.  
Ryan Lochte keeps the party going in Las Vegas  #jeah 
Dying young man's last wish inspires others to be generous. Heartwarming story here:  
Gratuitous photo of Liam Hemsworth. Because Gale.  
Tony Scott's death: Authorities continue to investigate why he jumped; coroner investigation will take weeks  
Mayim Bialik will still hit the Emmys (and the red carpet) despite her injury  #YouCantStopAmyFarrahFowler 
Dick Van Dyke to receive Screen Actors Guild's highest honor: Lifetime Achievement Award! Which role was your favorite?  
Nicki Minaj & Enrique Iglesias in talks to be American Idol judges. Seems like EVERYONE is...who do you want to see?  
See Neve Campbell on the beach with her baby!  
PHOTO: Sarah Michelle Gellar steps out with lookalike daughter Charlotte. So cute!  
PHOTO: Britney Spears shows off her bikini body.  
Hilary Swank splits from boyfriend John Campisi  
Rosie O'Donnell suffers a heart attack  
"The only thing domestic about me is that I was born in this country." -- one of late comic Phyllis Diller's famous quips 
Legendary comic Phyllis Diller has died at age 95  
Jen Aniston steps out with a simple gold band on her ring finger.  
Maggie Gyllenhaal says she's less judgmental since becoming a mom:  (via 
Maggie Gyllenhaal says she's less judgmental since becoming a mom:  (via 
Blair in the wild? Facts of Life star Lisa Welchel to compete on Survivor: Philippines  
Top Gun director Tony Scott was reportedly diagnosed with inoperable brain cancer before he jumped from an L.A. bridge  
PHOTO SPECIAL: The 10 best dresses from the Do Something Awards!  (via 
Downton Abbey preview: Maggie Smith and Shirley MacLaine face off!  
PHOTO: Taylor Swift, Conor Kennedy play a game of kissy face in Cape Cod.  
"It's awkward because I still love him." —Rihanna, speaking to Oprah, about her relationship with Chris Brown. Details:  
Some smiles for a Monday: Watch Joseph Gordon-Levitt morph from TV teen breakout to the handsome leading man he is now  
5 people show off their new bods after losing 100 lbs. each!  #halftheirsize 
Top Gun director Tony Scott leaps to his death off a bridge  
5 people show off their new bods after losing 100 lbs. each!  
PHOTO: Lovebirds Cory Monteith and Lea Michele walk the #DoSomething carpet together:  #glee 
happy #sundayfunday #sunset at #surflodge montauk  
PHOTO: Justin Theroux resurfaces in NYC a week after proposing to Jennifer Aniston:  
Attention ladies: Prince Harry is back in the United States - Vegas, to be exact:  
Wynonna Judd's new husband seriously injured in motorcycle crash:  
Olympian Ryan Lochte tells PEOPLE how a girl can win "the key to his heart"  
Indulge in your own Fifty Shades of Grey fantasy - at the real-life hotel!  
Daily dose of cuteness (via Dogs in sunglasses!  
PHOTO: Taylor Swift spotted holding hands with new beau Conor Kennedy:  
Post-breakup, Jenny McCarthy hits Vegas:  
We tested them so you don't have to! Check out our editors' picks for the best beauty products! (via )  
Robert Pattinson's favorite TV show is Cops - and 6 other things we learned about the Cosmopolis star this week:  
Congrats to Grant Show and Katherine LaNasa - they got married today!  
Why is Kris and Kim's divorce taking so long? The drama explained - in 5 clicks:  
#BachelorPad's defends his show strategy:  
Prince William pilots the helicopter responsible for the sea rescue of a drowning teen girl:  
Ouch! Marc Summers tells PEOPLE about his taxi crash and subsequent facial surgery:  
From Chad & Evelyn to J.Lo & Chris, take a look back at Hollywood's shortest marriages!
  
Love is more than a "maybe" for Carly Rae Jepsen - click to meet her boyfriend:  
Obsessed—or hot mess? Rate daring star looks on Madonna, Rihanna and more:  via 
Mayim Bialik steps out, says accident was "very bloody and scary"  
Amazing! RT You forgot a quote that came directly from one of your own photoshoots  
10 Best Celeb Quotes of the Week - What's your fave?  
Hope Solo says Maksim Chmerkovskiy slapped her in #DWTS rehearsals for season 13:  
Vanessa Bryant values #winning! Her comments to are getting buzz - check them out re #kobe  
What movie are you psyched to see this weekend? PEOPLE's #Sparkle review is out:  
loving the exchange between  #oopsididitagain 
Mayim Bialik feels the love after her big bang accident  
Life imitates Breaking Bad: Real-life man named Walter White arrested for meth.  
California woman fatally shoots husband—then takes the kids out for sandwiches.  
PEOPLE's movie critic reviews Cosmopolis. Harshly. Will you still see it?  
PHOTO: Katie Holmes takes Suri shopping in her Ohio hometown.  
The hilarious #Emmy nominee for his show #ChildrensHospital keeps it waaay casual for his Peopl  
Britney & Demi explain their X Factor judging styles  
PHOTO SPECIAL: In honor of the 35th anniversary of Elvis's death, see who has channeled The King through the years.  
Jenny McCarthy splits from her Chicago Bears linebacker beau Brian Urlacher  
Happy birthday, Madonna! Check out her Madgesty's changing looks through the years.  
PEOPLE's movie critic reviews the explosive (GET IT?) sequel The Expendables 2. Will you see it?  
Kristen Stewart will attend the Toronto Film Festival, which will feature a special presentation of On the Road  
Haha, okay, but only because Pinkie Pie is best pony. 
Robert Downey Jr. injured on Iron Man 3 set.  #blameloki 
In her latest blog, opens up about her ovary removal surgery & recovery  
Bobby Brown enters rehab.  
Another amazing Heroes Among Us story - Why one woman quit her bank job to feed the hungry  
Congrats Her son Kash Kade arrived today  
yes we Can-Can have a blast on a rainy night in NYC #Rouge #rosebar  
Jennie Garth is (casually) dating again. Meet her new guy  
Blossom star Mayim Bialik suffers a severe injury during a car accident in L.A.  
Kim Kardashian's short marriage turning into a really long and hard divorce  
Having a little fun with the David Beckham H&M underwear statue.  
"Papa" Joe Simpson charged with DUI  
Reem Acra designs two potential gowns for Jennifer Aniston (via  
Chad Johnson, a.k.a., Ochocinco, breaks his silence on domestic violence arrest  
Celeb trainer Harley Pasternak blogs about how he got Halle into Catwoman shape.  
Will Kristen Stewart return for Snow White & the Huntsman sequel? Please let it be called Snow White 2: Snow Harder  
Jimmy Kimmel is engaged! The host pops the question to girlfriend Molly McNearney  
Miley Cyrus says Liam loves her new look. Fans, however, still think she looks like Draco Malfoy.  
Hide yo kids, hide yo whisk: Julia Child gets auto-tuned in honor of her 100th birthday  
Carrie Underwood (and her killer legs) belt out some tunes this morning on the Today Show.  
Robert Pattinson's GMA interview: "I'm not interested in selling my personal life."  
How did Justin Theroux pop the question to Jennifer Aniston? Find out!  
View of lower Manhattan from bash at the top of the Standard  
What type of wedding dress do you think Jennifer Aniston will wear? Vote in our poll!
  
Evelyn Lozada Files for Divorce - can we call Chad Johnson Ochosolo now?  
Child star-turned-author/math genius talks about how she's teaching her son math  
PHOTO: See Kim Kardashian behind bars.  
Tim Tebow says he hopes Jets fans root for him. He's also posing shirtless, which is a reason to click:  
SPONSORED TWEET: Once you meet #TimothyGreen you'll never be the same! Get tix to & see it 8.15!  
Really cute pic of Matt Bomer (swoon) and his adorable son:  
Robert Pattinson hits Cosmopolis premiere after-party in NYC  
Actor Ron Palillo, who played Horshack on Welcome Back, Kotter, dies at age 63  
Meet inspiring pre-teen Talia Joy who's become a YouTube hit while battling cancer  
PHOTO: Pattinson rings bell at Stock Exchange, inspires many "ring my bell anyday" quips  
Evelyn Lozada speaks out after her husband Chad "Ochocinco" Johnsons domestic violence arrest  
How cute are Kelly Clarkson and her boyfriend? (Spoiler alert: TOTALLY CUTE)  
Gabby Douglas shows her gold medal to Michelle Obama  
Taylor Swift wrote a breakup song about an ex. Shocker.  
What does Jennifer Lopez really want in a man?  
FIRST PHOTO: Robert Pattinson hits a red carpet for first time since Kristen Stewart scandal.  
Check out Miley's hair twins, from singer Robyn to drummer Watts (Some Kind of Wonderful)  (via 
Christina Aguilera gives her take on how she thinks Britney will do as an X Factor judge  
Helen Gurley Brown, iconic editor of Cosmopolitan, dies at age 90  
Kristin Chenoweth leaves The Good Wife due to injury she sustained on-set  
Chad Johnson's VH1 show, Ev and Ocho, canceled after domestic violence arrest  
Did Zach Galifianakis get married over the weekend?  
PHOTO: Ryan Reynolds & Blake Lively go to the gym together, make it look ridiculously sexy.  
Preview: Honey Boo Boo goes "extreme couponing" which her mom says is "better than sex."  
Fans camp outside of MOMA for Robert Pattinson's Cosmopolis premiere  
Timeline: How Jen and Justin went from costars to engaged in 15 months:  
This photo of J.Lo and Pitbull is kind of hilarious:  
Monday morning tunes: Check out the pop hits from last night's #Olympics closing ceremony with our playlist:  
Taylor Swift buys a home near boyfriend Conor Kennedy's family home on Cape Cod  
PHOTOS: Beyonce shares new pics of Blue Ivy  
Missed the #Olympics closing ceremony? Check out what you missed with our pics of the Spice Girls & more performers:  
PHOTO SPECIAL: Jen Aniston & Justin Theroux's whirlwind romance  
DWTS pairs revealed for the all-star season. Maksim & Kirstie are together again!  
it's been 25 years of #SharkWeek - check out celebs who've taken the plunge over the years!  
Check out Miley Cyrus's new pixie cut!  
what was your favorite closing ceremonies act? #Olympics #OlymicsClosingCeremony2012 #spiceupyourlife 
PEOPLE talks to Mitt Romney, Paul Ryan and their wives.  
so happy for Jen Aniston and Justin Theroux!!  
PEOPLE Exclusive: Jennifer Aniston is engaged to Justin Theroux!  
Stephen Baldwin comes to the aid of a woman having a seizure in NYC.  
Vanessa Paradis, Johnny Depp's ex, doesn't want to talk about her 14 year relationship with the actor.  
Chad Johnson (formerly Ochocinco) arrested for domestic violence on new wife Evelyn Lozada.  
PHOTO SPECIAL: Hollywood's little Olympians! Suri Cruise, Henry Samuel & more get in on the Olympic action  
Trend report: What's in (and out) in the red carpet. (via  
Paul Ryan: Five Things to Know About Mitt Romney's V.P. Choice.  
Kristin Cavallari Calls Motherhood the 'Most Incredible Feeling'  
Pop Quiz: Athlete or actor? See how well you can tell the difference between Olympians and Hollywood hard bodies!  
UPDATE: Taylor Swift, Conor Kennedy Hit Nashville -- But Didn't Meet Her Parents.  
Here's your handy-dandy guide to the Brangelina wedding rumors:  
PEOPLE's movie critic reviews The Bourne Legacy  
PHOTOS: When it's time to party, Ryan Lochte parties hard.  
Jada Pinkett Smith says enough with the divorce rumors already. "Where am I gonna go?" she asks. "That's my boo."  
Nick Lachey says he's wanted to be a dad for a long time.  
SPONSORED TWEET: This weekend, fall in love again! #HopeSprings, starring Meryl Streep, is in theaters today. Get tix:  
It's a Cleopatra-off! Britney & Lindsay dress up as the icon. But who does it better?  
Jessica Simpson's dad arrested for DUI  
London Uncovered! See the personal pics from Aly Raisman, Ryan Lochte, Usain Bolt and more Olympians!  #olympics 
Ann Curry says her Today show bosses insulted her wardrobe  
VIDEO: Teresa Giudice's husband is caught making a shady phone call. What's he hiding from his wife?  
How sad is this? The real 'Baby Beluga' dies  
Miranda Kerr gets all kinds of nekkid in new issue of Harper's Bazaar, wears nothing but boots. (via  
Jen Aniston, Justin Theroux reunite in North Carolina  
PHOTOS: Propeller accident survivor Lauren Scruggs goes to the Olympics  
Five years after family tragedy, Dr. William Petit remarries  
Heroes Among Us: How Storm Williams is boosting morale with his non-profit, Books for Soldiers  
Ryan Buell, 30-year-old star of Paranormal State, diagnosed with pancreatic cancer  
Misty May-Treanor talks about her historic gold medal  #olympics 
Reality star Diem Brown's blogs for PEOPLE about her struggle with cancer and decision to have her ovary removed  
Inside the 911 call that led police to a naked, drunk Randy Travis. I can't believe I just typed those words.  
Honey Boo Boo: America's sweetheart—or nightmare? Sound off in our poll:  
In a pre-scandal interview, Kristen Stewart spoke out against "fakes"  
Darlene Cates, who played Leo DiCaprio's mom in Gilbert Grape, is half her size and wants to act again:  
Dallas season finale tonight at 9 EST! Are you #TeamJohnRoss, #TeamChristopher—or just #TeamSexyMen? 
Did and go three-for-three? Spoiler alert!  #olympics 
Breaking Dawn director asks fans to respect Rob and Kristen  
Jennie Garth says a lot of people want to set her up now that she's single, says "it's kind of weird."  
Kevin Jonas and wife Danielle say filming a reality show has helped their marriage.  
Bob Hoskins retiring from acting after Parkinson's disease diagnosis  
Headline of the day (via Miley Cyrus's dog eats (and poops) diamonds.  
POLL: Who would you rather see on DWTS—Ryan Lochte, or Michael Phelps? Click to vote!  #olympics 
Celeb trainer Harley Pasternak offers tips on how to eat well while traveling.  
Misty May-Treanor, Kerri Walsh Jennings prep for third gold medal. Get to know who their competition is:  #olympics 
Update: Randy Travis was naked when he was arrested. Well, if that isn't a country song just begging to be written....  
Sneak peek of this week's PEOPLE cover! What do you think?  
Thanks! Happy Wednesday right back atcha! 
I do! Stanley Tucci marries Felicity Blunt  
Randy Travis arrested for alcohol-related offense (again). This time? DWI.  
I'm watching 2012 Summer Olympics (166 others checked-in)  #GetGlueHD 
Tom and Katie are still talking. Says source: "They are both going to do what's best for Suri."  
super fun intimate #nyc show at #thedarby  
Gillian Anderson and longtime partner Mark Griffiths break up.  
VIDEO: Could this be the worst #Olympics dive ever?  (Spoiler alert!) 
Michael Phelps and Megan Rossee's relationship unfolds ... on Twitter.  
Spot a celebrity? Tweet us your sighting with #CITA and it could appear on  
Pretty Little Liars star Lucy Hale opens up about her struggle with an eating disorder  
Singer and former DWTS contestant Willa Ford and her husband are divorcing.  
Singer and former DWTS contestant Willa Ford and her husband are divorcing.  
PHOTOS: Gwen Stefani hits the beach with her family  
Katy Perry parties with John Mayer. And an alligator. And a kangaroo.  
Last chance to win $500! Go to  today on your phone to find the Tap&Seek icon. Hint: Phelps gets cozy on the red carpet! 
PHOTO: Mila Kunis & Ashton Kutcher hold hands during getaway in Bali  
Oscar winning composer Marvin Hamlisch has died  
PHOTO: Michael Phelps and rumored girlfriend Megan Rossee hit the red carpet together:  
Take a first look at Natalie Portman's wedding dress!  
Want to date Bar Refaeli? Be ready to show her your smile - she loves nice teeth:  
Get the details on Natalie Portman's strictly vegan wedding:  
Michael Clarke Duncan update: The actor is out of intensive care, but still in hospital  
Check out Michael Phelps's reported new girlfriend, model Megan Rossee  
Denise Richards says her daughters want to adopt kids when they grow up  
Our TV critic pics the winners (and losers) from the #olympics coverage. Do you agree?  
Another fantastic blog on the #olympics from who asks coverage to focus on talent—not scandal & drama  
PHOTO: Kellan Lutz, looking sexy in Hollywood. 'Nuff said!  
Suri Cruise spends a night in the exclusive Cinderella's Castle Suite at Disney. See pics of the posh pad:  
J.Lo and Casper take her kids to a park  
Want a chance to win $500? Go to  on your phone to find the Tap&Seek icon. Hint: This Baywatch gal puts work before men! 
How did Gabby Douglas do during the #Olympics uneven bars final today? Click to find out (Flying Squirrel spoiler!)!  
Earl Spencer (Princess Diana's brother) names his daughter after his late sister  
There's a REALLY cute photo of Prince Hottie—er, Harry, on the homepage of  right now.  
PHOTO: Double your pleasure with Brad Pitt and his lookalike on the set of The Counselor.  
Pamela Anderson's DWTS strategy? She's swearing off men and "staying out of trouble"  
Meet the US boxer fighting in the #olympics who puts on mascara before a bout:  
American sprinters take on Jamaica's Usain Bolt at the #Olympics. Find out how they did:  
Congrats to Natalie Portman! The Oscar winner is a newlywed:  
It's a "ruff" life (wocka, wocka!). Check out cute pics of Olympians and their pets!
  #olympics 
50 years later: The Mystery of Marilyn Monroe's Death   
See the pic of Prince Charles that spawned a meme and more shots of the royal and wife Camilla goofing off:
  
Antonio Banderas and Melanie Griffith look happy as ever while posing with their gorgeous daughter Stella:  
Source says Rupert Sanders hasn't seen his wife since he told her about cheating with Kristen Stewart:  
US Swimming stars Michael Phelps and Missy Franklin finish up their races. Find out how they did:  
All about Emily Maynard's trip to Ghana with love Jef Holms:  
attn #Downton Abbey fans -had tea in London w/ Lady & Lord Carnarvon of Highclere Castle (aka the real Lady  
They said what? Get the best quotes of the week from Katy Perry, Liam Hemsworth and more:  
Congrats to Team USA's latest gold medal winner,  #olympics 
PHOTO SPECIAL: Check out personal vacation pics from Nick & Vanessa, Sofia Vergara and more:  
How judo gold medal winner Kayla Harrison overcame sexual abuse by her coach:  #olympics 
Exclusive first look at Toddlers & Tiaras spinoff, Here Comes Honey Boo Boo. O_o  
You're welcome! 
Hey guys! Here's a very cute photo of Josh Hutcherson. (You're welcome!)  
Recipe: Olympic-themed cocktails (with a golden twist, of course!)  
Missy Franklin swims in the 200M backstroke—click to find out how she did! (Spoilers!)  #olympics 
Rosie O'Donnell's fiancée diagnosed with rare disease  
Signed, Sealed, Delivered Divorce papers: Stevie Wonder files for divorce  
Food Inspiration! MasterChef's Jen Behm Blogs What She's Eating While Watching the Olympics   
There may be a break in the case of missing Indiana student Lauren Spierer  
PEOPLE's movie critic is not a fan of Total Recall. Will you see it anyway, or will you wait for the DVD?  
Sneak Peek: LeeAnn Womack & her girlfriends hang on set of her PEOPLE Country shoot (on sale Sept. 7).  
Kerri Strug blogs about Gabby Douglas's big win  
J.Lo and Casper Smart: On the rocks?  
#FF Seriously, you guys, she's hilarious. #olympics 
PHOTO: Conor Kennedy & JFK Jr. Check out the family resemblance:  
If only! That would be nice! 
VIDEO: Will Ferrell, secret Twi-hard? The actor calls KStew a "trampire" in (joking) breakdown  
Want a chance to win $500? Go to  on your phone to find the hidden Tap & Seek icon. Hint: Check out this royal GIF! 
#Friday Fun: Will & Kate do the wave during the #olympics Could they be any cuter?  
What does her historic gold medal really mean to Gabby Douglas?  
Good morning view across the Thames from near office in London #olympics  
Click to find out how Ryan Lochte and Michael Phelps did today!  #olympics 
John Orozco talks about his performance in the men's gymnastics all-around  #olympics 
Joey Lawrence talks about why he turned down the all-star season of Dancing with the Stars  
Go inside the home of Spanx creator Sara Blakely and see what a $1 billion empire will buy you!  
Katherine Jackson reinstated as guardian of Michael Jackson's children  
Want a chance to win $500? Go to  on your phone to find the hidden Tap & Seek icon. Hint: This couple met at a bar! 
Cuba Gooding Jr. update: Bartender won't press charges in alleged battery case  
How did Team USA do in the #Olympics all-around? Click here to find out (spoilers ahead!)  
Aww! Check out some of the cutest reader pets from the month of July from  
There's one thing Miley won't let Liam wear. And no, it's not a Hannah Montana T-shirt. (via  
Heroes Among Us: Former prostitute turns life around, now helps at-risk teen girls  
PHOTO: Neil Patrick Harris & Elton John bring their families together for Saint-Tropez vacation  
USA gymnasts bond backstage before Gabby Douglas and Ali Raisman start their All-Around final. #olympics  
I know! It was a simpler time, where chokers and poet shirts reigned. 
PHOTO: Katy Perry & John Mayer fuel dating rumors by leaving Chateau Marmont together after dinner date  
Thank you! 
PHOTO: See Martha Stewart's grandchildren's playroom  
Flashback! Thomas Calabro talks about Melrose Place, 20 years after he was on the show.
  
How did Matthew McConaughey meet future wife Camila? (Romantic or not?)  
What do the Kennedys think of Taylor Swift? "She's awesome," says Conor's aunt  
Was Sofia Vergara marriage proposal caught on video by her son?  
PHOTO: Tom & Suri make a splash at Disney water park. What's your favorite thrill ride?  
Fabulous! Oprah shows off her natural hair on cover of O (via  
You'll have to Tweet back to us with what you thought of the article, then! 
Was Marilyn's death really an accident? New reporting says otherwise.  
Taylor Swift "swept off her feet" by Conor Kennedy.  
Inspired to embrace your inner Olympian? Celeb trainer Harley Pasternak gives his tips:  #olympics 
Robert Pattinson will appear at the Cosmopolis premiere Aug. 13 in NYC, according to his rep.  
Joey Fatone says he has a new strategy to win DWTS. (Fingers crossed it involves the "Bye, Bye, Bye" dance!)  
Want a chance to win $500? Go to  on your phone to find the hidden Tap & Seek icon. Hint: My favorite fab 5 gymnast is… 
Kerri Strug blogs for PEOPLE about Team USA's "Fab Five"  #olympics 
PHOTO: William and Kate have a meet-and-greet with some of Great Britain's #olympic athletes.  
The "Fab Five" gymnasts: Which one is your favorite to root for?  #olympics 
How Reese Witherspoon helped Rob Pattinson after Kristen Stewart told him of her affair  
Peter Frampton hurt in car accident, blames driver whom he says was texting.  
Did Michael Phelps break the #Olympics medals record? (Click to find out, guys. Spoiler attached!)  
LOVE IT! 
PHOTO: Matt Damon, Michael Douglas play lovers in HBO's Liberace movie, Behind the Candelabra  
Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star Adrienne Maloof's split "not a surprise"  
Just retweeted you. Press achieved like a boss! 
Are you having as much fun as we are watching the Olympic families in the stands? Check out the most energetic ones:  
If you want us to unlink, we have to take the whole mention out. We need to link back to something but can take yr Twitter name off. 
Sure! Give it a few minutes to update :) 
Do you want us to remove you from the article? 
You're welcome! We know people want to watch tonight and don't want to spoil anyone's #Olympics fun. 
Want to know how the U.S. women's gymnastics team did? Click here to find out:  #Olympics 
Scout Willis gets sentenced to 2 days of community service for public drinking arrest.  
Cuba Gooding Jr. wanted by police for fighting in a bar, not for making Boat Trip.  
PHOTO: Brad Pitt dresses up like a cowboy, gives great "howdy pardner" face.  
New couple? Taylor Swift & Conor Kennedy (yes, of THOSE Kennedys).  
Ooh, that's a good one! 
Lol love it! 
Hilarious. Have a retweet! 
Okay guys, in honor of Snoop changing his name to Snoop Lion, tell us what your rap name would be! 
Bring your green hat! 
Snoop Dogg changes his name to Snoop Lion. Fo shizzle!  
Tom Cruise and his sister take Suri to Disney World  
Get ready to LOL: reviews the #Olympics so far for PEOPLE. Love his take on the uniforms!  
Vanity Fair releases its best-dressed list. Guess who tops it? (It's a no-brainer, tbh)  
Hope Solo slams NBC's soccer commentators on Twitter—do you agree with her critique?  
PHOTO: Jeremy Renner: Bourne, baby, Bourne!  
Get to know Olympian (and Bieber fan) Missy Franklin:  
Want a chance to win $500? Go to  on your phone to find the hidden Tap & Seek icon. Hint: Willow goes for a walk! 
This is fun: Check out the crazy nail art the #Olympics athletes are sporting.  
Circle of Friends author Maeve Binchy has died.  
How did royal Zara Phillips fare at the #Olympics? Find out here (and yes, there are spoilers!):  
PHOTO: Pink and Carey Hart's daughter Willow goes for a walk, holding a rubber duck. Warning: Extreme cuteness!  
Sylvester Stallone & son Sage shared a lifelong rocky relationship  
Fabulous view across London from Greenwich Park - where the Royals are cheering Zara Phillips #olympics  
Life After Survivor: 10 winners talk about what it's like after you're crowned the victor.
  
Bachelorette star Emily Maynard toasts fiancé Jef Holm's birthday with a dinner party  
Now you're talking! :) 
Rumor Patrol: Neither Liberty Ross nor her brother have spoken to the media, contrary to reports  
Smelly cat, smelly cat! What are they feeding you? 
LOVE pizza! 
Bret Michaels and longtime girlfriend Kristi Gibson have called off their engagement  
Singer-actor Tony Martin dies at age 98  
Loving this photo of Joey & Phoebe, together again! Check out Matt LeBlanc & Lisa Kudrow, reunited!  
Because some days, you just need to watch a video of a cat pushing a trolley.  (via 
Aurora shooting: James Holmes charged with 24 counts of murder.  
William & Kate cheering on fellow royal Zara Phillips at the Olympics. (Spoilers, guys.)  
At Robert Pattinson's request, Kristen Stewart has moved out of the L.A. home they shared  
Oh yes. SO delicious, animal style! 
Drew Barrymore shares her "cheat" food (mac and cheese). What's yours? Also, now I want mac and cheese. #omnomnom  
For a chance to win $500, go to  on your phone to find the Tap&Seek icon. Hint: Sexy English men hit the Olympics! 
VIDEO: Nick Lachey talks about how he's prepping for baby  
Recap: How Team USA is doing so far at the Olympics. (Spoilers ahead, obvs.)  
Modern Family cast settles contract dispute  
Check out David Beckham & Prince William cheering on the British Olympic Soccer Team  #olympics 
the lovely Sophia Bush stopped by to chat about her new CBS show Partners  
What's the current medal count for Team USA? Check out our Olympic recap here:  
Photos to drool over: 12 (very sexy) male Olympians. They all get the gold medal in hotness!  #olympics 
Sunday fun! See if you can spot which baby bump is real—and which is fake!—in our quiz:  
Zara Phillips makes her Olympic debut! What sports are you watching this weekend? #olympics  
What is Olympic gymnast Jordyn Wieber doing to prep for gold? Check out her exclusive blog here:  
Mark-Paul Gosselaar Gets Married!  
Have you seen the new photo of Katie Holmes out to dinner with a mystery man? We know who he is ...  
Join in on the Twi-bate: Should Rob Leave Kristen?  
It's National Milk Chocolate Day! Try this milkshake recipe from celeb-fave Max Brenner.  
Are you glued to your TV today? We're watching to see if Michael Phelps can make a comeback!  
Obsessed—or hot mess? Vote on summer beauty looks like Demi's hair roll and tell us if you would try these trends!  
How does U.S. men's gymnastics Olympic team captain Jonathan Horton describe his guys?  #olympics 
On Pinterest? Check out our board of refreshing summer libations—and share your favorites with us #peopledrinks!  
PHOTOS: Blinged-out grills! Bright costumes! Face paint! Meet Olympians with the wackiest competition looks!  #olympics 
Meet Peter Hegan, one of the awesome performers in the opening ceremonies at the #Olympics in #London:  
What was the best British moment from tonight's Olympic Opening Ceremony? Vote in our poll:  #olympics 
Are you watching the Olympic Opening Ceremony right now? Tell us what you think! #olympics 
Spoilers! Find out all about the opening ceremony -- and what role the Queen played -- at the #olympics  
Been cheated on? blogs about getting over her husband's betrayal (via  
VIDEO: Can you do a passable British accent? Watch these celebs try! #olympics  
Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson aren't speaking, source say:  
Try this recipe for a gold medal-worthy drink while you watch the Opening Ceremony. #olympics  
Check out view of the Opening Ceremony! Green and pleasant land. So excited! #olympics  
Bristol Palin and Pam Anderson are on the all-star Dancing with the Stars. See who else will be hitting the ballroom  
People's got a golden ticket. So excited for Opening Ceremony #olympics  
Whoops! Jeremy Renner accidentally pops a Viagra before 10-hour flight:  
Whoops! Jeremy Renner accidentally pops a Viagra before 10-hour flight:  
Fred Willard jokes that adult movie theaters are a great place to sleep:  
For a chance to win $500 find Tap&Seek icon on our NEW mobile site! Hint: Obama loves #Olympics. Go to  on your phone 
Show your #Olympics spirit with these patriotic finds that are fun for the whole family!
  
Kristen Stewart & Robert Pattinson's relationship - a timeline  
Yes:  RT I don't understand what's going on with the Jackson family. Can someone explain? 
McSteamy is McOutta there: Eric Dane is leaving Grey's Anatomy  
Rupert Sanders's wife hinted at marriage trouble in pre-scandal interview, says she feels she's raising her kids alone  
It's here - first #olympics blog for PEOPLE! Click to find out what events he's looking forward to:  
Jackson family drama explained in 5 clicks:  
PHOTO: William, Kate and Harry pose with the Olympic torch  
Epic photos of Mel Gibson's former $33 million home, infamous hot tub not pictured.  
Kristen Bell and Dax Shephard talk about what it's like living near Justin Bieber. (Hint: It's not awesome.)  
Happy 48th birthday to America's sweetheart, Sandra Bullock!  
Robert Pattinson moves out of L.A. home he shared with Kristen Stewart  
Joey Lawrence looks great early in the morning at ABC's TCAs!  
Heroes Among Us: Meet Richard and Claudia Coleman, who oversee a special needs troop.

  
For a chance to win $500 find the Tap&Seek icon on our NEW mobile site! Hint: Paris found grandma. Go to  on your phone 
PHOTO: Inside the Ojai home where Reese Witherspoon got married  
"He's so cute." —U.S. women's beach volleyball team on Prince Harry. Well, they have a point.  
Embrace your inner Olympian with these stylish finds inspired by the games! (via  
A grateful Paris Jackson Tweets: 'Grandma's Here!'  
Can't Hardly Wait star Ethan Embry and wife Sunny Mabrey (Snakes on a Plane) divorcing  
It's Tia and Tamera! The super sweet sisters are promoting their Style show at TCAs.  
Wife of Caleb Medley, an Aurora shooting victim, gives birth as he remains in critical condition  
New report says Colorado shooter mailed plans of his massacre to school psychiatrist  
Rupert Sanders did issue a statement:  
Michael Jackson's nephew named temporary guardian of the late singer's children  
PHOTO: J.Lo celebrates her 43rd with a surprise bday party on a yacht!  
Snow White director Rupert Sanders apologizes for affair with Kristen Stewart, says he's "distraught"  
Catch Olympic fever with our mini-site devoted to the summer games! See the athletes to watch, London hot spots & more:  
"I love him, I love him, I'm so sorry." — Kristen Stewart apologizes to Rob Pattinson for cheating scandal to PEOPLE  
Kristen Stewart issues an exclusive statement to PEOPLE first, says she's "so sorry" for cheating and hurting Rob.  
Celeb trainer Harley Pasternak's blog: The only tools you need to meet your fitness goals.  
Our new mobile site has launched & we're giving away ten $500 gift cards! Visit  on your smartphone for details! 
"He was my angel." — Aurora shooting victim Amanda Lindgren on her boyfriend Alex Teves, who was killed protecting her  
Bachelorette Emily Maynard on Jef Holm: "This is the best relationship I've ever been in."  
Modern Family's cast sues over "illegal contracts"  
Meet the heroes of Aurora, who showed bravery amid the horror  
PHOTO: Batman himself - Christian Bale - visits victims of the #Aurora shooting:  
More delicious treats poolside at NBC Universal TCAs!  
Kristen Stewart cheated on Robert Pattinson with a married director, according to sources  
J.Lo celebrates her birthday with beau Casper Smart  
The Jeffersons star Sherman Hemsley is dead at 74  
Happy birthday J.Lo! Check out her changing looks through the years.
  
Real Housewives of Atlanta star NeNe Leakes popped into the People interview room to promote her latest sho  
Jennifer Hudson's ex brother-in-law gets three life sentences for murdering her family  
Ha! Good point! ;) 
Billy Burke and his new "Revolution" co-star Tracy Spiridakos popped by  interview room at the  
"Love is worth the chaos."—Bachelorette Emily Maynard blogs for PEOPLE  
Katie Holmes dodged questions about her marriage the day before her divorce  
PHOTO: Jen Aniston, Emma Roberts on the set of We're the Millers (in which Jen plays a hooker!)  
Happy National Tequila Day: 4 fab recipes to help you celebrate! Salud!  
So, this is happening. A Kate Gosselin dating show is in the works.  
Delicious candy bar at NBC's TCA day!  
Police called to Jackson family home after a physical altercation:  
PHOTO: Kellie Pickler takes it off...to support the troops!  (via 
Mariah Carey's American Idol payday? $18 million. That'll buy a LOT of butterfly rings.  
First American woman in space, Sally Ride, dies at 61  
Pauly D says he's ready to play uncle to Snooki's baby, offers his babysitting services  
Lee & Jonna DeWyze, married Saturday in vintage-themed wedding in Calif. #congrats #exclusive - more pics on  
It's official: Mariah Carey is joining American Idol!  
Client List star Cybill Shepherd is engaged!  
PHOTO: See American Idol Lee DeWyze's wedding pic  
Fred Willard Tweets about his arrest, jokes the film at the adult theater was "lousy"  
PHOTO: Drool-worthy duo Paul Wesley and Ian Somerhalder at Teen Choice Awards. #yum  
Recap of Colorado shooter James Holmes's appearance in court:  
Whose cheek did Justin Bieber smooch? Where were the Twilight stars? See what happened off-camera at Teen Choice:  
"I found the perfect man." Bachelorette Emily Maynard on fiancé Jef  
Sofia Vergara joins the cast of Family Guy!  #FreakinSweet 
Teen Choice photo special: See Lea Michele, Taylor Swift and more stars show off their looks!  (via 
Was Countess LuAnn caught cheating by Real Housewives cameras? Check out this dramatic video:  
Katherine Jackson has been located.  
Backstage #teenchoice: Kendall & Kylie Jenner share handwritten messages on the Office Depot Born This Way  
Emily's Bachelorette season is over - did she get engaged? Only click if you want to know!! #SPOILER  
Happy Birthday, Selena Gomez! #TeenChoice serenade  
Pretty Little Liars star Janel Parrish & her sister hit the #teenchoice red carpet.  
Who are you rooting for at the Teen Choice Awards tonight? 
Talk about a sexy smirk! Jackson Rathbone hangs in the Backstage Creations Retreat #TeenChoice  
Teen Choice Awards preview: Janel Parrish and sister Melissa in car, en route to show!  
Most 'Unpredictable' #Bachelorette Finale Ever? says Emily's been an 'emotional wreck'  
our iphone app is in the itunes store: People Celebrity News Tracker -- Enjoy! 
hanging w/ Hugh Bonneville (aka Earl of Grantham) for PBS's #DowntonAbbey panel at Beverly Hilton #saveBates  
Monday's tomorrow—so cheer yourself up with pics of this adorable kitty, Lil Bub!  
Cheers to #TeenChoice Awards tonight: Here's a Tween-Friendly Mocktail to make and enjoy  
Check out our top picks for the top 5 stars who looked the hottest this week (via  
Anne Hathaway: "My heart aches & breaks for lives taken & altered by this unfathomably senseless act" #aurora  
Some of the fun gifts stars will get the Backstage Creations Retreat Teen Choice Awards.  
Remembering the #Aurora victims - complete list:  #condolences 
They said what? Check out the weird, funny and downright TMI quotes from Jon Hamm, Kim Kardashian and more:  
Sunday morning rumor patrol courtesy Eva Longoria! Football player BFs and Baby's first steps:  
Congrats to Idol winner Lee DeWyze and his bride Jonna! All the exclusive wedding details -  
how can u tell it's #Polo time in the Hamptons again? the countess & caviar, of course!  
Christian Bale can't "truly understand pain, grief of victims, their loved ones, but my heart goes out to them" #aurora  
More on Dark Knight shooting victim #RIPJessica - her boyfriend speaks out  
Behind this week's and Katie Holmes cover story - Their new lives as single parents  
so cool! RT concert last nite&Jay was flown in by helicopter&played in scrubs  
London's Bob the Owl gets into #Olympic spirit by running a 100-cm sprint #olympics2012 #toocute  
Agreed! RT i tried the ryan lochte diet... but nothing beats a bagel & cream cheese for breakfast  
PHOTO SPECIAL: If you've got it, flaunt it...and post it online! See the stars who flaunt their assets on Twitter  
Why did Jennifer Lopez decide to leave American Idol? It wasn't about money!  
Here's an article about Olympic swimmer Ryan Lochte. He's shirtless in the pic, so you want to see that. Trust us.  
Brother of Colorado shooting victim Jessica Ghawi blogs about her final moments  
Celebrating the fabulous Congrats!  
People's food blogger Jennifer Behm shares her 10-minute guacamole recipe. Sounds yum!  
Colorado shooting update: James Holmes called himself "The Joker"  
Was PBS right to fire Fred Willard? Sound off in our poll!  
Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson have a date night in Hollywood.  
Bachelor Pad drama! Jaclyn hates Blakely "so much it hurts."  
Glee star Chris Colfer introduces his debut novel, The Land of Stories: The Wishing Spell  
Which dress will Pretty Little Liars star Janel Parrish wear to the Teen Choice Awards?  
Colorado shooting victim Jessica Redfield remembered for her sense of humor and enthusiasm  
"He did not resist. He did not put up a fight." — police spokesperson on Dark Knight Rises shooter James Holmes  
At least 12 dead in Colorado after gunman opens fire at Dark Knight Rises; Paris premiere canceled  
Rumor Patrol: Is there trouble for Antonio Banderas & Melanie Griffith? Find out!  
PEOPLE's movie critic reviews The Dark Knight, says plot holes aside, the film is engrossing.  
Workouts are more fun with friends! Jessica Simpson buys pedometers for #weightwatchers group  
Australian runner Michelle Jenneke's pre-race ritual gets the remix treatment, becomes a (sexy) viral hit.  
Warning: Your phone might explode from an overload of cuteness!  
PHOTO: Check out Kate's $78,000 necklace!  (via 
PEOPLE's TV critic gives his take on the Emmy nominations. Who do you think was snubbed?  
Meet Cheryl Burke's (very handsom!) beau: hockey star Joffrey Lupul  
Reality star latest blog post: Inside her struggle with fertility treatments, chemotherapy and guilt  
Rafael Nadal withdraws from the London Olympics  
Heroes Among Us: Plane crash survivor Stephanie Nielson shares her tale.  
PHOTO: Kate is royal in blue at exhibit of portraits of Olympic athletes  
Emmy nominations were just announced—but what's the best show of all time? Vote for your favorites:  #BestinTV 
Jimmy Kimmel owns the Emmy nominations announcement! Check out his best one-liners.  
Mad Men, American Horror Story get 17 Emmy nominations each! Find out what else got nominated:  #Emmys 
Jessica Simpson is working "very hard" to lose her baby weight. Do you have any fitness advice for the new mom?  
He's the Prince Gotham needs! Check out Prince Harry at the London premiere of The Dark Knight.  
Rain delay for our outdoor interview with  
PHOTO: Prince Charles climbs a (really short) rock wall.  
PHOTO: Mona Lisa's bones may have been discovered.  
PHOTO: Tom Cruise takes Suri on a (very) high flying adventure.  
How sweet! Roger Ebert and wife Chaz celebrate 20 years together!  
"I'm proud to be married to him."—Anthony Weiner's wife Huma, about state of her marriage after husband's photo scandal  
Snooki isn't the only Jersey Shore castmember with marriage on the mind! See who else is expecting to get engaged soon:  
PHOTO: Kim Kardashian cries on a roller coaster with Kanye West  
Halle Berry rushed to hospital after being injured on the set of The Hive.  
Ricki Lake embracing her inner Salt-N-Pepa, says "let's talk about sex" on her new talk show.  
Tom Cruise is "sad" but not "bitter" about the situation, says a friend  
Former NY Congressman Anthony Weiner Shares a Family Photo  
Casper Smart says romance with J. Lo "just happened" - it wasn't love at first sight:  
"Once Upon a Time" costars Jennifer Morrison and Sebastian Stan are a couple, says a source  
Sponsored tweet: Neal Caffrey's on the run again! Find out where he's headed on new episodes of Tues 9/8c on 
American Horror Story news - is joining the cast!  
PHOTO: PDA alert! Anne Hathaway lays one on her fiancé while on the subway:  
Power women rule! RT What does it take for #Peoplemag to cover tech execs? Marissa Mayer, apparently  
Awwww-dorable! Caught on the Kiss Cam: The Prez & #teamUSA  
Chocolate fix offices! Thanks for the treat, #nomnom  
Reunited and it feels so good: Tom Cruise Visits Suri in NYC  
Bachelorette Emily thought seeing Sean was the hardest  
Demi Lovato opens up about why she used to cut herself  
VIDEO: See Ellen DeGeneres vacuum Jennifer Aniston's butt. No, really.  
Country's original female superstar Kitty Wells has passed away #RIP  
What do you think of new single "Settle Down"? Give it a listen here:  
'Cause the NYC staff is jealous ... PEOPLE's poses w/ at Twilight party #comiccon #sdcc  
Beloved children's author Donald J. Sobol has died  
Marilyn Manson has babies on the brain - can you picture him as a dad?  
thinks deep thoughts about his new book & Glee's next season during a People TV interview!  
PHOTO: Lifestyles of the rich and famous - Channing and Clooney go boating with their ladies:  
Aww! Nick and Vanessa tweet love messages to each other for their anniversary:  
Prep work begins for The Dark Knight Rises premiere on New York's Upper West Side.  
Sylvester Stallone says there's "no greater pain" than the loss of a child:  
First look at reading her love letter to <3  
Coroner's office says it'll be two months before cause of Sage Stallone's death is known  
Check out Michelle Williams & Jason Segel going shopping with her daughter Matilda  
heeeyyy it's the Bacon Brothers! having a blast at #sdcc #comiccon? #nofilter #blueeyes  
Wish we were at the beach too! RT Addiction to starts young!  
New York Knick Jason Kidd charged with DUI:  
What do you think is the best TV theme song? Sound off in our poll—and find out the results in a two-hour ABC special!  
closing out #comiccon #sdcc sat night Jaime King flanked by People's and Jen Garcia #hot  
it's SuperPup #sdcc #comiccon #cute #pomeranian cc  
The couple that shops together ... stays together? Check out Kim and Kanye's matchy-matchy style  (via 
Love this! RT Morning, got my & life's good.  
Breaking Bad Star Aaron Paul wants to tell you how CRAZY he is about his fiancee  
thx teeth check! & no check! for playing #s  
yep. that's Ryan Kwanten doing a handstand. hot. #sdcc #trueblood #comiccon  
Sage Stallone was to marry his girlfriend in Vegas this very weekend  
more #bigeyes in People's #sdcc #photobooth & Jennifer Schwalbach Smith pop by  
Plane crash survivor Travis Barker still struggles with fear of flying:  
check out exclusive #sdcc #comiccon #photobooth pics on   
Unleash Your Inner Superhero with Comic-Con Recipes from Top Chef alum Brian Malarkey   
PHOTO SPECIAL: See how Sofia, Miley & more beat the heat. (And yes, there's a shirtless Joe Manganiello pic in there!)  
are u excited!? #Olympic stadium #London 2012. Two weeks to go! Cc  
Tom Cruise will see his daughter Suri 'very soon,' says his lawyer  
On Pinterest? Follow Peoplemag for celeb-loved recipes and more:  
Play time! Exclusive #comiccon swag from & more!  
Sylvester Stallone's 36-year-old son Sage is found dead at home.  
it's a dog. on a bike. #comiccon thx People reporter for the fun shots!  
If you're not following really funny Friday the 13th Tweets, you're missing out! 
Amazing Lego creations at #comiccon. Bet they'd still hurt if you stepped on them.  
The line to get into #comiccon is longer than the line usually is for new Apple products!  
Michael Clarke Duncan recovering from heart attack  
Suffering from Friggatriskaidekaphobia—aka, fear of Friday the 13th? Survive today with our lucky playlist!  
The glam scene at the Expendables 2/IGN party at #comiccon #sdcc  
It's official: J.Lo is leaving American Idol.  
David Letterman may have spoiled the ending in Dark Knight Rises. (WARNING: article contains mega-spoiler. For reals.)  
Review: Ice Age: Continental Drift is fine but forgettable.  
J.Lo and Casper Smart go wake-boarding, he shows off his six-pack. Happy Friday!  
Just in time for Friday the 13tth! PEOPLE's Jen Garcia with a spooky, scary pal (not Jason) at #comiccon  
Big Brother recap: Who do you think will win?
  
"I would just sit there and lick the pages." — Robert Pattinson on 50 Shades of Grey  
Mariah Carey is in "serious" talks to be a judge on American Idol  
Photo: #comiccon fans cosplay The Avengers. Follow us on Instagram for more Comic-con pics!  
On YouTube? Follow us at:  
Robert Pattinson takes the mic at the Twilight #comiccon panel. #sdcc  
Former "Melrose Place" hunk Grant Show is engaged  
Curtis Stone, Lindsay Price are engaged!  
K.I.T.T. makes the scene at #comiccon #sdcc  
Steven Tyler quits American Idol  
Reality star Diem Brown, who is battling cancer, blogs about her health insurance woes  
Tom Cruise gets a special visitor on the set of his new movie:  
Here's a duchess who isn't afraid to get her hands dirty! Kate cleans (and guts) fish with scouts!  
Kristin Chenoweth released from hospital after being injured on the set of The Good Wife  
PEOPLE's own poses with Pinkie Pie (best pony!) at #comiccon #sdcc #mylittlepony  
Adam Levine may be off the market, ladies. The singer was spotted holding hands with Namibian model Behati Prinsloo  
People is on the scene at #comiccon! Autobots...roll out!  
Photos in today's Star Tracks: Ryan Gosling, Matthew McConaughey and Kellan Lutz! Try not to melt your computer  
Jennifer Lopez says of American Idol, "It's time for me to go" ...  
Luke Bryan isn't the first to fumble through the Star Spangled Banner: See who else has stumbled through the song!  
Spotted at ComicCon: Nikki Reed and Paul McDonald, plus more details from the Twilight party!  
PHOTO: Jessica Biel goofs off with Tim Tebow and Jeremy Lin at the ESPY Awards  
Suri bravely feeds zoo animals (photo!) plus more on her and mom Katie Holmes's life now in NYC  
Maura Tierney opens up to PEOPLE about her breast cancer battle:  
PHOTO: Cat Cora arrested for DUI, cooks up nice mug shot:  
X Factor judges talk about the "horrible" audition that caused Britney and others to walk off the set  
We're at #ComicCon! Check  to see who posed in the PEOPLE/Warner Bros. photo booth—you might see some familiar faces! 
Queen Latifah says she's "totally serious" about adopting a child  
It's our pleasure to keep you updated! 
She's just being Miley! The singer sports a new forearm tattoo  
Robin Thicke crashes his Porsche, gets ride home from cops. (FYI: Someone cut him off. Was NOT a DUI.)  
EXCLUSIVE: Sneak peek at Alec and wedding photos - more in this week's issue!  (via 
Happy hump day! Here's a shirtless photo of Kellan Lutz on Miami Beach. :)  
Get celeb trainer Harley Pasternak's (legitimately healthy) smoothie recipe  
Harry Potter stars Bonnie Wright and Jamie Campbell Bower call off their engagement  
Tom Cruise is photographed on set—and he's officially taken his ring off.  
Booted Bachelorette contestant says he thought he was going to marry Emily. (Spoiler alert: He won't.)  
How did Katie Holmes take back control of her 'way of life'?  
Sofia Vergara got a big ring from her boyfriend -- but is she engaged?  
The always charming stops by People TV to chat about his new show Partners and film a People ta  
PHOTO: Scarlett Johansson sunbathes with her 'security guard.' Her ripped, tan, in teeny-weeny-shorts security guard.  
Cake Boss star Buddy Valastro's mom diagnosed with ALS  
Actor Peter O'Toole announces his retirement  
Britney Spears storms off X Factor set after contestant, partially in drag, performs one of her hits.  #SashayAway 
PHOTO: Prince Harry goes body-boarding with Prince William  
Savannah Guthrie survives her first-day "hazing" on the Today show  
Good one! 
Michael Phelps talks about his final Olympics—and shows off his abs. Be honest, you know why you're going to click #abs  
Get your singles ready, mates! The (very sexy) Channing Tatum steps out in London.  
Tom Cruise returns to work after divorce deal  
Who has better taste than Jessica Biel? She says who picked out her engagement ring solo!  via 
Will gives Jada the look of love on #charitywater trip - exclusive pics #cita -  #happybirthday 
Tom Cruise split settlement: Suri Cruise will live primarily with mom Katie Holmes.  
POLL: Sound off on the suitors you think should be The Bachelorette's final two!  
It's a scene straight out of Speed: A bus crashes into set of Sandra Bullock's new movie, sends several to the hospital  
Grey's Anatomy star Sara Ramirez is married! Congrats!  
Philip Seymour Hoffman cast as Plutarch Heavensbee in Catching Fire  
Need something fun to laugh at this Monday? How about these pics of Katy Perry's wackiest bras? Her cups runneth over!  
Katie Holmes's attorney issues a statement on her divorce settlement:  
UPDATE: Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes reach a divorce settlement  
Recipe: Try the Yankee Doodle, a refreshing coconut/lime cocktail!  
Tom Cruise, Katie Holmes release joint statement regarding Suri, divorce negotiations  
Congrats to Barney Frank! The U.S. Representative is the first member of Congress to marry same-sex partner  
PHOTO: Taylor Lautner, Patrick Schwarzenegger on the set of Grown Ups 2  
Brad Pitt's brother Doug talks about his viral Virgin Mobile ad, admits "I do have a 'man room'"  
Sneak Peek: The Real Housewives of O.C.'s explosive reunion!  
Kourtney Kardashian & Scott Disick welcome baby Penelope Scotland!  
Katie Holmes is going back to work and filming a movie about a single mom that she co-wrote:  
Oscar winner Ernest Borgnine has died. He was 95:  
Michael Phelps's mom opens up about his emotional final Olympics. Will you be watching him?  
Roger Federer beats Andy Murray and takes home his seventh Wimbledon title! Were you watching? 
Bachelorette sneak peek! Will Sean tell Emily he loves her? Exclusive clip:  
Kate & Pippa cheer on Andy Murray at Wimbledon:  
Rachel McAdams is looking very pregnant on the set of her new movie! (It's just a fake bump, though):  
Hot photo! Ryan Reynolds smooches Blake Lively in a bathing suit:  
Inside Tom Cruise & Katie Holmes's divorce negotiations. Get all the details:  
Congrats! The Office's Ellie Kemper is married:  
Katie Holmes's Favorite Curried Chicken Salad: Get the Recipe!  
PHOTO: A smiling Angelina Jolie arrives in Sarajevo with her kids:  
Sofia Vergara is celebrating her 40th birthday in Mexico. Get all the details:  
Yuck! George Clooney and Stacy Keibler get food poisoning in Italy:  
Katie Holmes and Tom Cruise's lawyers are working on a divorce settlement, a source tells us:  
Katie Holmes visits her divorce lawyer in New York
  
It's 5 O'Clock Somewhere: Beat the Heatwave with a 'Sparkling' Cosmo  
is it Pup-sicle time yet!?! #Ff for more adorbs pics #staycool  
Cute! here's how to submit your adorable pup to  
stars sans stripes #4thofjulyfever Who wore the #wildfox sweater best? cc  
What Would Suri's Life Be Like in Scientology?  
Do Seth Meyers and Kelly Ripa have Live! chemistry?  
See how Jessica Simpson celebrated the 4th of July with her baby!  
#throwbackthursday to this time last night: #fireworks #july4th Celebrate all week!  
Meet the double amputee track star who will compete at the Olympics:  
Could be! RT (Re: Tori) I suspect she somehow was ensnarled in that crochet swimsuit she wore at one point. #yikes 
PHOTO: Sneak a peek at Jen Garner and Ben Affleck's son Samuel!  
Ouch! Tori Spelling spends the holiday in a wheelchair:  
Another emotional, inspirational blog from  
Happy 27th!! RT Ashley Tisdale brought her dog to her birthday beach party  
Awww sweet moment caught on tape: Chris Martin beelines thru crowd to kiss during Miami concert  
Kate looks stunning (as usual) at Prince William's knighting ceremony in Scotland:  
Cute family photo by Britney Spears in Hawaii:  
Did Katie Holmes hint at her divorce in a new interview? Check it out, and tell us what you think:  
celebrating the 4th in style #fireworks #finale #nyc cc  
Happy birthday, America! #july4 #nyc #fireworks #independence  
Where are you watching fireworks tonight? Send us your pics #PeopleFireworks 
Tom Cruise Spent Somber 50th Birthday in L.A. 
  
PHOTO SPECIAL: From Tom Cruise to George Jetson, see who's turning 50!  
There's another royal wedding in the works!  
Happy birthday, America! How are you celebrating Fourth of July? 
Happy 4th to all the independent ladies out there!  
Prince William and Kate watch Roger Federer at Wimbledon:  
Independence Day takes on a whole new meaning ... How Katie Holmes secretly planned her split from Tom Cruise:  
Looks delish! #july4th RT Thanks for the great idea!  
who is ready for bbq? Meet Mickey (and more Pet-riotic Pups!)  #july4th #fou  
PHOTO: #Bachelor no more - ties the knot:  
Cheers! Shake up this yummy grapefruit cocktail as you get ready to celebrate July 4th!  
All about Katie Holmes's toughest defender: Her lawyer dad, Martin  
Bachelor Pad 3's final contestant revealed!  
PHOTO: Snooki pushes a baby stroller full of beer.  #stayclassy 
The Bachelorette update: Emily blogs about her hometown dates.
  
Lindsay Lohan channels Elizabeth Taylor as Cleopatra on the set of her Lifetime biopic. Does she pul  
Check out J.K. Rowling's new book cover—will you read The Casual Vacancy?  
RARE PHOTO: Victoria Beckham smiles! (Well, you would too if you were posing with a dolphin)  (via 
PHOTO: Matthew Fox's mug shot taken  
PEOPLE remembers Andy Griffith, who died at 86 today  
Alec Baldwin shuts down his Twitter page  
How is Tom Cruise spending his 50th birthday Tuesday?  
Ellen DeGeneres, Kathy Griffin, NPH and more stars congratulate Anderson Cooper for coming out  
Simon Cowell says he's fascinated by Britney Spears's shy demeanor on X Factor  
Inside the Scientology mystery surrounding Katie & Tom's split:  
Katie Holmes keeps her commitment to appear on Project Runway, arrived at Parsons today to tape the episode  
And you thought Casey Anthony couldn't get any more shocking...she's now wearing Caylee's ashes around her neck.  
Katie Holmes, Tom Cruise update: The actress's lawyer father came to NY to help orchestrate her decision to leave:  
"I'm gay ... and proud"—Anderson Cooper comes out in a statement  
PHOTO: Kristen Stewart's fragrance ad for Balenciaga (via  
Nastia Liukin thanks fans for support after failing to make the U.S. Olympic team.
  
It's Lindsay Lohan's 26th birthday! Watch her morph from child star to the Lindsay we know today.  
Check out the inside story on Katie Holmes's shocking decision to leave Tom  
Phillip Phillips Reveals Details of Year-Long Kidney Crisis
  
Adrienne Maloof Describes Fear, Scramble from Neighbor's Mansion Fire.  
Heroes Among Us: Meet the college students who are helping others battling anorexia fight the disease.  
Katie Holmes and Suri find a new apartment while Tom Cruise remains in Iceland.  
Change up your summer look with star-tested beauty tips from Olivia Wilde, Victoria Beckham & more (via  
Check out the Alec Baldwin bride Hilaria Thomas's diamond drop earrings for the wedding.  
Alec Baldwin & Hilaria Thomas Are Married!  
Check out 12 adorable photos of Emma Stone & Andrew Garfield, being super-stylish (and super-cute):  
Inside Melissa Joan Hart's Baby Shower.  
Seeing Magic Mike? Make it rain in your living room with our quiz of celeb strippers! (We promise lots of hot pics!)  
SURI PHOTO SPECIAL: From makeup to chopper rides, see Suri's big-girl adventures  
Are you on Pinterest? Follow us for celeb-approved recipes & more:  
VIDEO: Joe Manganiello talks about his stripper moves. Also, it's fun to watch him talk about stuff.  
PEOPLE's movie critic reviews Ted, says it's "funny enough." Are you going to see it this weekend?  
Interviewing about her amazing Fall 2012 Collection…stay tuned to for more!  
Katie Holmes wants full custody of Suri Cruise  
PHOTO SPECIAL: Tom & Katie's whirlwind courtship—from first date to engagement in 2 months  
Flashback: Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes's wedding photos  
:) 
That's awesome! Thanks for sharing! 
PHOTO SPECIAL: Take a look back at Tom, Katie & Suri's jet-setting life  
Exclusive: Tom Cruise "deeply saddened" by Katie Holmes's decision to file for divorce. Read his full statement:  
Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes: "Katie's primary concern remains, as it always has been, her daughter's best interest."  
It's official: Savannah Guthrie named Today's new co-host  
EXCLUSIVE: Tom Cruise & Katie Holmes are divorcing. #PeopleExclusive  
You're welcome! cheers #tgif 
Know someone affected by the Colorado wildfires? Even if you don't, you can help!  
#FF our pals 
Chaz Bono to play himself on Degrassi  
PHOTO: Charlize Theron shows off her shaved head  
Channing Tatum exposes the toughest part of filming 'Magic Mike'  
Alex Trebek opens up about heart attack -- how his wife reacted.  
Britney Spears calls former Menudo singer "very sexy" at X Factor auditions  
Kick back with these summer drinks that have fun names like Salty Chihuahua and La Pinta Royale  
PHOTO: Sneak peek of Jenny McCarthy's Playboy shoot. (It's strategically cropped—c'mon, we're a family mag)  
Pregnant Snooki takes a tumble in her platforms:  
PHOTO: Bill Clinton, wedding crasher? Check out the former POTUS posing with the bride & groom at a wedding in Ireland  
Are you on Pinterest? Follow us for celeb-approved recipes & more:  
Miley Cyrus says Australian guys are "way hotter" than Americans  
Dolphin terrorizing residents near Louisiana's Lake Pontchartrain. Seriously.  (via #FlipperFlipped 
Jessica Simpson says she's losing the baby weight for her—not because she's under pressure from Weight Watchers  
Reality star who is battling ovarian cancer, blogs about egg retrieval surgery prep:  #inspiring 
Have you had a celeb encounter? and did! Check it out, and tweet us your celeb sightings #CITA  
David Beckham fails to make British Olympic team, still looks amazing shirtless.  
Tearful Ann Curry announces she will no longer co-host Today Show:  
Mom-to-be Vanessa Lachey talks about her baby bump and popping belly buttons:  
she amazed us! “@lesleymesser: I met w who is blogging her cancer battle for Honest, upbeat, thought-provoking” 
bravely sharing her 2nd battle w ovarian cancer is new People blogger - read her every thurs!  
Lucky Lady! (new blogger) goofs off w/ #MagicMike hunk Joe Manganiello in PEOPLE's  
PHOTO: Check out new mom Hilary Duff - with Baby Luca - looking great in a bikini!  
Any interest in seeing Alex Pettyfer strip? He's ready to:  #MagicMike 
Why she's the news director: RT am celeb magnet lately! Billy Joel in Sag, Liza Minnelli on UES and Al Pacino in the W Village 
VIDEO: Remembering Nora Ephron - 5 iconic scenes. Which was your fave?  
Spotted: Big Brother 13's Adam (@heavymetalteddy) eating (what else?) bacon at Elixers & Eats at Hudson Terr  
Kate Hudson tells PEOPLE she used to put blue eyeshadow on brother  (via 
Hey Jules! Thanks for your sighting! We're using it and it will be on the site tomorrow! 
PHOTO: Al Roker slips a single into Channing Tatum's waistband  
That's great! :) 
Love this! We're going to use your sighting! What did you (and Rod) order? 
Thanks for the tip! 
That's awesome! Thanks for sharing! 
Thanks!! 
Events & appearances are good—and pics would be fab! Thanks! 
PHOTO: Andrew Garfield may not have Spider-Man's moves on the bball court, but we <3 him anyway. So do you. Don't lie.  
Absolutely! We'll reserve you a cube with a view :) 
Meet Alessandra Ambrósio's new little guy, Noah Phoenix:  (via 
Celeb trainer Harley Pasternak breaks down why Master Cleanse, the Cookie Diet and others don't work:  
Casey Anthony's lawyer says his former client has "serious mental health issues" in new book.  
if you guessed Joe Manganiello, you'll swoon over this shot #magicmike  
Katy Perry admits that watching footage for her movie was "not always very fun"  
Guess which Magic Mike hunk is in the PEOPLE TV studio?  
Meryl Streep, Tom Hanks and more pay tribute to Nora Ephron  
Bye bye, mashed potatoes! Paula Deen discusses losing 30 lbs. by eating healthier:  
Nora Ephron has died, according to reports.  
PHOTO: Jessica Simpson shares a picture of Maxwell!  
PEOPLE's music critic reviews Maroon 5's latest album. Will you buy it?  
Nice reference! "What is she doing? I never know what she's doing!" 
Virgin Diaries clip: Skippy, 34, is looking for love. He lives in his mom' basement, tho—and it's not down there.  
Spice Girls special: Slide over the photos to see their style then—and now! (via  
Get to know Joanne Froggatt of Downton Abbey (a.k.a., Anna Bates)  
Thanks! 
Lisa Kudrow (@lisakudrow) drops by PEOPLE TV to talk about her new show Web Therapy. And she brought the lul  
;) 
Jennifer Lawrence helps a woman who passes out in street. Guess the odds were ever in her favor that Katniss was near.  
And it's a FABULOUS quiz! 
PEOPLE's movie critic didn't quite love Brave. See the review here:  
Thanks for playing for us! :) 
LOL! 
Ashley Tisdale...badass biker babe? Yup, it's true! See the pic:  
Kate Middleton's wardrobe budget? $55k a year! Do you think that's high—or low for a duchess?  
Bachelorette update: Emily blogs about the "mess in Prague"  
The inside story of late Spartacus star Andy Whitfield's fan-funded documentary on his cancer battle:  
"I think he can find a lot worse available on the Internet these days"—mom Jenny McCarthy on posing for Playboy again  
YOTO #YouOnlyTweetOnce RT yeah, I just said yolo 
Rielle Hunter says she and John Edwards have broken up. Again.  
PHOTO: Megan Fox debuts her baby bump  
Spice Girls reunited for a musical of their songs  #zigazigah 
Spot a celebrity? Tweet us your sighting with #CITA and it could appear on  
Police determine Dylan McDermott's mother was murdered:  
PHOTO: Cute couple alert - Michelle Williams and Jason Segel spotted out in NYC:  
thousands of jeans take over the conference room! excited for denim awards!  
John Travolta sued by cruise worker for alleged sex attack:  
Did 11-year-old Willow Smith get her tongue pierced?  
You're welcome! Looks delish. 
Are Miley and Liam getting married soon? Click here to find out:  
R. Kelly recalls meeting Michael Jackson #RIP3yearstoday - first look at his new memoir #soulacoaster  
PHOTO: Paris Jackson gets bangs (via  
Fun deets on celeb-filled wedding in NJ Saturday -- RPatz DJ'd, Zac Efron danced, KStew rocked borrowed & blue -  
Bravo says Jill Zarin is definitely not coming back to Real Housewives of NYC despite rumors:  
FIRST LOOK: Jenny McCarthy's hot-at-39 Playboy cover. Check it out:  
Karen Klein, the bullied bus monitor, reveals how she's going to spend her (almost) $650,000 in donations:  
NCIS: Los Angeles's Eric Christian Olsen Is a Married Man!  
Happy Pride NYC!!  
Are you going to watch the premiere of HBO's new show, The Newsroom? 
what's up #governorsball peeps? you catch Fiona Apple!! #criminal #vip  
#governorsball backstage VIP aka "freeloader's lounge" w/ peligroso tequila, crumbs cupcakes, vino & vodka  
Is Jef Holm a good match for #TheBachelorette? Read what he thinks:  
Jeopardy's Alex Trebek suffers a second heart attack:  
Meet the doctor who still charges just $5 a visit:  
Back to the grind tomorrow—need a smile? Check out the past 10 winners of the World's Ugliest Dog contest. Feel better?  
Sharon Osbourne says outpouring of support for Jack has been "amazing"  #multiplesclerosis 
Celebrate #Pride with these fun summer cocktails:  
Tom Brady on his crazy hairstyle: "If you like it, do it."  (via 
Watch John Mayer's final performance before granuloma return here:  
happy Saturday! “@turbotales: just ran into at #beaconsagharbor best sunset in town  
Snooki was afraid to tell her father that she was pregnant:  
PHOTO: See Jacob meet Renesmee:  
VIDEO: #Suits star Patrick J. Adams on other people dressing him:  
Penelope Ann Miller reconciles with husband, calls off separation:  
PHOTO: Cleavage alert! Jessica Simpson shows off her best assets while strolling with Maxwell:  
Barbara Walters teases Justin Bieber's fans, plus read more of the best quotes of the week:  
Happy Pride Weekend to everyone celebrating! 
See Julianne Hough's new short 'do here:  (via 
Are the Kardashian sisters spoiled? Find out what they told Oprah:  
Jerry Sandusky has been found guilty on 45 of 48 counts:  
Aaron Johnson, 22, marries Sam Taylor-Wood, 45:  
Dick Cheney's daughter marries her partner. 
  
Jason Segel, Michelle Williams update: The actor is "totally smitten"  
This is a pic of a newborn tiger cub. I repeat, a newborn tiger cub. Can you handle the cute?  (via 
Katy Perry talks about her split from Russell Brand, hints that her career was a source of tension  
Notice on a GetGlue check-in:"You are The Dark Knight Rises." Thanks for the compliment, #ImBatman  
Notice on a GetGlue check-in:"You are The Dark Knight Rises." Thanks for the compliment, #ImBatman  
Cuteness overload: Jack Osbourne snuggles with his daughter and sister  
PHOTO: Justin Bieber has a new tattoo. It doesn't say Dude or Sweet, although that would have been AWESOME.  
James Marsden reportedly expecting a child with a Brazilian model.  
PHOTO: Joe Manganiello shows off a Homer Simpson-style beer gut, still manages to look ridiculously sexy.(Sorry, Homer)  
Hillary Clinton sports Cee Lo-style purple shades and Mardi Gras beads for swearing in ceremony.  
From the ballroom to the hot tub: Cheryl Burke wants to be The Bachelorette.  
The bullied bus monitor gets some apologies from the kids  
because you asked for it ... kicks #closeup courtesy  
nap time w on #youtubepresents (we'd cuddle up to that!) cc  
front row for #youtubepresents w  
Exclusive: Anne Hathaway's convict ex, Raffaello Follieri, tells PEOPLE he wanted to marry her.  
Jerry Sandusky's adopted son says he's a victim, too.  
Spot a celebrity? Tweet us your sighting with #CITA and it could appear on  
SPONSORED TWEET: Text "Diet Coke" to 711711 for a chance to see in #NYC.  
Wynonna Judd ties the knot:  
#WhileTwitterWasDown we updated our Tumblr  
Twitter is back! Read ALL THE TWEETS!! 
MTV reality star Diem Brown talks to PEOPLE about her cancer diagnosis & hopes for a baby  
Cutest story! Brandon Jacobs (@gatorboy45) makes good on his promise to a 6-yr-old fan, takes him out for a fun day  
It's the longest day of the year! Check out our playlist of summer jams #DJPeoplemagInTheHouse #SummerSolstice  
Halle Berry to pay Gabriel Aubrey a reported $20k in child support  
School bus monitor Karen Klein, who was bullied and harassed by students in viral video, talks about the incident:  
Prince William turns 30: See his early pics with Diana, dreamy teen years when we all wanted to marry him & more:  
Our TV critic gives a (pretty hilarious) review of Snooki & Jwoww. Will you watch the show?
  
Send your good tidings to Prince William, who turns 30 on today! Tweet #WilliamTurns30 and your reply could appear on  
Get an inside look at Johnny Depp's single life  
best listening party ever. #pressyacht #route80 #hudsonriver check out at #warped2012 this su  
Empire state from the Hudson #pressyacht #nofilter best place to beat this heat!  
Jack Osbourne update: The 26-year-old says he doesn't know if he'll lose his vision again  
Send your good tidings to Prince William, who turns 30 on June 21! Tweet #WilliamTurns30 
PHOTO: Heidi Klum (@heidiklum) poses in lingerie—on a pile of scissors!—for new Project Runway ad  
Glad you enjoyed it! :) 
Phillip Phillips talks about his recovery from surgery, admits not being able to do much has him "going crazy"  
Vintage video clip: 11-year-old Ryan Gosling sings "When a Man Loves a Woman" — & then dances to "Everybody Dance Now"  
:D 
Who cares if he's fictional? Today is Edward Cullen's birthday. Sparkle on, playa. 
Because we love you, and because it's hump day (holla!), here are 10 hot photos of Joe Manganiello.  
Guess who tops the list of the highest-paid actresses in Hollywood?  
Britney Spears talks about her role on X Factor, says "I'm a fair judge"  
Breaking Dawn 2 full trailer released! RT if you're going to see it opening night!  
VIDEO: Andy Cohen attacked by a bird on Real Housewives reunion  
Jack Osbourne tells how he discovered he has Multiple Sclerosis  
In the mood for a snack. What to get from  vending machine?  
Johnny Depp update: He and Vanessa Paradis "tried for months to save the relationship"  
Me neither! 
PEOPLE's music critic reviews Believe. Find out what he has to say about the singer's new album!  
The Secret Life of an American Teenager Star ties the knot!  
Girl wakes from coma after hearing Adele song  
I unlocked the Couch Potato(10) sticker on  
Transexual Against Me! singer Laura Jane Grace (formerly Tom Gabel) gives first interview since her transition  
Johnny Depp and Vanessa Paradis have split:  
PHOTO: Alec Baldwin has an altercation with a photographer  
L.A. Kings goalie Jonathan Quick talks about his scene-stealing daughter Madison  
*stares at you, chin up, Larry David-style* 
You're very welcome! 
"She was born, not bitten!"—See the Breaking Dawn 2 teaser trailer!  
PHOTO: Prince William feeds a black rhino by hand  
"Darth Vader Kid" Max Page is back home after having heart surgery. We're so glad he's home safe!  
Check out Angelina Jolie as evil queen Maleficent in Sleeping Beauty. She's very horny—literally!  
Check out Bobby Brown's wedding photo!  
Bethenny Frankel opens up about her miscarriage  
Sharon Osbourne opens up about son Jack's illness on The Talk  
John Taylor and Simon Le Bon (@duranduran) make the day of video producer Caryn Midler and Pets Editor Amy J  
Britney tears up when a contestant she knows auditions for X Factor
  
Jack Osbourne thanks fans for their support after revealing that he has multiple sclerosis  
Rielle Hunter reveals the "hidden life" of John Edwards in new tell-all  
PHOTO: Gisele Bundchen shows off her baby bump in Brail  
The Killing's murderer was finally revealed! Find out what s/he has to say about last night's finale. (SPOILERS!)  
A post-surgery Phillip Phillips is playing the guitar again!  
Sir Paul McCartney turns 70 today! Happy birthday! 
Happy Monday! Here's a photo of Chris Hemsworth at the beach to help you start your week right!  
Kim Kardashian talks to Oprah about how she now embraces her mistakes—including the sex tape that made her a star  
Check Out Prince William Kissing His & Kate's Dog!  
Click the link for an exclusive sneak peek at tomorrow night's Bachelorette and RT if you'll be watching!  
Jack Osbourne tells PEOPLE he has multiple sclerosis  
Jennie Garth Tweets a sweet Happy Father's Day message to Peter Facinelli  
Actress Meagan Good weds DeVon Franklin -- see their first kiss here!  
Check out these delicious drinks for Dad on Father's Day  
Father's Day Special: Find out the best advice Liv Tyler, Brad Pitt and more stars got from their dads!  
Rodney King is dead, according to reports  
Happy Father's Day! RT if you've got the best dad in the world <3 
A stage collapse before the Radiohead concert in Toronto kills one and injures at least three more, according to reports... 
A week after being hospitalized, Prince Philip steps out with the Queen, William & Kate  
Lindsay Lohan explains why she was treated by seven "cute" paramedics  
Matthew McConaughey's wedding issue of PEOPLE is out! Tweet pics of you & your issue w/ #MattCover & you could be on  
PHOTO SPECIAL: Hollywood dads (and their daughters!). See Harper Beckham, Suri Cruise and more cuties with doting dads:  
The Duchess of Cambridge hosts kids at a production of The Lion, the Witch and the Wardrobe  
Hamptons bound w on #stndair - first time for  editor  
Kim Kardashian tells Oprah, "I'm totally growing up"  
Foodie Friday! Meet MasterChef winner our new blogger & get her tips on grilling a steak perfectly  
Lindsay Lohan update: She is suffering from "exhaustion and dehydration"  
from "la pinta pomegranate" to $250/shot "ultra" (black bottle!) made our Friday afternoon #grac  
Lindsay Lohan taken to hospital after being found unconscious at Ritz-Carlton hotel  
Aww! Julianne Hough tells Ryan Seacrest "I love you" on-air.  
It's Neil Patrick Harris's birthday! Think we can get #HappyBdayNPH trending? 
Need a last-minute gift for dad? We've got you covered with our Father's Day gift guide: 
  
Fun for Friday: Match the celebrity to their famous derriere!  
Donny Osmond finds out on live TV that he's going to be a grandfather—for the fifth time!  
*breaks arm patting self on back* 
So glad he's going to be okay! 
Watch Jamie Lynn Spears sing a song about her big sis, Britney:  
Look at that smile! The (very handsome) Trey Songz drops by PEOPLE to preview songs from Chapter V.  
Moesha & The Parkers star Yvette Wilson has died  
"Darth Vader Kid" Max Page is doing fine after heart surgery  
Father's Day Special: From playing hoops & hitting the beach to batting practice, meet the most hands-on star dads!  
Project Runway is back! And Heidi Klum is proud that it's the show's 10th anniversary. Meet the new designers:  
See Kate & Her Dog Lupo Taking a Walk in the Park!  
Ginnifer Goodwin can do no wrong! #younghollywood #gorgeous cc on the carpet for People  
Young Hollywood Awards!?!? Rico Rodriguez from Modern Family looks all grown up  
PHOTO: Matthew Morrison shaves his head! Bye, bye, curls! (via  
Randy Fenoli (@randyfenoli) & People's at the launch party for his new show, Randy to the Rescue  
Maybe for your birthday we can get #HappyBdayNPH trending! 
Chris Brown injured in bar attack; Drake's rep denies involvement.  
Dallas recap: What did you think of last night's premiere?  
Rumor Patrol: The guy Miley Cyrus was hanging out with in Miami? Just a friend.  
We're obsessed with the Wakefield twins! RT Fowler was born to be a reality TV star.  
SPONSORED TWEET: is back with the answer everyone has been waiting for. Don’t miss the premiere tonight 10/9c on 
Mark Wahlberg to earn his high school diploma online  
Suits star Patrick J. Adams (@halfadams) and People TV's video producer have a simultaneous Instagram moment  
Forget about pricy designers! Camila Alves had a 78-yr-old family friend design her wedding gown  
Watch a sneak peek of Kim Zolciak's (drama-filled!) big day from Don't be Tardy for the Wedding!  
HBO apologizes after putting George W. Bush's head on a stake in Game of Thrones  
Know an inspiring teacher? Nominate them for PEOPLE's Teacher of the Year Award! Details here—and please RT:  
Find out who's competing on Bachelor Pad 3:  
Tom Cruise Says That 3 Kids Are Enough!  
John Edwards trial update: Justice Department drops all charges  
Meghan McCain says she doesn't use cannabis "frequently"  
Find out the sweet way Matthew McConaughey proposed—and get the scoop on Camila's wedding look!  
Jennifer Love Hewitt's mother has died  
PHOTO: Anna Faris shows off her baby bump!  
You guys really (I mean, REALLY) want to look at this shirtless photo of Joe Manganiello from True Blood/Magic Mike  
Trainer Harley Pasternak (the man behind Rihanna & Katy's bods) is blogging for PEOPLE! Get his No. 1 fitness tip:  
PEOPLE has named the 12 Hottest Bodies of 2012! See Joe Manganiello, Rihanna and the other stars who made the list:  
Inspiring! WWII vet, 85, graduates from college  
Casey Anthony gives a new interview, says she's "ashamed" of the person she was but insists she did not kill Caylee  
Max Page, 7-yr-old who played Darth Vader in the Super Bowl Volkswagon commercial, is set to have open-heart surgery  
Check out the first look at Matthew McConaughey and Camila Alves's wedding photo!  
PEOPLE's music critic, Chuck Arnold, gives Usher's Looking 4 Myself 3 1/2 stars out of a possible 4! Review here:  
PHOTO: Avril Lavigne half-shaves her head (via  
Jada Pinkett Smith has wedding advice for Miley Cyrus  
David Arquette has filed for divorce from Courteney Cox, asks for joint custody of their daughter  
The new cast of Dallas — Julie Gonzalo, Josh Henderson‚ Jordana Brewster and Jesse Metcalfe — stop by PEOPLE  
Missed LuAnn and Ramona's Real Housewives smackdown? Watch it here:  
And looking good! RT Tim and on the new cover of !  
Andrew Garfield says girlfriend Emma Stone keeps him on his toes  
Being single looks good on her! Elin Nordegren shows off her (flawless) bikini body  
PHOTO: Matthew McConaughey steps out wearing his wedding ring.  
PHOTO SPECIAL: See pics of Blake, Carrie and more stars at the CMA Music Festival  
Gone with the Wind actress Ann Rutherford dies at 94  
That sounds delicious! #jealousofyourkitchen 
Thank you for sharing your story! 
Coroner rules that a dingo did, indeed, steal 9-week-old Azaria Chamberlain in the Australian outback  
It's National Peanut Butter Cookie Day! What's your favorite cookie? 
Bachelorette Emily Maynard blogs about losing her temper—and what she thinks of Kalon  
Robin Roberts Slept Well for First Time Since MDS Diagnosis  
Trace Cyrus and Brenda Song call off their engagement and end their relationship  
Expectant mom Snooki hits club Karma  
Gymnast Dominique Moceanu opens up about reconnecting with her secret sister, says she felt a "primal loss"  
Suri Cruise was freaked out by Tom Cruise's Rock of Ages guyliner look  
Really? That's amazing! 
Jen Aniston & Justin Theroux take a romantic trip to Paris #oohlala  
Britney on X Factor: Turns out, she's an "incredibly tough" judge.  
Make it work! Project Runway sent us these fab scissors. Now we want to head to Mood.  
Can you tell the real Karl Lagerfeld from his wax figure?  
Missed last night's True Blood premiere? Get a recap here (warning: SPOILERS!)  
Tommy Chong reveals that he has prostate cancer, says he's treating it with hemp oil and cannabis  
Good Morning America anchor Robin Roberts says she has bone-marrow disease:  
The Bachelorette: Inside Emily Maynard's Blow-Up over 'Baggage' Comment  
What did you think of the premiere of True Blood? 
First details about Matthew and Camila's at-home wedding, including what they wore:  
How Will and Jada will celebrate their upcoming 15th wedding anniversary:  
How Will and Jada will celebrate their upcoming 15th wedding anniversary:  
Katherine Heigl talks about being a mom to a newborn for the first time:  
Two Cool Summer Drink Ideas for National Iced Tea Day  
PHOTO SPECIAL: See Janet Jackson, Alec Baldwin and more stars who've transformed their bodies in our slimdown special!  
Ouch! Country singer David Nail breaks his finger playing softball with Carrie Underwood:  
Poor Cookie! Bethenny Frankel's dog has a bumpy start to life in LA:  
Matthew McConaughey and Camila Alves are married! You'll get all the details only in the upcoming issue of PEOPLE:  
Excited for the new season of #TrueBlood? Here's PEOPLE's review of the upcoming season:  
Producer, director, choreographer and matchmaker Adam Shankman recalls Miley and Liam's first kiss:  
Jordin Sparks shows off her new size-8 figure:  
Whoa! Joey Lawrence takes it off with the Chippendales in Las Vegas:  
Drew covers PEOPLE:  Tweet photos of you & your cover w/ #DrewCover & you could be on  
PHOTO SPECIAL: See LeAnn & Eddie, Beyonce & Jay-Z and more celeb couples showing off their (amazing) beach bodies:  
"Don't be fooled by the rocks that I got!" J.Lo (cleverly) denies engagement rumors:  
See Vanessa Lachey's growing baby bump:  
Details emerge from Fleetwood Mac star Bob Welch's suicide note: He didn't want to burden wife with his medical care  
Lindsay update: Her assistant suffered bruises and some bleeding, Lohan escapes serious injury  
PHOTO: Cher poses with her mom  
UPDATE: Santa Monica PD confirm Lindsay was not seriously injured in car crash. 
Lindsay Lohan hospitalized after car crash  
John Travolta makes first public appearance since sex scandal broke  
VIDEO: From striptease to yoga, see the best workout moves from Bethenny, Kendra, Kim and more:  
Prometheus gets 3 of 4 stars from PEOPLE's movie editor. Will you see it?  
#FF our pals 
Danica McKellar talks about her divorce, compares it to a death in the family  
Need some tunes for the beach this weekend? Check out PEOPLE's summer playlist on  
Food trucks outside the  offices. What's your favorite local food truck?  
6-yr-old fan sends piggybank savings to Brandon Jacobs (@gatorboy45) so he'll stay w/ the NY Giants. Cutest story ever  
Triple Crown hopeful I'll Have Another pulls out of Belmont Stakes  
It's a leg-off! Jen Aniston flashes some serious thigh—are you reading this,  
Gymnast Dominique Moceanu reveals a family secret: she had a sister given up for adoption, who was born without legs  
Scotty McCreery graduates from high school  
Model live-Tweets a drunken (and married) soap star's advances during a flight  
Mr. Rogers gets an auto-tune remix in "Garden of Your Mind."  #lovedhisshow #henriettapussycat #danielstripedtiger 
Get all the details on Drew Barrymore's custom Chanel wedding dress:  
Charlie Grogan of 'Bachelorette': I'm Better Than Those Other Guys  
Video Sneak Peek: Inside Drew Barrymore's wedding cover for PEOPLE  
Paris Jackson says she was "really confused" when her father Michael made her wear a mask  
Love her! The fabulous Mandy Moore stopped by for an interview with PEOPLE TV!  
CMT Awards: Check out the night's best moments, with Miranda Lambert, Kellie Pickler and more!  
Caroline Manzo talks about her support of her gay brother, whose wedding which will air on Real Housewives Sunday  
Get ready for summer with our Hottest Bodies special! Check out amazing celeb slimdowns and more here:  
PHOTO: Jessica Simpson steps out (sans baby), en route to the gym  
Hope you enjoy it! 
Love that. 
Phillip Phillips undergoes kidney surgery  #GetBetterPhillipPhillips 
Heroes Among Us: Meet Tim Harris, a diner owner with Down Syndrome who serves breakfast burritos (yum!) and hugs!  
PHOTO: Ryan Gosling and Eva Mendes go sightseeing at Niagara Falls #howromantic  
Missed the CMT Awards? See what Carrie Underwood, Miranda Lambert, Kristen Bell and more stars wore on the red carpet:  
Miley & Liam's families are "thrilled" over their engagement:  
See Joe Biden and Daughter Ashley Dance at Her Wedding  
#GoodCause RT Beyond #Oil Campaign Targets #TarSands In Video Narrated By Joshua Jackson:  #nokxl 
Here's your #CMT Awards rundown of all the night's big winners:  
Carrie Underwood and Brad Paisley's duet wins at CMT, but who does her husband hug first? Paisley! 
Danica McKellar of "The Wonder Years" files for divorce; seeks joint custody.  
Join PEOPLE's #CMT Music Awards pre-show & live blog starting RIGHT NOW!  
Actress playing Casey Anthony replaced in TV movie.  
Bethenny shoots down divorce rumors:  
We're in Nashville for tonight's #CMT Music Awards! Join PEOPLE's pre-show & live blog starting at 6:30pm ET!  
Got a burning question for tonight's CMT Awards? Reply with #CMTPeople and we might ask your q on the red carpet! 
Do you think Gisele could be expecting again? Take a peek at these photos:  
Debra Messing and her ex pledge an 'amicable' divorce:  
look who stopped by to share BiG news w - we ❤  
Amanda Bynes pleads "not guilty" in DUI case:  
PHOTO: Scout Willis steps out after her arrest in NYC:  
GALLERY: In celebration of their engagement, take a look back at Miley and Liam's love around the world:  
love! RT Drew Barrymore's wedding photos are out in this week's - what do you think of her dress?  
Would you watch Roberto as The Bachelor?  
RIP Ray Bradbury - What was your favorite book of his?  
Got a burning question for tonight's CMT Awards? Reply with #CMTPeople and we might ask your q on the red carpet! 
Why thank you! RT Following was such a good (and long overdue) decision! 
Taylor Swift's song made John Mayer "feel terrible," he tells Rolling Stone  
Watch the CMT Awards with  Check out our live pre-show, talk about the winners & more:  
See Drew Barrymore's Wedding Dress!  
Miley Cyrus, Liam Hemsworth Are Engaged!  
PHOTO: More Lindsay Lohan as Elizabeth Taylor (via  
Debra Messing officially files to end her marriage:  
Scout Willis's attorney tells PEOPLE her arrest for underage drinking was "ridiculous" - do you agree?  
Excited to share - check site in a.m.! RT Not gonna lie, totally excited to see Drew Barrymore wedding pics in 
Watching the CMT Awards tomorrow? Watch with us! Check out our live pre-show, blog with editors and more:  
Sheryl Crow diagnosed with a brain tumor  
Matthew Fox may enter alcohol treatment program in DUI case  
90210's Matt Lanter is engaged!  
The Queen's husband, Prince Philip, is in "good spirits" after being hospitalized with a bladder infection  
Richard Dawson was diagnosed with cancer three weeks before his death  
Bruce & Demi's daughter Scout Willis arrested in NYC  
Did you watch the Real Housewives of NYC last night? What did you think of the new ladies?  
great look! RT Telling Mary-Kate and Ashley apart just got a whole lot easier. MK is now a brunette!  
William & Kate take first carriage ride through London since their wedding - did you watch the #Jubilee?!  
SPONSORED TWEET: #KendraOnTop premieres tonight on at 10/9c! Check out the series sneak peek!  
The hysterical with Sean Parker as Shawn Fanning at the launch of their new video social networ  
Queen Elizabeth Celebrates Final Jubilee Day  
twin Bettys! can you tell which is the real  
PHOTO: Lindsay Lohan as Elizabeth Taylor—in a bathing suit  
President Obama writes absence note for fifth grader  
Prince Phillip rushed to hospital with bladder infection, will miss The Queen's Diamond Jubilee concert  
Reality star Kim Kardashian says she's trying to have "a little more private life."  
Hey One Direction fans! Have you picked up your special issue yet? Check out the cover:  
Unfortunately, it looks like we're going to be stuck with rain all week. Boo! 
Three things to know about Miss USA Olivia Culpo  
the new NY Housewives are in the house:  
Cute pic: Patrick Schwarzenegger poses with mom Maria Shriver at his high school graduation  
David Beckham says he wants to play for England in the Olympics  
PHOTO: Drew Barrymore & Will Kopelman exit their wedding the old fashioned way—in a car with streamers attached!  
Missed the MTV Movie Awards? See Emma Watson, Charlize Theron, Emma Stone & more of the night's most stylish stars:  
Bring us some coffee and you might have a deal! 
It's a rainy, gray day in NYC today.  
Inside Mark Ballas's Day (Top Hats! Curtsies!) with Queen Elizabeth  
love it! thanks for sharing RT Had to do it!  
what do you think of crazy ring collection? #movieawards #bling  
the always adorable Victoria Justice chatting w our own #mtvmovieawards  
Shawn Johnson announces retirement from gymnastics  #olympics 
last night on the highline Kevin Spacey IS 'the ventriloquist' for fun #jamesonfirstshot  
Love in the City of Lights! Knicks Star Amar'e Stoudemire gets engaged - exclusive details  
Check out Beyonce, Kelly Rowland & Gwyneth Paltrow enjoying the Jay Z, Kanye concert in Paris  
RIP Richard Dawson - Were you a Family Feud or Hogan's Heroes fan?  
Drew Barrymore, Will Kopelman tie the knot!  
So many weddings! Kelsey Grammer couldn't resist marrying wife Kayte a second time in Vegas  
Congrats! VP Joe Biden's daughter Ashley is married - all the details exclusively here ==>  
Happy day for - she married Blake Julian!  
Favorite 'Desperate Housewives' neighbor Kathryn Joosten has died  
Awwww Lance Bass on JT's upcoming wedding: expect sobs and songs  
Inside Drew Barrymore's rehearsal dinner - the guests and the goodies!  
Have you met One Direction? Send us a pic with them & it could appear on  Details here:  
Hitting the movies this weekend? Here's why Snow White and the Huntsman is the ticket to get!  
Excited for the Queen's Jubilee!? Try these Royal Cocktails  
See Brandon Jenner's romantic wedding pic from Hawaii  
Justin Bieber says his eyebrow is paralyzed after his mild concussion  
Rielle Hunter's tell-all memoir, "What Really Happened: John Edwards, Our Daughter, and Me," comes out this month  
Spotted near our NYC offices: a man playing an upright piano ... With a dog on top!  
Run for your life! It's PEOPLE's zombie apocalypse Spotify playlist!  
Brandon Jenner weds Leah Felder in Hawaii  
Meet Cheyenne Woods, who golfs just like Uncle Tiger  
PHOTO: Kim Zolciak takes off her wig  
menu features #rockstars #cheers #rockofages  
Paul McCartney, Elton John & more set to perform for The Queen's Diamond Jubilee concert  
Sister Wives family will not face bigamy charges  
Russell Brand Is Proud of His 'Sexy' Rock of Ages Kiss with Alec Baldwin  
Prince Charles remembers the day his mother became Queen. See the young royals:  
Do you agree with the verdict in the John Edwards case?  
John Edwards case update: Judge sends jury back to deliberate  
Martin Short talks about Kathie Lee interview, says "people make mistakes"  
Bus driver drops assault lawsuit against Matthew Fox  
PHOTO: Scarf-wearing pig spotted on a Pittsburg highway. What a ham!  
Cameron Diaz takes Drew Barrymore for her final wedding gown fitting at Chanel  
Norwegian teens go on a rampage for Justin Bieber; the singer pleads with them to calm down  
Haha! Louis is pretty cute. :) 
Get a sneak peek at Madonna's sexy tour costumes! (Via  
Hey One Direction fans—check out our special on the band! Who's your favorite?  
Jessica Simpson talks about losing the pregnancy weight, admits she's been known to "yo-yo diet"  
loved having in the studio this am #gorgeous #pinotforbreakfast!  
How Jessica Simpson Plans to Lose the Baby Weight  
Bones star Tamara Taylor finalizes her divorce  
Katie Lee Gifford asks Martin Short about his late wife during TV interview  
Spanish singer Alejandro Sanz is married.  
Rumor patrol: Ashton & Demi are not reuniting  
Good one! 
Behind-the-scenes at Jessica Simpson & Maxwell Drew's PEOPLE photo shoot!  
"Toxic" #InappropriateWeddingSongs 
Youngest contestant ever to compete in the National Spelling Bee—she's 6!  
PHOTO: Mark Wahlberg gets spray tanned—in his skivvies!  
Dharun Ravi ready to begin 30-day sentence in Rutgers University case  
Christian Bale says he once went on a date with...Drew Barrymore! They saw a "bloody awful" movie  
Hear Anne Hathaway sing in Les Miserables  
Prince William says he's "very keen" to start a family with Kate. Can we expect a royal baby soon?  
Meet her on the cover of PEOPLE! RT meet the prettiest lady in the world, Maxwell Drew Johnson  
glad you like! link fixed -->  
Exclusive Photo: Meet baby girl, Maxwell Drew (new link!)  
Mark Zuckerberg and Priscilla Chan take a honeymoon boat ride in Italy  
Skydiver, 81, cheats death during mid-air mishap.  
Flesh-eating bacteria victim finally speaks  
Kate joins the Queen (and 8,000 others!) for tea at Buckingham Palace  
PHOTO: Cynthia Nixon wears pale green on her wedding day  
PHOTO: Sienna Miller has a baby shower in London  
Prince William says he's sad his mother Diana never got to meet Kate  
Prince William says he's sad his mother Diana never got to meet Kate  
PHOTO: Jillian Michaels takes daughter Lukensia to the beach  
The Cult's Ian Astbury marries Aimee Nash in Las Vegas  
Jessica Biel talks about her upcoming marriage to Justin Timberlake  
Does Jessica Biel Make Better Cupcakes or Zucchini Fritters?  
Caught in the act! Pink and Carey Hart's Vegas Date night deets  
Will Smith & Jada Pinkett Smith Making Marriage Work After 15 Years
  
welcome and yum! RT Thanks for featuring "Smart Chefs" & on  today  
Prince William says THIS  is one of his favorite pics of him & the Queen #jubilee #royalgrandma 
Will a margarita do? happy Memorial Day! RT Will someone bring me a beer? 
Only has this great shot of Beast walking Mark Zuckerberg's bride down the aisle! #dogsrule  
How's Elizabeth Banks spending Memorial Day? Grilling, not sleeping:  
PHOTO: See recently-engaged Keira Knightley's new sparkler:  
No stilettos for #Duets star Kelly Clarkson:  (via 
Congratulations! Cynthia Nixon and Christine Marinoni Got Married Sunday  
Go behind the scenes of Katy Perry's tour -- with her sister:  
Olympian Dara Torres says she takes an Ambien the night before a big race:  
Kim & Khloe Kardashian admit: "We hated each other."  
Hot pictures! See your favorite stars in swimsuits!  
Michelle Obama takes her daughters to the Beyonce show in Atlantic City:  
Justin Timberlake & Jessica Biel had an engagement party in L.A. last night. Get all the details:  
J.Lo & Marc reunite on stage in Las Vegas -- then she goes dancing with Casper Smart:  
PHOTO SPECIAL: Kristen Stewart & Charlize Theron coordinate on the red carpet for Snow White's whirlwind tour  
Jason Trawick tells Britney Spears he's "proud" of her after X Factor auditions. Watch his sweet message:  
What movie are you guys seeing this weekend? Men in Black III? Avengers? 
Jenna Jameson arrested for suspected DUI in California:  
Jenny McCarthy is dating Chicago Bears linebacker Brian Urlacher:  
Will Smith is terrified of daughter Willow dating -- and says she can't do it until she's 40!  
Reese Witherspoon shows off her baby bump in a tight black dress at Cannes. See the photos:  
They said what? Get the best quotes of the week from Kelly Clarkson, Miley Cyrus, Mark Zuckerberg and more stars:  
Beyonce is back on stage! Get all the details (and see pictures) of her concert looks from Atlantic City:  
Kaela Humphries talks about how she changed her diet — and lost 40 lbs.
  
The Bachelorette's Joe Gendreau says he didn't click with Emily  
Beyonce says she is nervous about her first performance after having baby Blue Ivy.  
Pippa Middleton wears bright orange to a wedding in London. What do you think of this color on her?  
Keira Knightley is engaged to musician James Righton  
High school football star cleared of rape—10 years later  
Phillip Phillips says he hopes fans didn't vote for him to win Idol because he's a "cute guy"  
What's Queen Elizabeth like as a grandmother? She takes her grandkids raspberry picking!  
Robert Pattinson talks about a certain part of his anatomy's role in his new film, Cosmopolis  
PHOTO: Britney Spears makes her debut as X Factor judge!  
Which country star makes a cameo in Little Big Town's latest video?  
Duets Sneak Peek: Kelly Clarkson takes the stage with contestants  
Nicole Kidman, Zac Efron talk about their super-racy, half-nekkid new movie, The Paperboy  
"I still think she's just my grandmother." — Prince William on The Queen  
Phillip Phillips has had 8 operations during his American Idol run  
And delicious, too! 
We got a present from the Cake Boss!  
Eureka's Erica Cerra welcomes a daughter  
PHOTO: RPattz and KStew kiss in Cannes  
Man claims involvement in 33-year-old case of missing child Etan Patz  
Caught in the act! Kim & Kanye cuddle in Cannes  
Ace Young talks about how he planned his live proposal  
Michael McKean update: The actor is cracking jokes about "breaking a leg" after getting hit by a car in NYC  
'Idol' Winner Phillip Phillips Isn't Done Shedding Tears of Joy 
 
And the winner of American #Idol is ... SPOILER!  
Surprise! Guess who got engaged on stage at the #Idol finale tonight:  
It's finale night on #Idol! Which performances are you living for tonight? 
Jim Parsons comes out of the closet  
Getting a leg up or just a dismembered Marilyn!?! #cannes #random  
Phillip Phillips has a famous fan—in Jessica Simpson  
"No one likes to be not toned when you are dating someone." - Kelly Clarkson on how her beau is her workout inspiration  
Snooki's baby is going to be a ... boy! Yep, the reality star is having a mini-guido.  
Heidi Klum debuts a racy music video  
Justin Timberlake recording new music for Jessica Biel's new movie  
#people editor Mary Green gets papped greeting Brad Pitt at our #cannes shoot!  
Kristen Stewart talks about going topless in On the Road.  
PHOTO: Prince Charles, a DJ? Check out the royal behind the decks!  
VIDEO: Barry Gibb pays tribute to brother Robin  
Donald Driver: 'Dancing' Win Feels Like Winning Super Bowl
 
What Drove Mary Kennedy to Suicide?  
beautiful day for a boat ride #yachts #cannes  
SPOILER! Find out who won Dancing with the Stars:  #DWTS 
Our #Idol recap starring Phillip Phillips and Jessica Sanchez is here! Tell us who deserves to win:  
Now that and have each performed three songs at the #Idol finale, who will you be voting for? 
It's #Idol finale week! Who do you want to win it all, or 
DWTS: Donald Driver says his freestyle was the best. Do you agree?  
Suspect in Robyn Gardner disappearance arrested for indecent exposure.  
Channing Tatum talks about his past as a stripper, says he was a "fool in a stupid outfit"  
Missing teen cheerleader presumed murdered  
Camille Grammer returning to Real Housewives of Beverly Hills  
Olympian Lolo Jones says she can't find a boyfriend — because she's a virgin.  
Selena Gomez parodies 50 Shades of Grey  
Kelly Clarkson says that having a good relationship is making her write songs that sound like "butterflies & rainbows."  
Bar Refaeli makes an airline pilot's day  
Howard Stern makes 7-year-old rapper cry on America's Got Talent  
PHOTO: Groom-to-be Brad Pitt shows off his movie-star smirk in Cannes.  
Emily Maynard blogs about how hard it was to send someone home on The Bachelorette  
Whitney Houston's final recording is released. Hear it here:  
Prince William talks about the night before his wedding, says he slept for probably a half hour  
'Dancing' Finals: William Levy Can Take Len's Criticism
  
Who deserves to win #DWTS? Here's a recap of the top three's finale performances (spoiler!):  
Scott Wolf & Wife Expecting Their Second Child.  
Casey Anthony served with subpoena for a civil case  
Bar Refaeli tops Maxim's Hot 100 list. Do you agree with their choice?  
Guy Pearce #cannes #classact can do an interview, cocktail in-hand  
Green Day frontman Billie Joe Armstrong performs at Mark Zuckerberg's wedding  
Looking good! Elin Nordegren shows off her bikini bod.  
When Sean Penn arrived via Water Taxi to the Martinez- Z Plage dock he even handled his own luggage! #canne  
Dahrun Ravi sentenced to 30 days in Rutgers spying case  
Robert F. Kennedy fights with relatives over memorial for late wife Mary  
PHOTO: Mark Zuckerberg gets married—see Priscilla Chan's wedding gown  
Haha! Yes, a sloth would be awesome! 
Meet the winner of Celebrity Apprentice  
Toby Keith, Kristen Bell to host CMT Awards  
Nick Stahl Will 'Focus on Healing,' Says His Wife
  
Are you watching Billboard Awards or America's Got Talent tonight? 
Robin Gibb of the Bee Gees dies at age 62  
Nick Stahl enters rehab, says his wife, who is "elated"  
Watch Kristen Wiig's teary Saturday Night Live "graduation."  
Cover Flashback: Princess Diana in 1990 and Kate Today. See the royal similarities  
dude, where's my yacht? #rainysunday #cannes  
Game on! Check out Battleship, Clue, Super Mario Bros. and other movies based on famous games.  
How do you think Mick Jagger is doing on SNL so far? 
Mark Zuckerberg marries his longtime girlfriend. Check out our exclusive pic of the couple:  
Dancing with the Stars finalist Donald Driver opens up about his past of homelessness and drug dealing  
Missing actor Nick Stahl reaches out to friends, says he's entering rehab  
It's been 50 years since Marilyn Monroe sang happy birthday to President Kennedy.  pays homage:  
They said what? Get the 10 most outrageous celeb quotes of the week, from Matthew McConaughey, Britney Spears and more:  
we know the mime isn't saying anything, so what is Alec Baldwin saying to the mime!? #cannes  
Nick Stahl's Wife Tells PEOPLE She Fears Her Husband May Turn Up Dead.  
PHOTO: Transgender Miss Universe contestant shows off her (flawless!) bikini body  
Raven-Symone addresses rumors about her sexual orientation  
PHOTO: Micro-piglet hugs a strawberry, melts hearts.  #TooCuteForWords 
Donna Summer died of lung cancer, says source  
We're posting shots from Cannes, where, they're rolling out the red carpet (literally) for Madagascar 3.  
Bill Murray has a flirty night at a French bar while in Cannes. RT if you wish you could party with him!  
Woot! Hope you enjoy the issue! 
Noah Wyle talks about his son's reaction to his arrest:  
PHOTO: Pregnant Drew Barrymore heads out with her fiancé to Martha's Vineyard  
Prince Harry—a pop star?  
Jenny McCarthy posing for Playboy again—check her out then and now!  
Joshua Ledet Was 'Relieved' to Be Eliminated from 'American Idol' 
  
Spoiler! Find out who will sing in the #Idol finale:  
50 Cent hospitalized, Tweets photos from his bed  
PHOTO: Snooki shows off her baby bump  
Ethan Zohn celebrates Jenna Morasca's graduation. Congrats!  
PIC: Ben Stiller and David Schwimmer get photo-bombed in Cannes!  
Remembering Donna Summer: Listen to her greatest hits  
Queen of disco Donna Summer has died  
We're in Cannes! Here's the view at the Ritz Carlton, along the Croisette, across from the Mediterranean.  
PHOTO: Lea Michele, Cory Monteith smooch at a hockey game  
Rev. Marvin Winans, the pastor and gospel singer who gave Whitney Houston's eulogy, is carjacked in Detroit  
Robert F. Kennedy's estranged wife committed suicide by hanging  
Matthew McConaughey talks about going bare in Magic Mike, says it's not a "stunt a--."  
Bachelorette Emily Maynard talks about filming a reality show with her daughter  
Get the scoop on Reese Witherspoon's private tennis lesson in L.A.:  
Is this #Idol's closest race ever? Are you rooting for Josh, Jess or Phil? Spoiler:  
Nick Stahl is missing. What happened to him?  
Steven Powell—father-in-law of Susan Powell—convicted of voyeurism  
Janet Jackson talks about weight loss, says she doesn't weigh herself.  
Ooh la la! The Cannes Film Festival kicks off:  
First John Travolta accuser hires power attorney Gloria Allred  
Chicago bride found stabbed to death in her wedding dress.  
Elin Nordegren splits from boyfriend Jamie Dingman, is single again  
Not much to see here, just some really cute pictures of George Clooney on a beach with a dog. Awww!  
Actor Nick Stahl (Terminator 3) is missing, says his wife  
PHOTOS: Meet the world's oldest female bodybuilder  
Inside this week's issue: Kate's confident and sexier looks, Drew's engagement party, Travolta scandal details & more!  
SPOILER! #DWTS reveals its finalists in another shocking elimination. Did Katherine Jenkins survive?  
Tony Romo talks about how parenthood has changed his marriage  
Drew Barrymore celebrates her engagement with a bash in NYC's Hell's Kitchen  
Will J.Lo return to American Idol? "I don't know," she says. Read more:  
DWTS announces an All-Star Season. Who do you think should return to the ballroom?  
John Mayer opens up about his oversharing past, admits he did a lot of "dumb interviews"  
John Travolta's first accuser drops lawsuit  
Kate hits French Connection for some summer shopping—find out what she bought! (via  
Imagine if they did a duet together! 
Hey, Buffy fans! Check out the lovely wedding pic for cheerleader-turned-vampire Harmony (Mercedes McNab)!  
He sounds pretty good! 
Rock of Ages preview: Check out Tom Cruise singing "Pour Some Sugar on Me"  
Sorry, ladies! Michael Fassbender confirms that he's dating Shame costar Nicole Beharie  
Tom Cruise opens up about Scientology, Katie, and all those rumors about him:  
Missed last night's DWTS? Get a recap here:  
Jake Gyllenhaal parties with Jay-Z—and the rapper's' in-laws, the Knowles!  
Spoiler! Howard Stern shows he has a lot of heart on #AGT:  
Who watched The Bachelorette? Do you have a favorite guy for Emily yet? 
Spoiler! It's an emotional night in the ballroom - with some very high scores:  #DWTS 
How do you think Howard Stern is doing as a judge so far on America's Got Talent? 
PHOTO SPECIAL: American Idol's final three return home  
Demi Lovato says she is "stoked" to join Britney Spears on the X Factor  
"It's going to be so much fun and so different from anything I've ever done"—Britney Spears, with Demi Lovato, about being an X Factor judge 
PHOTO: Josh Hutcherson steps out after having nose surgery  
Emily Maynard talks about her first-night jitters on The Bachelorette. Will you watch?  
Thank you for reading! :) 
Thank you for reading! :) 
John Travolta lawsuit update: Lawyer for second accuser promises a "hell of a fight"  
PHOTO: Johnny Depp meets his Japanese impersonator. Do you think they look alike?  
PHOTO: Check out Ashton Kutcher in character as Steve Jobs for new biopic.  
Jessica Simpson launches a maternity line. What do you think of the looks? (via  
Cutest photo ever? Prince Harry rubs noses with Lupo, the royal puppy.  
Donald "Duck" Dunn, bassist for Booker T. and the MGs and the Blues Brothers, has died  
Carrie Underwood & Brad Paisley are going to perform at the CMT Awards  
Sarah Hyland talks about getting a kidney transplant  
'Desperate Housewives' Finale Proves Classically Desperate 
 
What a Mother's Day gift! A baby girl for Bravo's Rosie Pope.  
Jessica Sanchez serenades dad in emotional American Idol homecoming.  
Happy Mother's Day! Here are some sexy stars (Ryan! Liam!) who are devoted to their moms  
Inside Sofia Vergara and Nick Loeb's Split. What Went Wrong?  
Congratulations to Chris Hemsworth and wife Elsa Pataky who welcome a daughter.  
Jessica Simpson describes her daughter as "insanely beautiful."  
Kate's royal style gets suddenly sexier this week!  
Reese Witherspoon attends hearing in her parents' marital dispute.  
Check out photos of newly single Sofia Vergara partying with pals Jessica Alba, Samantha Ronson.  
Jennifer Hudson's Ex-Brother-in-Law Found Guilty of Family Murders.  
Kate sports a chic up do at a London Olympics gala:  
PHOTO: Ryan Gosling and Eva Mendes holding hands in NYC:  
SPONSORED TWEET: This Mother’s Day, treat mom to the best gift. Shop, dine or donate where u see the logo  
Hilary Duff: Labor with Luca Was ‘Very Easy’  
SPOILER! American Idol reveals the top three:  #Idol 
